About the electronic versionThe Adventures of Tom SawyerTwain, Mark, 1835-1910Cr
eation of machine-readable version: The electronic edition was downloaded from t
he Internet Wiretap anonymous ftp server by the Oxford Text Archive in August 19
93.Conversion to TEI.2-conformant markup: Tagged to a TEI compatible format by J
effrey Triggs at Bellcore for the Oxford Text Archive. Additional tagging, Unive
rsity of Virginia Library Electronic Text Center ca. 460 kilobytesThis version a
vailable from the University of Virginia LibraryCharlottesville, Va.Oxford Text 
Archivehttp://etext.lib.virginia.edu/modeng/modeng0.browse.html1995About the pri
nt versionThe Adventures of Tom SawyerMark TwainHarper and BrothersNew York and 
London1903Author's National Edition: The Writings of Mark Twain, Vol. XIISpell-c
heck not performed due to presence of dialect.Published: 1876Englishfiction; pro
seYoung ReadersRevisions to the electronic versionSeptember 1995 corrector Matth
ew G. Kirschenbaum, Electronic Text Center, University ofVirginia LibraryTEI.2-c
ompatible header, and paragraph tags addedJune 1995. corrector Virginia H. Cope,
 University of VirginiaPage breaks, italics and illustrations added.etextcenter@
virginia.edu. Commercial use prohibited; all usage governed by our Conditions of
 Use: http://etext.lib.virginia.edu/conditions.html-v-Lemme see him, Huck.Prefac
eMOST of the adventures recorded in this book really occurred; one or two were e
xperiences of my own, the rest those of boys who were schoolmates of mine. Huck 
Finn is drawn from life; Tom Sawyer also, but not from an individual -- he is a 
combination of the characteristics of three boys whom I knew, and therefore belo
ngs to the composite order of architecture.The odd superstitions touched upon we
re all prevalent among children and slaves in the West at the period of this sto
ry -- that is to say, thirty or forty years ago.Although my book is intended mai
nly for the entertainment of boys and girls, I hope it will not be shunned by me
n and women on that account, for-vi-part of my plan has been to try to pleasantl
y remind adults of what they once were themselves, and of how they felt and thou
ght and talked, and what queer enterprises they sometimes engaged in.THE AUTHOR.
HARTFORD, 1876.-15-Chapter I"TOM!"No answer."TOM!"No answer."What's gone with th
at boy, I wonder? You TOM!"No answer.The old lady pulled her spectacles down and
 looked over them about the room; then she put them up and looked out under them
. She seldom or never looked through them for so small a thing as a boy; they we
re her state pair, the pride of her heart, and were built for "style," not servi
ce -- she could have seen through a pair of stove-lids just as well. She looked 
perplexed for a moment, and then said, not fiercely, but still loud enough for t
he furniture to hear:"Well, I lay if I get hold of you I'll -- "She did not fini
sh, for by this time she was bending down and punching under the bed with the br
oom, and so she needed breath to punctuate the punches with. She resurrected not
hing but the cat."I never did see the beat of that boy!"-16-She went to the open
 door and stood in it and looked out among the tomato vines and "jimpson" weeds 
that constituted the garden. No Tom. So she lifted up her voice at an angle calc
ulated for distance and shouted:"Y-o-u-u Tom!"There was a slight noise behind he
r and she turned just in time to seize a small boy by the slack of his roundabou
t and arrest his flight."There! I might 'a' thought of that closet. What you bee
n doing in there?""Nothing.""Nothing! Look at your hands. And look at your mouth
. What is that truck?""I don't know, aunt.""Well, I know. It's jam -- that's wha
t it is. Forty times I've said if you didn't let that jam alone I'd skin you. Ha
nd me that switch."The switch hovered in the air -- the peril was desperate --"M
y! Look behind you, aunt!"The old lady whirled round, and snatched her skirts ou
t of danger. The lad fled on the instant, scrambled up the high board-fence, and
 disappeared over it.His aunt Polly stood surprised a moment, and then broke int
o a gentle laugh."Hang the boy, can't I never learn anything? Ain't he played me
 tricks enough like that for me to be looking out for him by this time? But old 
fools-17-is the biggest fools there is. Can't learn an old dog new tricks, as th
e saying is. But my goodness, he never plays them alike, two days, and how is a 
body to know what's coming? He 'pears to know just how long he can torment me be
fore I get my dander up, and he knows if he can make out to put me off for a min
ute or make me laugh, it's all down again and I can't hit him a lick. I ain't do
ing my duty by that boy, and that's the Lord's truth, goodness knows. Spare the 
rod and spile the child, as the Good Book says. I'm a laying up sin and sufferin
g for us both, I know. He's full of the Old Scratch, but laws-a-me! he's my own 
dead sister's boy, poor thing, and I ain't got the heart to lash him, somehow. E
very time I let him off, my conscience does hurt me so, and every time I hit him
 my old heart most breaks. Well-a-well, man that is born of woman is of few days
 and full of trouble, as the Scripture says, and I reckon it's so. He'll play ho
okey this evening, * and [* Southwestern for "afternoon"] I'll just be obleeged 
to make him work, to-morrow, to punish him. It's mighty hard to make him work Sa
turdays, when all the boys is having holiday, but he hates work more than he hat
es anything else, and I've got to do some of my duty by him, or I'll be the ruin
ation of the child."Tom did play hookey, and he had a very good time. He got bac
k home barely in season to help Jim, the small colored boy, saw next-day's wood-
18-and split the kindlings before supper -- at least he was there in time to tel
l his adventures to Jim while Jim did three-fourths of the work. Tom's younger b
rother (or rather half-brother) Sid was already through with his part of the wor
k (picking up chips), for he was a quiet boy, and had no adventurous, troublesom
e ways.While Tom was eating his supper, and stealing sugar as opportunity offere
d, Aunt Polly asked him questions that were full of guile, and very deep -- for 
she wanted to trap him into damaging revealments. Like many other simple-hearted
 souls, it was her pet vanity to believe she was endowed with a talent for dark 
and mysterious diplomacy, and she loved to contemplate her most transparent devi
ces as marvels of low cunning. Said she:"Tom, it was middling warm in school, wa
rn't it?""Yes'm.""Powerful warm, warn't it?""Yes'm.""Didn't you want to go in a-
swimming, Tom?"A bit of a scare shot through Tom -- a touch of uncomfortable sus
picion. He searched Aunt Polly's face, but it told him nothing. So he said:"No'm
 -- well, not very much."The old lady reached out her hand and felt Tom's shirt,
 and said:"But you ain't too warm now, though." And it flattered her to reflect 
that she had discovered-19-that the shirt was dry without anybody knowing that t
hat was what she had in her mind. But in spite of her, Tom knew where the wind l
ay, now. So he forestalled what might be the next move:"Some of us pumped on our
 heads -- mine's damp yet. See?"Aunt Polly was vexed to think she had overlooked
 that bit of circumstantial evidence, and missed a trick. Then she had a new ins
piration:"Tom, you didn't have to undo your shirt collar where I sewed it, to pu
mp on your head, did you? Unbutton your jacket!"The trouble vanished out of Tom'
s face. He opened his jacket. His shirt collar was securely sewed."Bother! Well,
 go 'long with you. I'd made sure you'd played hookey and been a-swimming. But I
 forgive ye, Tom. I reckon you're a kind of a singed cat, as the saying is -- be
tter'n you look. This time."She was half sorry her sagacity had miscarried, and 
half glad that Tom had stumbled into obedient conduct for once.But Sidney said:"
Well, now, if I didn't think you sewed his collar with white thread, but it's bl
ack.""Why, I did sew it with white! Tom!"But Tom did not wait for the rest. As h
e went out at the door he said:"Siddy, I'll lick you for that."-20-In a safe pla
ce Tom examined two large needles which were thrust into the lapels of his jacke
t, and had thread bound about them -- one needle carried white thread and the ot
her black. He said:"She'd never noticed if it hadn't been for Sid. Confound it! 
sometimes she sews it with white, and sometimes she sews it with black. I wish t
o geeminy she'd stick to one or t'other -- I can't keep the run of 'em. But I be
t you I'll lam Sid for that. I'll learn him!"He was not the Model Boy of the vil
lage. He knew the model boy very well though -- and loathed him.Within two minut
es, or even less, he had forgotten all his troubles. Not because his troubles we
re one whit less heavy and bitter to him than a man's are to a man, but because 
a new and powerful interest bore them down and drove them out of his mind for th
e time -- just as men's misfortunes are forgotten in the excitement of new enter
prises. This new interest was a valued novelty in whistling, which he had just a
cquired from a negro, and he was suffering to practise it undisturbed. It consis
ted in a peculiar bird-like turn, a sort of liquid warble, produced by touching 
the tongue to the roof of the mouth at short intervals in the midst of the music
 -- the reader probably remembers how to do it, if he has ever been a boy. Dilig
ence and attention soon gave him the knack of it, and he strode down the street 
with his mouth full of harmony-21-and his soul full of gratitude. He felt much a
s an astronomer feels who has discovered a new planet -- no doubt, as far as str
ong, deep, unalloyed pleasure is concerned, the advantage was with the boy, not 
the astronomer.The summer evenings were long. It was not dark, yet. Presently To
m checked his whistle. A stranger was before him -- a boy a shade larger than hi
mself. A new-comer of any age or either sex was an impressive curiosity in the p
oor little shabby village of St. Petersburg. This boy was well dressed, too -- w
ell dressed on a week-day. This was simply astounding. His cap was a dainty thin
g, his close-buttoned blue cloth roundabout was new and natty, and so were his p
antaloons. He had shoes on -- and it was only Friday. He even wore a necktie, a 
bright bit of ribbon. He had a citified air about him that ate into Tom's vitals
. The more Tom stared at the splendid marvel, the higher he turned up his nose a
t his finery and the shabbier and shabbier his own outfit seemed to him to grow.
 Neither boy spoke. If one moved, the other moved -- but only sidewise, in a cir
cle; they kept face to face and eye to eye all the time. Finally Tom said:"I can
 lick you!""I'd like to see you try it.""Well, I can do it.""No you can't, eithe
r.""Yes I can.""No you can't."-22-"I can.""You can't.""Can!""Can't!"An uncomfort
able pause. Then Tom said:"What's your name?""'Tisn't any of your business, mayb
e.""Well I 'low I'll make it my business.""Well why don't you?""If you say much,
 I will.""Much -- much -- much. There now.""Oh, you think you're mighty smart, d
on't you? I could lick you with one hand tied behind me, if I wanted to.""Well w
hy don't you do it? You say you can do it.""Well I will , if you fool with me.""
Oh yes -- I've seen whole families in the same fix.""Smarty! You think you're so
me , now, don't you? Oh, what a hat!""You can lump that hat if you don't like it
. I dare you to knock it off -- and anybody that'll take a dare will suck eggs."
"You're a liar!""You're another.""You're a fighting liar and dasn't take it up."
"Aw -- take a walk!""Say -- if you give me much more of your sass I'll take and 
bounce a rock off'n your head."-23-"Oh, of course you will.""Well I will .""Well
 why don't you do it then? What do you keep saying you will for? Why don't you d
o it? It's because you're afraid.""I ain't afraid.""You are.""I ain't.""You are.
"Another pause, and more eying and sidling around each other. Presently they wer
e shoulder to shoulder. Tom said:"Get away from here!""Go away yourself!""I won'
t.""I won't either."So they stood, each with a foot placed at an angle as a brac
e, and both shoving with might and main, and glowering at each other with hate. 
But neither could get an advantage. After struggling till both were hot and flus
hed, each relaxed his strain with watchful caution, and Tom said:"You're a cowar
d and a pup. I'll tell my big brother on you, and he can thrash you with his lit
tle finger, and I'll make him do it, too.""What do I care for your big brother? 
I've got a brother that's bigger than he is -- and what's more, he can throw him
 over that fence, too." [Both brothers were imaginary.]"That's a lie."-24-"Your 
saying so don't make it so."Tom drew a line in the dust with his big toe, and sa
id:"I dare you to step over that, and I'll lick you till you can't stand up. Any
body that'll take a dare will steal sheep."The new boy stepped over promptly, an
d said:"Now you said you'd do it, now let's see you do it.""Don't you crowd me n
ow; you better look out.""Well, you said you'd do it -- why don't you do it?""By
 jingo! for two cents I will do it."The new boy took two broad coppers out of hi
s pocket and held them out with derision. Tom struck them to the ground. In an i
nstant both boys were rolling and tumbling in the dirt, gripped together like ca
ts; and for the space of a minute they tugged and tore at each other's hair and 
clothes, punched and scratched each other's nose, and covered themselves with du
st and glory. Presently the confusion took form, and through the fog of battle T
om appeared, seated astride the new boy, and pounding him with his fists. "Holle
r 'nuff!" said he.The boy only struggled to free himself. He was crying -- mainl
y from rage."Holler 'nuff!" -- and the pounding went on.At last the stranger got
 out a smothered "'Nuff!" and Tom let him up and said:-25-"Now that'll learn you
. Better look out who you're fooling with next time."The new boy went off brushi
ng the dust from his clothes, sobbing, snuffling, and occasionally looking back 
and shaking his head and threatening what he would do to Tom the "next time he c
aught him out." To which Tom responded with jeers, and started off in high feath
er, and as soon as his back was turned the new boy snatched up a stone, threw it
 and hit him between the shoulders and then turned tail and ran like an antelope
. Tom chased the traitor home, and thus found out where he lived. He then held a
 position at the gate for some time, daring the enemy to come outside, but the e
nemy only made faces at him through the window and declined. At last the enemy's
 mother appeared, and called Tom a bad, vicious, vulgar child, and ordered him a
way. So he went away; but he said he "'lowed" to "lay" for that boy.He got home 
pretty late that night, and when he climbed cautiously in at the window, he unco
vered an ambuscade, in the person of his aunt; and when she saw the state his cl
othes were in her resolution to turn his Saturday holiday into captivity at hard
 labor became adamantine in its firmness.-26-Chapter IISATURDAY morning was come
, and all the summer world was bright and fresh, and brimming with life. There w
as a song in every heart; and if the heart was young the music issued at the lip
s. There was cheer in every face and a spring in every step. The locust-trees we
re in bloom and the fragrance of the blossoms filled the air. Cardiff Hill, beyo
nd the village and above it, was green with vegetation and it lay just far enoug
h away to seem a Delectable Land, dreamy, reposeful, and inviting.Tom appeared o
n the sidewalk with a bucket of whitewash and a long-handled brush. He surveyed 
the fence, and all gladness left him and a deep melancholy settled down upon his
 spirit. Thirty yards of board fence nine feet high. Life to him seemed hollow, 
and existence but a burden. Sighing, he dipped his brush and passed it along the
 topmost plank; repeated the operation; did it again; compared the insignificant
 whitewashed streak with the far-reaching continent of unwhitewashed fence, and 
sat down on a tree-box discouraged. Jim came skipping out at the gate with-27-a 
tin pail, and singing Buffalo Gals. Bringing water from the town pump had always
 been hateful work in Tom's eyes, before, but now it did not strike him so. He r
emembered that there was company at the pump. White, mulatto, and negro boys and
 girls were always there waiting their turns, resting, trading playthings, quarr
elling, fighting, skylarking. And he remembered that although the pump was only 
a hundred and fifty yards off, Jim never got back with a bucket of water under a
n hour -- and even then somebody generally had to go after him. Tom said:"Say, J
im, I'll fetch the water if you'll whitewash some."Jim shook his head and said:"
Can't, Mars Tom. Ole missis, she tole me I got to go an' git dis water an' not s
top foolin' roun' wid anybody. She say she spec' Mars Tom gwine to ax me to whit
ewash, an' so she tole me go 'long an' 'tend to my own business -- she 'lowed sh
e'd 'tend to de whitewashin'.""Oh, never you mind what she said, Jim. That's the
 way she always talks. Gimme the bucket -- I won't be gone only a a minute. She 
won't ever know.""Oh, I dasn't, Mars Tom. Ole missis she'd take an' tar de head 
off'n me. 'Deed she would."" She! She never licks anybody -- whacks 'em over the
 head with her thimble -- and who cares for that, I'd like to know. She talks aw
ful, but talk-28-don'thurt -- anyways it don't if she don't cry. Jim, I'll give 
you a marvel. I'll give you a white alley!"Jim began to waver."White alley, Jim!
 And it's a bully taw.""My! Dat's a mighty gay marvel, I tell you! But Mars Tom 
I's powerful 'fraid ole missis -- ""And besides, if you will I'll show you my so
re toe."Jim was only human -- this attraction was too much for him. He put down 
his pail, took the white alley, and bent over the toe with absorbing interest wh
ile the bandage was being unwound. In another moment he was flying down the stre
et with his pail and a tingling rear, Tom was whitewashing with vigor, and Aunt 
Polly was retiring from the field with a slipper in her hand and triumph in her 
eye. But Tom's energy did not last. He began to think of the fun he had planned 
for this day, and his sorrows multiplied. Soon the free boys would come tripping
 along on all sorts of delicious expeditions, and they would make a world of fun
 of him for having to work -- the very thought of it burnt him like fire. He got
 out his worldly wealth and examined it -- bits of toys, marbles, and trash; eno
ugh to buy an exchange of work, maybe, but not half enough to buy so much as hal
f an hour of pure freedom. So he returned his straitened means to his pocket, an
d gave up the idea of trying-29-to buy the boys. At this dark and hopeless momen
t an inspiration burst upon him! Nothing less than a great, magnificent inspirat
ion.He took up his brush and went tranquilly to work. Ben Rogers hove in sight p
resently -- the very boy, of all boys, whose ridicule he had been dreading. Ben'
s gait was the hop-skip-and-jump -- proof enough that his heart was light and hi
s anticipations high. He was eating an apple, and giving a long, melodious whoop
, at intervals, followed by a deep-toned ding-dong-dong, ding-dong-dong, for he 
was personating a steamboat. As he drew near, he slackened speed, took the middl
e of the street, leaned far over to star-board and rounded to ponderously and wi
th laborious pomp and circumstance -- for he was personating the Big Missouri, a
nd considered himself to be drawing nine feet of water. He was boat and captain 
and engine-bells combined, so he had to imagine himself standing on his own hurr
icane-deck giving the orders and executing them:"Stop her, sir! Ting-a-ling-ling
!" The headway ran almost out, and he drew up slowly toward the sidewalk."Ship u
p to back! Ting-a-ling-ling!" His arms straightened and stiffened down his sides
."Set her back on the stabboard! Ting-a-ling-ling! Chow! ch-chow-wow! Chow!" His
 right hand, meantime, describing stately circles -- for it was representing a f
orty-foot wheel."Let her go back on the labboard! Ting-a-ling--30-ling! Chow-ch-
chow-chow!" The left hand began to describe circles."Stop the stabboard! Ting-a-
ling-ling! Stop the labboard! Come ahead on the stabboard! Stop her! Let your ou
tside turn over slow! Ting-a-ling-ling! Chow-ow-ow! Get out that head-line! Live
ly now! Come -- out with your spring-line -- what're you about there! Take a tur
n round that stump with the bight of it! Stand by that stage, now -- let her go!
 Done with the engines, sir! Ting-a-ling-ling! Sh't! s'h't! sh't!" (trying the g
auge-cocks).Tom went on whitewashing -- paid no attention to the steamboat. Ben 
stared a moment and then said: "Hi- yi ! You're up a stump, ain't you!"No answer
. Tom surveyed his last touch with the eye of an artist, then he gave his brush 
another gentle sweep and surveyed the result, as before. Ben ranged up alongside
 of him. Tom's mouth watered for the apple, but he stuck to his work. Ben said:"
Hello, old chap, you got to work, hey?"Tom wheeled suddenly and said:"Why, it's 
you, Ben! I warn't noticing.""Say -- I'm going in a-swimming, I am. Don't you wi
sh you could? But of course you'd druther work -- wouldn't you? Course you would
!"Tom contemplated the boy a bit, and said:"What do you call work?""Why, ain't t
hat work?"-31-Tom resumed his whitewashing, and answered carelessly:"Well, maybe
 it is, and maybe it ain't. All I know, is, it suits Tom Sawyer.""Oh come, now, 
you don't mean to let on that you like it?"The brush continued to move."Like it?
 Well, I don't see why I oughtn't to like it. Does a boy get a chance to whitewa
sh a fence every day?"That put the thing in a new light. Ben stopped nibbling hi
s apple. Tom swept his brush daintily back and forth -- stepped back to note the
 effect -- added a touch here and there -- criticised the effect again -- Ben wa
tching every move and getting more and more interested, more and more absorbed. 
Presently he said:"Say, Tom, let me whitewash a little."Tom considered, was abou
t to consent; but he altered his mind:"No -- no -- I reckon it wouldn't hardly d
o, Ben. You see, Aunt Polly's awful particular about this fence -- right here on
 the street, you know -- but if it was the back fence I wouldn't mind and she wo
uldn't. Yes, she's awful particular about this fence; it's got to be done very c
areful; I reckon there ain't one boy in a thousand, maybe two thousand, that can
 do it the way it's got to be done.""No -- is that so? Oh come, now -- lemme-32-
just try. Only just a little -- I'd let you, if you was me, Tom.""Ben, I'd like 
to, honest injun; but Aunt Polly -- well, Jim wanted to do it, but she wouldn't 
let him; Sid wanted to do it, and she wouldn't let Sid. Now don't you see how I'
m fixed? If you was to tackle this fence and anything was to happen to it -- ""O
h, shucks, I'll be just as careful. Now lemme try. Say -- I'll give you the core
 of my apple.""Well, here -- No, Ben, now don't. I'm afeard -- ""I'll give you a
ll of it!"Tom gave up the brush with reluctance in his face, but alacrity in his
 heart. And while the late steamer Big Missouri worked and sweated in the sun, t
he retired artist sat on a barrel in the shade close by, dangled his legs, munch
ed his apple, and planned the slaughter of more innocents. There was no lack of 
material; boys happened along every little while; they came to jeer, but remaine
d to whitewash. By the time Ben was fagged out, Tom had traded the next chance t
o Billy Fisher for a kite, in good repair; and when he played out, Johnny Miller
 bought in for a dead rat and a string to swing it with -- and so on, and so on,
 hour after hour. And when the middle of the afternoon came, from being a poor p
overty-stricken boy in the morning, Tom was literally rolling in wealth. He had 
besides the things before mentioned, twelve marbles,-33-"Tom Gave Up theBrush"pa
rt of a jews-harp, a piece of blue bottle-glass to look through, a spool cannon,
 a key that wouldn't unlock anything, a fragment of chalk, a glass stopper of a 
decanter, a tin soldier, a couple of tadpoles, six fire-crackers, a kitten with 
only one eye, a brass door-knob, a dog-collar -- but no dog -- the handle of a k
nife, four pieces of orange-peel, and a dilapidated old window sash.He had had a
 nice, good, idle time all the while -- plenty of company -- and the fence had t
hree coats of whitewash on it! If he hadn't run out of whitewash he would have b
ankrupted every boy in the village.Tom said to himself that it was not such a ho
llow world, after all. He had discovered a great law of human action, without kn
owing it -- namely, that in order to make a man or a boy covet a thing, it is on
ly necessary to make the thing difficult to attain. If he had been a great and w
ise philosopher, like the writer of this book, he would now have comprehended th
at Work consists of whatever a body is obliged to do, and that Play consists of 
whatever a body is not obliged to do. And this would help him to understand why 
constructing artificial flowers or performing on a tread-mill is work, while rol
ling ten-pins or climbing Mont Blanc is only amusement. There are wealthy gentle
men in England who drive four-horse passenger-coaches twenty or thirty miles on 
a daily line, in the summer, because the privilege costs them considerable money
; but if they were-34-offered wages for the service, that would turn it into wor
k and then they would resign.The boy mused awhile over the substantial change wh
ich had taken place in his worldly circumstances, and then wended toward headqua
rters to report.-35-Chapter IIITOM presented himself before Aunt Polly, who was 
sitting by an open window in a pleasant rearward apartment, which was bedroom, b
reakfast-room, dining-room, and library, combined. The balmy summer air, the res
tful quiet, the odor of the flowers, and the drowsing murmur of the bees had had
 their effect, and she was nodding over her knitting -- for she had no company b
ut the cat, and it was asleep in her lap. Her spectacles were propped up on her 
gray head for safety. She had thought that of course Tom had deserted long ago, 
and she wondered at seeing him place himself in her power again in this intrepid
 way. He said: "Mayn't I go and play now, aunt?""What, a'ready? How much have yo
u done?""It's all done, aunt.""Tom, don't lie to me -- I can't bear it.""I ain't
, aunt; it is all done."Aunt Polly placed small trust in such evidence. She went
 out to see for herself; and she would have been content to find twenty per cent
. of Tom's statement true. When she found the entire fence whitewashed, and not 
only white--36-washed but elaborately coated and recoated, and even a streak add
ed to the ground, her astonishment was almost unspeakable. She said:"Well, I nev
er! There's no getting round it, you can work when you're a mind to, Tom." And t
hen she diluted the compliment by adding, "But it's powerful seldom you're a min
d to, I'm bound to say. Well, go 'long and play; but mind you get back some time
 in a week, or I'll tan you."She was so overcome by the splendor of his achievem
ent that she took him into the closet and selected a choice apple and delivered 
it to him, along with an improving lecture upon the added value and flavor a tre
at took to itself when it came without sin through virtuous effort. And while sh
e closed with a happy Scriptural flourish, he "hooked" a doughnut.Then he skippe
d out, and saw Sid just starting up the outside stairway that led to the back ro
oms on the second floor. Clods were handy and the air was full of them in a twin
kling. They raged around Sid like a hail-storm; and before Aunt Polly could coll
ect her surprised faculties and sally to the rescue, six or seven clods had take
n personal effect, and Tom was over the fence and gone. There was a gate, but as
 a general thing he was too crowded for time to make use of it. His soul was at 
peace, now that he had settled with Sid for calling attention to his black threa
d and getting him into trouble.-37-Tom skirted the block, and came round into a 
muddy alley that led by the back of his aunt's cow-stable. He presently got safe
ly beyond the reach of capture and punishment, and hastened toward the public sq
uare of the village, where two "military" companies of boys had met for conflict
, according to previous appointment. Tom was General of one of these armies, Joe
 Harper (a bosom friend) General of the other. These two great commanders did no
t condescend to fight in person -- that being better suited to the still smaller
 fry -- but sat together on an eminence and conducted the field operations by or
ders delivered through aides-de-camp. Tom's army won a great victory, after a lo
ng and hard-fought battle. Then the dead were counted, prisoners exchanged, the 
terms of the next disagreement agreed upon, and the day for the necessary battle
 appointed; after which the armies fell into line and marched away, and Tom turn
ed homeward alone.As he was passing by the house where Jeff Thatcher lived, he s
aw a new girl in the garden -- a lovely little blue-eyed creature with yellow ha
ir plaited into two long-tails, white summer frock and embroidered pantalettes. 
The fresh-crowned hero fell without firing a shot. A certain Amy Lawrence vanish
ed out of his heart and left not even a memory of herself behind. He had thought
 he loved her to distraction; he had regarded his passion as adoration; and beho
ld it was only a poor little evanescent partiality. He had been months winning h
er; she-38-had confessed hardly a week ago; he had been the happiest and the pro
udest boy in the world only seven short days, and here in one instant of time sh
e had gone out of his heart like a casual stranger whose visit is done.He worshi
pped this new angel with furtive eye, till he saw that she had discovered him; t
hen he pretended he did not know she was present, and began to "show off" in all
 sorts of absurd boyish ways, in order to win her admiration. He kept up this gr
otesque foolishness for some time; but by-and-by, while he was in the midst of s
ome dangerous gymnastic performances, he glanced aside and saw that the little g
irl was wending her way toward the house. Tom came up to the fence and leaned on
 it, grieving, and hoping she would tarry yet awhile longer. She halted a moment
 on the steps and then moved toward the door. Tom heaved a great sigh as she put
 her foot on the threshold. But his face lit up, right away, for she tossed a pa
nsy over the fence a moment before she disappeared.The boy ran around and stoppe
d within a foot or two of the flower, and then shaded his eyes with his hand and
 began to look down street as if he had discovered something of interest going o
n in that direction. Presently he picked up a straw and began trying to balance 
it on his nose, with his head tilted far back; and as he moved from side to side
, in his efforts, he edged nearer and nearer toward the pansy; finally his bare 
foot rested upon it, his pliant-39-toes closed upon it, and he hopped away with 
the treasure and disappeared round the corner. But only for a minute -- only whi
le he could button the flower inside his jacket, next his heart -- or next his s
tomach, possibly, for he was not much posted in anatomy, and not hypercritical, 
anyway.He returned, now, and hung about the fence till nightfall, "showing off,"
 as before; but the girl never exhibited herself again, though Tom comforted him
self a little with the hope that she had been near some window, meantime, and be
en aware of his attentions. Finally he strode home reluctantly, with his poor he
ad full of visions.All through supper his spirits were so high that his aunt won
dered "what had got into the child." He took a good scolding about clodding Sid,
 and did not seem to mind it in the least. He tried to steal sugar under his aun
t's very nose, and got his knuckles rapped for it. He said:"Aunt, you don't whac
k Sid when he takes it.""Well, Sid don't torment a body the way you do. You'd be
 always into that sugar if I warn't watching you."Presently she stepped into the
 kitchen, and Sid, happy in his immunity, reached for the sugar-bowl -- a sort o
f glorying over Tom which was wellnigh unbearable. But Sid's fingers slipped and
 the bowl dropped and broke. Tom was in ecstasies. In such ecstasies that he eve
n controlled his tongue and was silent. He said to himself that he would-40-not 
speak a word, even when his aunt came in, but would sit perfectly still till she
 asked who did the mischief; and then he would tell, and there would be nothing 
so good in the world as to see that pet model "catch it." He was so brimful of e
xultation that he could hardly hold himself when the old lady came back and stoo
d above the wreck discharging lightnings of wrath from over her spectacles. He s
aid to himself, "Now it's coming!" And the next instant he was sprawling on the 
floor! The potent palm was uplifted to strike again when Tom cried out:"Hold on,
 now, what 'er you belting me for? -- Sid broke it!"Aunt Polly paused, perplexed
, and Tom looked for healing pity. But when she got her tongue again, she only s
aid:"Umf! Well, you didn't get a lick amiss, I reckon. You been into some other 
audacious mischief when I wasn't around, like enough."Then her conscience reproa
ched her, and she yearned to say something kind and loving; but she judged that 
this would be construed into a confession that she had been in the wrong, and di
scipline forbade that. So she kept silence, and went about her affairs with a tr
oubled heart. Tom sulked in a corner and exalted his woes. He knew that in her h
eart his aunt was on her knees to him, and he was morosely gratified by the cons
ciousness of it. He would hang out no signals, he would take notice-41-of none. 
He knew that a yearning glance fell upon him, now and then, through a film of te
ars, but he refused recognition of it. He pictured himself lying sick unto death
 and his aunt bending over him beseeching one little forgiving word, but he woul
d turn his face to the wall, and die with that word unsaid. Ah, how would she fe
el then? And he pictured himself brought home from the river, dead, with his cur
ls all wet, and his sore heart at rest. How she would throw herself upon him, an
d how her tears would fall like rain, and her lips pray God to give her back her
 boy and she would never, never abuse him any more! But he would lie there cold 
and white and make no sign -- a poor little sufferer, whose griefs were at an en
d. He so worked upon his feelings with the pathos of these dreams, that he had t
o keep swallowing, he was so like to choke; and his eyes swam in a blur of water
, which overflowed when he winked, and ran down and trickled from the end of his
 nose. And such a luxury to him was this petting of his sorrows, that he could n
ot bear to have any worldly cheeriness or any grating delight intrude upon it; i
t was too sacred for such contact; and so, presently, when his cousin Mary dance
d in, all alive with the joy of seeing home again after an age-long visit of one
 week to the country, he got up and moved in clouds and darkness out at one door
 as she brought song and sunshine in at the other.He wandered far from the accus
tomed haunts of-42-boys, and sought desolate places that were in harmony with hi
s spirit. A log raft in the river invited him, and he seated himself on its oute
r edge and contemplated the dreary vastness of the stream, wishing, the while, t
hat he could only be drowned, all at once and unconsciously, without undergoing 
the uncomfortable routine devised by nature. Then he thought of his flower. He g
ot it out, rumpled and wilted, and it mightily increased his dismal felicity. He
 wondered if she would pity him if she knew? Would she cry, and wish that she ha
d a right to put her arms around his neck and comfort him? Or would she turn col
dly away like all the hollow world? This picture brought such an agony of pleasu
rable suffering that he worked it over and over again in his mind and set it up 
in new and varied lights, till he wore it threadbare. At last he rose up sighing
 and departed in the darkness.About half-past nine or ten o'clock he came along 
the deserted street to where the Adored Unknown lived; he paused a moment; no so
und fell upon his listening ear; a candle was casting a dull glow upon the curta
in of a second-story window. Was the sacred presence there? He climbed the fence
, threaded his stealthy way through the plants, till he stood under that window;
 he looked up at it long, and with emotion; then he laid him down on the ground 
under it, disposing himself upon his back, with his hands clasped upon his breas
t and holding his poor wilted flower. And thus he would-43-die -- out in the col
d world, with no shelter over his homeless head, no friendly hand to wipe the de
ath-damps from his brow, no loving face to bend pityingly over him when the grea
t agony came. And thus she would see him when she looked out upon the glad morni
ng, and oh! would she drop one little tear upon his poor, lifeless form, would s
he heave one little sigh to see a bright young life so rudely blighted, so untim
ely cut down?The window went up, a maid-servant's discordant voice profaned the 
holy calm, and a deluge of water drenched the prone martyr's remains!The strangl
ing hero sprang up with a relieving snort. There was a whiz as of a missile in t
he air, mingled with the murmur of a curse, a sound as of shivering glass follow
ed, and a small, vague form went over the fence and shot away in the gloom.Not l
ong after, as Tom, all undressed for bed, was surveying his drenched garments by
 the light of a tallow dip, Sid woke up; but if he had any dim idea of making an
y "references to allusions," he thought better of it and held his peace, for the
re was danger in Tom's eye.Tom turned in without the added vexation of prayers, 
and Sid made mental note of the omission.-44-Chapter IVTHE sun rose upon a tranq
uil world, and beamed down upon the peaceful village like a benediction. Breakfa
st over, Aunt Polly had family worship: it began with a prayer built from the gr
ound up of solid courses of Scriptural quotations, welded together with a thin m
ortar of originality; and from the summit of this she delivered a grim chapter o
f the Mosaic Law, as from Sinai.Then Tom girded up his loins, so to speak, and w
ent to work to "get his verses." Sid had learned his lesson days before. Tom ben
t all his energies to the memorizing of five verses, and he chose part of the Se
rmon on the Mount, because he could find no verses that were shorter. At the end
 of half an hour Tom had a vague general idea of his lesson, but no more, for hi
s mind was traversing the whole field of human thought, and his hands were busy 
with distracting recreations. Mary took his book to hear him recite, and he trie
d to find his way through the fog:"Blessed are the -- a -- a -- ""Poor" ---45-"Y
es -- poor; blessed are the poor -- a -- a -- ""In spirit -- ""In spirit; blesse
d are the poor in spirit, for they -- they -- ""Theirs -- ""For theirs . Blessed
 are the poor in spirit, for theirs is the kingdom of heaven. Blessed are they t
hat mourn, for they -- they -- ""Sh -- ""For they -- a -- ""S, H, A -- ""For the
y S, H -- Oh, I don't know what it is!""Shall!""Oh, shall! for they shall -- for
 they shall -- a -- a -- shall mourn -- a -- a -- blessed are they that shall --
 they that -- a -- they that shall mourn, for they shall -- a -- shall what? Why
 don't you tell me, Mary? -- what do you want to be so mean for?""Oh, Tom, you p
oor thick-headed thing, I'm not teasing you. I wouldn't do that. You must go and
 learn it again. Don't you be discouraged, Tom, you'll manage it -- and if you d
o, I'll give you something ever so nice. There, now, that's a good boy.""All rig
ht! What is it, Mary, tell me what it is.""Never you mind, Tom. You know if I sa
y it's nice, it is nice.""You bet you that's so, Mary. All right, I'll tackle it
 again."And he did "tackle it again" -- and under the-46-double pressure of curi
osity and prospective gain he did it with such spirit that he accomplished a shi
ning success. Mary gave him a brand-new "Barlow" knife worth twelve and a half c
ents; and the convulsion of delight that swept his system shook him to his found
ations. True, the knife would not cut anything, but it was a "sure-enough" Barlo
w, and there was inconceivable grandeur in that -- though where the Western boys
 ever got the idea that such a weapon could possibly be counterfeited to its inj
ury is an imposing mystery and will always remain so, perhaps. Tom contrived to 
scarify the cupboard with it, and was arranging to begin on the bureau, when he 
was called off to dress for Sunday-school.Mary gave him a tin basin of water and
 a piece of soap, and he went outside the door and set the basin on a little ben
ch there; then he dipped the soap in the water and laid it down; turned up his s
leeves; poured out the water on the ground, gently, and then entered the kitchen
 and began to wipe his face diligently on the towel behind the door. But Mary re
moved the towel and said:"Now ain't you ashamed, Tom. You mustn't be so bad. Wat
er won't hurt you."Tom was a trifle disconcerted. The basin was refilled, and th
is time he stood over it a little while, gathering resolution; took in a big bre
ath and began. When he entered the kitchen presently, with both eyes shut and gr
oping for the towel with-47-his hands, an honorable testimony of suds and water 
was dripping from his face. But when he emerged from the towel, he was not yet s
atisfactory, for the clean territory stopped short at his chin and his jaws, lik
e a mask; below and beyond this line there was a dark expanse of unirrigated soi
l that spread downward in front and backward around his neck. Mary took him in h
and, and when she was done with him he was a man and a brother, without distinct
ion of color, and his saturated hair was neatly brushed, and its short curls wro
ught into a dainty and symmetrical general effect. [He privately smoothed out th
e curls, with labor and difficulty, and plastered his hair close down to his hea
d; for he held curls to be effeminate, and his own filled his life with bitterne
ss.] Then Mary got out a suit of his clothing that had been used only on Sundays
 during two years -- they were simply called his "other clothes" -- and so by th
at we know the size of his wardrobe. The girl "put him to rights" after he had d
ressed himself; she buttoned his neat roundabout up to his chin, turned his vast
 shirt collar down over his shoulders, brushed him off and crowned him with his 
speckled straw hat. He now looked exceedingly improved and uncomfortable. He was
 fully as uncomfortable as he looked; for there was a restraint about whole clot
hes and cleanliness that galled him. He hoped that Mary would forget his shoes, 
but the hope was blighted; she coated them thoroughly with tallow, as was the-48
-custom, and brought them out. He lost his temper and said he was always being m
ade to do everything he didn't want to do. But Mary said, persuasively:"Please, 
Tom -- that's a good boy."So he got into the shoes snarling. Mary was soon ready
, and the three children set out for Sunday-school -- a place that Tom hated wit
h his whole heart; but Sid and Mary were fond of it.Sabbath-school hours were fr
om nine to half-past ten; and then church service. Two of the children always re
mained for the sermon voluntarily, and the other always remained too -- for stro
nger reasons. The church's high-backed, uncushioned pews would seat about three 
hundred persons; the edifice was but a small, plain affair, with a sort of pine 
board tree-box on top of it for a steeple. At the door Tom dropped back a step a
nd accosted a Sunday-dressed comrade:"Say, Billy, got a yaller ticket?""Yes.""Wh
at'll you take for her?""What'll you give?""Piece of lickrish and a fish-hook.""
Less see 'em."Tom exhibited. They were satisfactory, and the property changed ha
nds. Then Tom traded a couple of white alleys for three red tickets, and some sm
all trifle or other for a couple of blue ones. He waylaid other boys as they cam
e, and went on buying tickets of various colors ten or fifteen minutes-49-longer
. He entered the church, now, with a swarm of clean and noisy boys and girls, pr
oceeded to his seat and started a quarrel with the first boy that came handy. Th
e teacher, a grave, elderly man, interfered; then turned his back a moment and T
om pulled a boy's hair in the next bench, and was absorbed in his book when the 
boy turned around; stuck a pin in another boy, presently, in order to hear him s
ay "Ouch!" and got a new reprimand from his teacher. Tom's whole class were of a
 pattern -- restless, noisy, and troublesome. When they came to recite their les
sons, not one of them knew his verses perfectly, but had to be prompted all alon
g. However, they worried through, and each got his reward -- in small blue ticke
ts, each with a passage of Scripture on it; each blue ticket was pay for two ver
ses of the recitation. Ten blue tickets equalled a red one, and could be exchang
ed for it; ten red tickets equalled a yellow one; for ten yellow tickets the sup
erintendent gave a very plainly bound Bible (worth forty cents in those easy tim
es) to the pupil. How many of my readers would have the industry and application
 to memorize two thousand verses, even for a Dore Bible? And yet Mary had acquir
ed two Bibles in this way -- it was the patient work of two years -- and a boy o
f German parentage had won four or five. He once recited three thousand verses w
ithout stopping; but the strain upon his mental faculties was too great, and he 
was little better than an idiot from that day-50-forth -- a grievous misfortune 
for the school, for on great occasions, before company, the superintendent (as T
om expressed it) had always made this boy come out and "spread himself." Only th
e older pupils managed to keep their tickets and stick to their tedious work lon
g enough to get a Bible, and so the delivery of one of these prizes was a rare a
nd noteworthy circumstance; the successful pupil was so great and conspicuous fo
r that day that on the spot every scholar's heart was fired with a fresh ambitio
n that often lasted a couple of weeks. It is possible that Tom's mental stomach 
had never really hungered for one of those prizes, but unquestionably his entire
 being had for many a day longed for the glory and the eclat that came with it.I
n due course the superintendent stood up in front of the pulpit, with a closed h
ymn-book in his hand and his forefinger inserted between its leaves, and command
ed attention. When a Sunday-school superintendent makes his customary little spe
ech, a hymn-book in the hand is as necessary as is the inevitable sheet of music
 in the hand of a singer who stands forward on the platform and sings a solo at 
a concert -- though why, is a mystery: for neither the hymn-book nor the sheet o
f music is ever referred to by the sufferer. This superintendent was a slim crea
ture of thirty-five, with a sandy goatee and short sandy hair; he wore a stiff s
tanding-collar whose upper edge almost reached his ears and whose sharp points c
urved forward abreast the-51-corners of his mouth -- a fence that compelled a st
raight lookout ahead, and a turning of the whole body when a side view was requi
red; his chin was propped on a spreading cravat which was as broad and as long a
s a bank-note, and had fringed ends; his boot toes were turned sharply up, in th
e fashion of the day, like sleigh-runners -- an effect patiently and laboriously
 produced by the young men by sitting with their toes pressed against a wall for
 hours together. Mr. Walters was very earnest of mien, and very sincere and hone
st at heart; and he held sacred things and places in such reverence, and so sepa
rated them from worldly matters, that unconsciously to himself his Sunday-school
 voice had acquired a peculiar intonation which was wholly absent on week-days. 
He began after this fashion:"Now, children, I want you all to sit up just as str
aight and pretty as you can and give me all your attention for a minute or two. 
There -- that is it. That is the way good little boys and girls should do. I see
 one little girl who is looking out of the window -- I am afraid she thinks I am
 out there somewhere -- perhaps up in one of the trees making a speech to the li
ttle birds. [Applausive titter.] I want to tell you how good it makes me feel to
 see so many bright, clean little faces assembled in a place like this, learning
 to do right and be good." And so forth and so on. It is not necessary to set do
wn the rest of the oration. It was of a pattern which does not vary, and so it i
s familiar to us all.-52-The latter third of the speech was marred by the resump
tion of fights and other recreations among certain of the bad boys, and by fidge
tings and whisperings that extended far and wide, washing even to the bases of i
solated and incorruptible rocks like Sid and Mary. But now every sound ceased su
ddenly, with the subsidence of Mr. Walters' voice, and the conclusion of the spe
ech was received with a burst of silent gratitude.A good part of the whispering 
had been occasioned by an event which was more or less rare -- the entrance of v
isitors: lawyer Thatcher, accompanied by a very feeble and aged man; a fine, por
tly, middle-aged gentleman with iron-gray hair; and a dignified lady who was dou
btless the latter's wife. The lady was leading a child. Tom had been restless an
d full of chafings and repinings; conscience-smitten, too -- he could not meet A
my Lawrence's eye, he could not brook her loving gaze. But when he saw this smal
l new-comer his soul was all ablaze with bliss in a moment. The next moment he w
as "showing off" with all his might -- cuffing boys, pulling hair, making faces 
-- in a word, using every art that seemed likely to fascinate a girl and win her
 applause. His exaltation had but one alloy -- the memory of his humiliation in 
this angel's garden -- and that record in sand was fast washing out, under the w
aves of happiness that were sweeping over it now.The visitors were given the hig
hest seat of honor,-53-and as soon as Mr. Walters' speech was finished, he intro
duced them to the school. The middle-aged man turned out to be a prodigious pers
onage -- no less a one than the county judge -- altogether the most august creat
ion these children had ever looked upon -- and they wondered what kind of materi
al he was made of -- and they half wanted to hear him roar, and were half afraid
 he might, too. He was from Constantinople, twelve miles away -- so he had trave
lled, and seen the world -- these very eyes had looked upon the county court-hou
se -- which was said to have a tin roof. The awe which these reflections inspire
d was attested by the impressive silence and the ranks of staring eyes. This was
 the great Judge Thatcher, brother of their own lawyer. Jeff Thatcher immediatel
y went forward, to be familiar with the great man and be envied by the school. I
t would have been music to his soul to hear the whisperings:"Look at him, Jim! H
e's a going up there. Say -- look! he's a going to shake hands with him -- he is
 shaking hands with him! By jings, don't you wish you was Jeff?"Mr. Walters fell
 to "showing off," with all sorts of official bustlings and activities, giving o
rders, delivering judgments, discharging directions here, there, everywhere that
 he could find a target. The librarian "showed off" -- running hither and thithe
r with his arms full of books and making a deal of the splutter and fuss that in
sect authority delights in.-54-The young lady teachers "showed off" -- bending s
weetly over pupils that were lately being boxed, lifting pretty warning fingers 
at bad little boys and patting good ones lovingly. The young gentlemen teachers 
"showed off" with small scoldings and other little displays of authority and fin
e attention to discipline -- and most of the teachers, of both sexes, found busi
ness up at the library, by the pulpit; and it was business that frequently had t
o be done over again two or three times (with much seeming vexation). The little
 girls "showed off" in various ways, and the little boys "showed off" with such 
diligence that the air was thick with paper wads and the murmur of scufflings. A
nd above it all the great man sat and beamed a majestic judicial smile upon all 
the house, and warmed himself in the sun of his own grandeur -- for he was "show
ing off," too.There was only one thing wanting to make Mr. Walters' ecstasy comp
lete, and that was a chance to deliver a Bible-prize and exhibit a prodigy. Seve
ral pupils had a few yellow tickets, but none had enough -- he had been around a
mong the star pupils inquiring. He would have given worlds, now, to have that Ge
rman lad back again with a sound mind.And now at this moment, when hope was dead
, Tom Sawyer came forward with nine yellow tickets, nine red tickets, and ten bl
ue ones, and demanded a Bible. This was a thunderbolt out of a clear sky. Walter
s was not expecting an application from this source for the next ten years. But 
there was no-55-getting around it -- here were the certified checks, and they we
re good for their face. Tom was therefore elevated to a place with the Judge and
 the other elect, and the great news was announced from head-quarters. It was th
e most stunning surprise of the decade, and so profound was the sensation that i
t lifted the new hero up to the judicial one's altitude, and the school had two 
marvels to gaze upon in place of one. The boys were all eaten up with envy -- bu
t those that suffered the bitterest pangs were those who perceived too late that
 they themselves had contributed to this hated splendor by trading tickets to To
m for the wealth he had amassed in selling whitewashing privileges. These despis
ed themselves, as being the dupes of a wily fraud, a guileful snake in the grass
.The prize was delivered to Tom with as much effusion as the superintendent coul
d pump up under the circumstances; but it lacked somewhat of the true gush, for 
the poor fellow's instinct taught him that there was a mystery here that could n
ot well bear the light, perhaps; it was simply preposterous that this boy had wa
rehoused two thousand sheaves of Scriptural wisdom on his premises -- a dozen wo
uld strain his capacity, without a doubt.Amy Lawrence was proud and glad, and sh
e tried to make Tom see it in her face -- but he wouldn't look. She wondered; th
en she was just a grain troubled; next a dim suspicion came and went -- came aga
in; she watched; a furtive glance told her-56-worlds -- and then her heart broke
, and she was jealous, and angry, and the tears came and she hated everybody. To
m most of all (she thought).Tom was introduced to the Judge; but his tongue was 
tied, his breath would hardly come, his heart quaked -- partly because of the aw
ful greatness of the man, but mainly because he was her parent. He would have li
ked to fall down and worship him, if it were in the dark. The Judge put his hand
 on Tom's head and called him a fine little man, and asked him what his name was
. The boy stammered, gasped, and got it out:"Tom.""Oh, no, not Tom -- it is -- "
"Thomas.""Ah, that's it. I thought there was more to it, maybe. That's very well
. But you've another one I daresay, and you'll tell it to me, won't you?""Tell t
he gentleman your other name, Thomas," said Walters, "and say sir . You mustn't 
forget your manners.""Thomas Sawyer -- sir.""That's it! That's a good boy. Fine 
boy. Fine, manly little fellow. Two thousand verses is a great many -- very, ver
y great many. And you never can be sorry for the trouble you took to learn them;
 for knowledge is worth more than anything there is in the world; it's what make
s great men and good men; you'll-57-be a great man and a good man yourself, some
 day, Thomas, and then you'll look back and say, It's all owing to the precious 
Sunday-school privileges of my boyhood -- it's all owing to my dear teachers tha
t taught me to learn -- it's all owing to the good superintendent, who encourage
d me, and watched over me, and gave me a beautiful Bible -- a splendid elegant B
ible -- to keep and have it all for my own, always -- it's all owing to right br
inging up! That is what you will say, Thomas -- and you wouldn't take any money 
for those two thousand verses -- no indeed you wouldn't. And now you wouldn't mi
nd telling me and this lady some of the things you've learned -- no, I know you 
wouldn't -- for we are proud of little boys that learn. Now, no doubt you know t
he names of all the twelve disciples. Won't you tell us the names of the first t
wo that were appointed?"Tom was tugging at a button-hole and looking sheepish. H
e blushed, now, and his eyes fell. Mr. Walters' heart sank within him. He said t
o himself, it is not possible that the boy can answer the simplest question -- w
hy did the Judge ask him? Yet he felt obliged to speak up and say:"Answer the ge
ntleman, Thomas -- don't be afraid."Tom still hung fire."Now I know you'll tell 
me," said the lady. "The names of the first two disciples were -- ""DAVID AND GO
LIAH!"Let us draw the curtain of charity over the rest of the scene.-58-Chapter 
VABOUT half-past ten the cracked bell of the small church began to ring, and pre
sently the people began to gather for the morning sermon. The Sunday-school chil
dren distributed themselves about the house and occupied pews with their parents
, so as to be under supervision. Aunt Polly came, and Tom and Sid and Mary sat w
ith her -- Tom being placed next the aisle, in order that he might be as far awa
y from the open window and the seductive outside summer scenes as possible. The 
crowd filed up the aisles: the aged and needy postmaster, who had seen better da
ys; the mayor and his wife -- for they had a mayor there, among other unnecessar
ies; the justice of the peace; the widow Douglass, fair, smart, and forty, a gen
erous, good-hearted soul and well-to-do, her hill mansion the only palace in the
 town, and the most hospitable and much the most lavish in the matter of festivi
ties that St. Petersburg could boast; the bent and venerable Major and Mrs. Ward
; lawyer Riverson, the new notable from a distance; next the belle of the villag
e, followed by a troop of lawn-clad and ribbon-decked young heart-breakers; then
 all the young clerks in town in a-59-body -- for they had stood in the vestibul
e sucking their cane-heads, a circling wall of oiled and simpering admirers, til
l the last girl had run their gantlet; and last of all came the Model Boy, Willi
e Mufferson, taking as heedful care of his mother as if she were cut glass. He a
lways brought his mother to church, and was the pride of all the matrons. The bo
ys all hated him, he was so good. And besides, he had been "thrown up to them" s
o much. His white handkerchief was hanging out of his pocket behind, as usual on
 Sundays -- accidentally. Tom had no handkerchief, and he looked upon boys who h
ad as snobs.The congregation being fully assembled, now, the bell rang once more
, to warn laggards and stragglers, and then a solemn hush fell upon the church w
hich was only broken by the tittering and whispering of the choir in the gallery
. The choir always tittered and whispered all through service. There was once a 
church choir that was not ill-bred, but I have forgotten where it was, now. It w
as a great many years ago, and I can scarcely remember anything about it, but I 
think it was in some foreign country.The minister gave out the hymn, and read it
 through with a relish, in a peculiar style which was much admired in that part 
of the country. His voice began on a medium key and climbed steadily up till it 
reached a certain point, where it bore with strong emphasis upon the topmost wor
d and then plunged down as if from a spring-board:-60-Shall I be car-ri-ed toe t
he skies, on flow'ry beds of ease,Whilst others fight to win the prize, and sail
 thro' bloody seas?He was regarded as a wonderful reader. At church "sociables" 
he was always called upon to read poetry; and when he was through, the ladies wo
uld lift up their hands and let them fall helplessly in their laps, and "wall" t
heir eyes, and shake their heads, as much as to say, "Words cannot express it; i
t is too beautiful, too beautiful for this mortal earth."After the hymn had been
 sung, the Rev. Mr. Sprague turned himself into a bulletin-board, and read off "
notices" of meetings and societies and things till it seemed that the list would
 stretch out to the crack of doom -- a queer custom which is still kept up in Am
erica, even in cities, away here in this age of abundant newspapers. Often, the 
less there is to justify a traditional custom, the harder it is to get rid of it
.And now the minister prayed. A good, generous prayer it was, and went into deta
ils: it pleaded for the church, and the little children of the church; for the o
ther churches of the village; for the village itself; for the county; for the St
ate; for the State officers; for the United States; for the churches of the Unit
ed States; for Congress; for the President; for the officers of the Government; 
for poor sailors, tossed by stormy seas; for the oppressed millions-61-groaning 
under the heel of European monarchies and Oriental despotisms; for such as have 
the light and the good tidings, and yet have not eyes to see nor ears to hear wi
thal; for the heathen in the far islands of the sea; and closed with a supplicat
ion that the words he was about to speak might find grace and favor, and be as s
eed sown in fertile ground, yielding in time a grateful harvest of good. Amen.Th
ere was a rustling of dresses, and the standing congregation sat down. The boy w
hose history this book relates did not enjoy the prayer, he only endured it -- i
f he even did that much. He was restive all through it; he kept tally of the det
ails of the prayer, unconsciously -- for he was not listening, but he knew the g
round of old, and the clergyman's regular route over it -- and when a little tri
fle of new matter was interlarded, his ear detected it and his whole nature rese
nted it; he considered additions unfair, and scoundrelly. In the midst of the pr
ayer a fly had lit on the back of the pew in front of him and tortured his spiri
t by calmly rubbing its hands together, embracing its head with its arms, and po
lishing it so vigorously that it seemed to almost part company with the body, an
d the slender thread of a neck was exposed to view; scraping its wings with its 
hind legs and smoothing them to its body as if they had been coat-tails; going t
hrough its whole toilet as tranquilly as if it knew it was perfectly safe. As in
deed it was; for as sorely as Tom's hands-62-itched to grab for it they did not 
dare -- he believed his soul would be instantly destroyed if he did such a thing
 while the prayer was going on. But with the closing sentence his hand began to 
curve and steal forward; and the instant the "Amen" was out the fly was a prison
er of war. His aunt detected the act and made him let it go.The minister gave ou
t his text and droned along monotonously through an argument that was so prosy t
hat many a head by and by began to nod -- and yet it was an argument that dealt 
in limitless fire and brimstone and thinned the predestined elect down to a comp
any so small as to be hardly worth the saving. Tom counted the pages of the serm
on; after church he always knew how many pages there had been, but he seldom kne
w anything else about the discourse. However, this time he was really interested
 for a little while. The minister made a grand and moving picture of the assembl
ing together of the world's hosts at the millennium when the lion and the lamb s
hould lie down together and a little child should lead them. But the pathos, the
 lesson, the moral of the great spectacle were lost upon the boy; he only though
t of the conspicuousness of the principal character before the on-looking nation
s; his face lit with the thought, and he said to himself that he wished he could
 be that child, if it was a tame lion.Now he lapsed into suffering again, as the
 dry argument was resumed. Presently he bethought-63-him of a treasure he had an
d got it out. It was a large black beetle with formidable jaws -- a "pinchbug," 
he called it. It was in a percussion-cap box. The first thing the beetle did was
 to take him by the finger. A natural fillip followed, the beetle went flounderi
ng into the aisle and lit on its back, and the hurt finger went into the boy's m
outh. The beetle lay there working its helpless legs, unable to turn over. Tom e
yed it, and longed for it; but it was safe out of his reach. Other people uninte
rested in the sermon found relief in the beetle, and they eyed it too. Presently
 a vagrant poodle dog came idling along, sad at heart, lazy with the summer soft
ness and the quiet, weary of captivity, sighing for change. He spied the beetle;
 the drooping tail lifted and wagged. He surveyed the prize; walked around it; s
melt at it from a safe distance; walked around it again; grew bolder, and took a
 closer smell; then lifted his lip and made a gingerly snatch at it, just missin
g it; made another, and another; began to enjoy the diversion; subsided to his s
tomach with the beetle between his paws, and continued his experiments; grew wea
ry at last, and then indifferent and absent-minded. His head nodded, and little 
by little his chin descended and touched the enemy, who seized it. There was a s
harp yelp, a flirt of the poodle's head, and the beetle fell a couple of yards a
way, and lit on its back once more. The neighboring spectators shook with a gent
le inward joy, several faces went behind-64-fans and handkerchiefs, and Tomwas e
ntirely happy. The dog looked foolish, and probably felt so; but there was resen
tment in his heart, too, and a craving for revenge. So he went to the beetle and
 began a wary attack on it again; jumping at it from every point of a circle, li
ghting with his fore-paws within an inch of the creature, making even closer sna
tches at it with his teeth, and jerking his head till his ears flapped again. Bu
t he grew tired once more, after a while; tried to amuse himself with a fly but 
found no relief; followed an ant around, with his nose close to the floor, and q
uickly wearied of that; yawned, sighed, forgot the beetle entirely, and sat down
 on it. Then there was a wild yelp of agony and the poodle went sailing up the a
isle; the yelps continued, and so did the dog; he crossed the house in front of 
the altar; he flew down the other aisle; he crossed before the doors; he clamore
d up the home-stretch; his anguish grew with his progress, till presently he was
 but a woolly comet moving in its orbit with the gleam and the speed of light. A
t last the frantic sufferer sheered from its course, and sprang into its master'
s lap; he flung it out of the window, and the voice of distress quickly thinned 
away and died in the distance.By this time the whole church was red-faced and su
ffocating with suppressed laughter, and the sermon had come to a dead standstill
. The discourse was resumed presently, but it went lame and halting, all possibi
lity of impressiveness being at an end; for even-65-the gravest sentiments were 
constantly being received with a smothered burst of unholy mirth, under cover of
 some remote pew-back, as if the poor parson had said a rarely facetious thing. 
It was a genuine relief to the whole congregation when the ordeal was over and t
he benediction pronounced.Tom Sawyer went home quite cheerful, thinking to himse
lf that there was some satisfaction about divine service when there was a bit of
 variety in it. He had but one marring thought; he was willing that the dog shou
ld play with his pinchbug, but he did not think it was upright in him to carry i
t off.-66-Chapter VIMONDAY morning found Tom Sawyer miserable. Monday morning al
ways found him so -- because it began another week's slow suffering in school. H
e generally began that day with wishing he had had no intervening holiday, it ma
de the going into captivity and fetters again so much more odious.Tom lay thinki
ng. Presently it occurred to him that he wished he was sick; then he could stay 
home from school. Here was a vague possibility. He canvassed his system. No ailm
ent was found, and he investigated again. This time he thought he could detect c
olicky symptoms, and he began to encourage them with considerable hope. But they
 soon grew feeble, and presently died wholly away. He reflected further. Suddenl
y he discovered something. One of his upper front teeth was loose. This was luck
y; he was about to begin to groan, as a "starter," as he called it, when it occu
rred to him that if he came into court with that argument, his aunt would pull i
t out, and that would hurt. So he thought he would hold the tooth in reserve for
 the present, and seek further. Nothing offered for some little time, and then h
e remembered hearing the-67-doctor tell about a certain thing that laid up a pat
ient for two or three weeks and threatened to make him lose a finger. So the boy
 eagerly drew his sore toe from under the sheet and held it up for inspection. B
ut now he did not know the necessary symptoms. However, it seemed well worth whi
le to chance it, so he fell to groaning with considerable spirit.But Sid slept o
n unconscious.Tom groaned louder, and fancied that he began to feel pain in the 
toe.No result from Sid.Tom was panting with his exertions by this time. He took 
a rest and then swelled himself up and fetched a succession of admirable groans.
Sid snored on.Tom was aggravated. He said, "Sid, Sid!" and shook him. This cours
e worked well, and Tom began to groan again. Sid yawned, stretched, then brought
 himself up on his elbow with a snort, and began to stare at Tom. Tom went on gr
oaning. Sid said:"Tom! Say, Tom!" [No response.] "Here, Tom! Tom! What is the ma
tter, Tom?" And he shook him and looked in his face anxiously.Tom moaned out:"Oh
, don't, Sid. Don't joggle me.""Why, what's the matter, Tom? I must call auntie.
""No -- never mind. It'll be over by and by, maybe. Don't call anybody."-68-"But
 I must! Don't groan so, Tom, it's awful. How long you been this way?""Hours. Ou
ch! Oh, don't stir so, Sid, you'll kill me.""Tom, why didn't you wake me sooner 
? Oh, Tom, don't ! It makes my flesh crawl to hear you. Tom, what is the matter?
""I forgive you everything, Sid. [Groan.] Everything you've ever done to me. Whe
n I'm gone -- ""Oh, Tom, you ain't dying, are you? Don't, Tom -- oh, don't. Mayb
e -- ""I forgive everybody, Sid. [Groan.] Tell 'em so, Sid. And Sid, you give my
 window-sash and my cat with one eye to that new girl that's come to town, and t
ell her -- "But Sid had snatched his clothes and gone. Tom was suffering in real
ity, now, so handsomely was his imagination working, and so his groans had gathe
red quite a genuine tone.Sid flew down-stairs and said:"Oh, Aunt Polly, come! To
m's dying!""Dying!""Yes'm. Don't wait -- come quick!""Rubbage! I don't believe i
t!"But she fled up-stairs, nevertheless, with Sid and Mary at her heels. And her
 face grew white, too, and her lip trembled. When she reached the bed-side she g
asped out:"You, Tom! Tom, what's the matter with you?"-69-"Oh, auntie, I'm -- ""
What's the matter with you -- what is the matter with you, child?""Oh, auntie, m
y sore toe's mortified!"The old lady sank down into a chair and laughed a little
, then cried a little, then did both together. This restored her and she said:"T
om, what a turn you did give me. Now you shut up that nonsense and climb out of 
this."The groans ceased and the pain vanished from the toe. The boy felt a littl
e foolish, and he said:"Aunt Polly, it seemed mortified, and it hurt so I never 
minded my tooth at all.""Your tooth, indeed! What's the matter with your tooth?"
"One of them's loose, and it aches perfectly awful.""There, there, now, don't be
gin that groaning again. Open your mouth. Well -- your tooth IS loose, but you'r
e not going to die about that. Mary, get me a silk thread, and a chunk of fire o
ut of the kitchen."Tom said:"Oh, please, auntie, don't pull it out. It don't hur
t any more. I wish I may never stir if it does. Please don't, auntie. I don't wa
nt to stay home from school.""Oh, you don't, don't you? So all this row was beca
use you thought you'd get to stay home from school and go a-fishing? Tom, Tom, I
 love you-70-so, and you seem to try every way you can to break my old heart wit
h your outrageousness." By this time the dental instruments were ready. The old 
lady made one end of the silk thread fast to Tom's tooth with a loop and tied th
e other to the bedpost. Then she seized the chunk of fire and suddenly thrust it
 almost into the boy's face. The tooth hung dangling by the bedpost, now.But all
 trials bring their compensations. As Tom wended to school after breakfast, he w
as the envy of every boy he met because the gap in his upper row of teeth enable
d him to expectorate in a new and admirable way. He gathered quite a following o
f lads interested in the exhibition; and one that had cut his finger and had bee
n a centre of fascination and homage up to this time, now found himself suddenly
 without an adherent, and shorn of his glory. His heart was heavy, and he said w
ith a disdain which he did not feel that it wasn't anything to spit like Tom Saw
yer; but another boy said, "Sour grapes!" and he wandered away a dismantled hero
.Shortly Tom came upon the juvenile pariah of the village, Huckleberry Finn, son
 of the town drunkard. Huckleberry was cordially hated and dreaded by all the mo
thers of the town, because he was idle and lawless and vulgar and bad -- and bec
ause all their children admired him so, and delighted in his forbidden society, 
and wished they dared to be like him. Tom was like the rest of the respectable b
oys, in that he envied Huckleberry his-71-gaudy outcast condition, and was under
 strict orders not to play with him. So he played with him every time he got a c
hance. Huckleberry was always dressed in the cast-off clothes of full-grown men,
 and they were in perennial bloom and fluttering with rags. His hat was a vast r
uin with a wide crescent lopped out of its brim; his coat, when he wore one, hun
g nearly to his heels and had the rearward buttons far down the back; but one su
spender supported his trousers; the seat of the trousers bagged low and containe
d nothing, the fringed legs dragged in the dirt when not rolled up.Huckleberry c
ame and went, at his own free will. He slept on doorsteps in fine weather and in
 empty hogsheads in wet; he did not have to go to school or to church, or call a
ny being master or obey anybody; he could go fishing or swimming when and where 
he chose, and stay as long as it suited him; nobody forbade him to fight; he cou
ld sit up as late as he pleased; he was always the first boy that went barefoot 
in the spring and the last to resume leather in the fall; he never had to wash, 
nor put on clean clothes; he could swear wonderfully. In a word, everything that
 goes to make life precious that boy had. So thought every harassed, hampered, r
espectable boy in St. Petersburg.Tom hailed the romantic outcast:"Hello, Huckleb
erry!""Hello yourself, and see how you like it.""What's that you got?"-72-"Dead 
cat.""Lemme see him, Huck. My, he's pretty stiff. Where'd you get him ?""Bought 
him off'n a boy.""What did you give?""I give a blue ticket and a bladder that I 
got at the slaughter-house.""Where'd you get the blue ticket?""Bought it off'n B
en Rogers two weeks ago for a hoop-stick.""Say -- what is dead cats good for, Hu
ck?""Good for? Cure warts with.""No! Is that so? I know something that's better.
""I bet you don't. What is it?""Why, spunk-water.""Spunk-water! I wouldn't give 
a dern for spunk-water.""You wouldn't, wouldn't you? D'you ever try it?""No, I h
ain't. But Bob Tanner did.""Who told you so!""Why, he told Jeff Thatcher, and Je
ff told Johnny Baker, and Johnny told Jim Hollis, and Jim told Ben Rogers, and B
en told a nigger, and the nigger told me. There now!""Well, what of it? They'll 
all lie. Leastways all but the nigger. I don't know him . But I never see a nigg
er that wouldn't lie. Shucks! Now you tell me how Bob Tanner done it, Huck."-73-
"Why, he took and dipped his hand in a rotten stump where the rain-water was.""I
n the daytime?""Certainly.""With his face to the stump?""Yes. Least I reckon so.
""Did he say anything?""I don't reckon he did. I don't know.""Aha! Talk about tr
ying to cure warts with spunk-water such a blame fool way as that! Why, that ain
't a-going to do any good. You got to go all by yourself, to the middle of the w
oods, where you know there's a spunk-water stump, and just as it's midnight you 
back up against the stump and jam your hand in and say:'Barley-corn, barley-corn
, injun-meal shorts,Spunk-water, spunk-water, swaller these warts,'and then walk
 away quick, eleven steps, with your eyes shut, and then turn around three times
 and walk home without speaking to anybody. Because if you speak the charm's bus
ted.""Well, that sounds like a good way; but that ain't the way Bob Tanner done.
""No, sir, you can bet he didn't, becuz he's the wartiest boy in this town; and 
he wouldn't have a wart on him if he'd knowed how to work spunk-water. I've took
 off thousands of warts off of my hands that way, Huck. I play with frogs so muc
h that I've always got considerable many warts. Sometimes I take 'em off with a 
bean."-74-"Yes, bean's good. I've done that.""Have you? What's your way?""You ta
ke and split the bean, and cut the wart so as to get some blood, and then you pu
t the blood on one piece of the bean and take and dig a hole and bury it 'bout m
idnight at the crossroads in the dark of the moon, and then you burn up the rest
 of the bean. You see that piece that's got the blood on it will keep drawing an
d drawing, trying to fetch the other piece to it, and so that helps the blood to
 draw the wart, and pretty soon off she comes.""Yes, that's it, Huck -- that's i
t; though when you're burying it if you say 'Down bean; off wart; come no more t
o bother me!' it's better. That's the way Joe Harper does, and he's been nearly 
to Coonville and most everywheres. But say -- how do you cure 'em with dead cats
?""Why, you take your cat and go and get in the graveyard 'long about midnight w
hen somebody that was wicked has been buried; and when it's midnight a devil wil
l come, or maybe two or three, but you can't see 'em, you can only hear somethin
g like the wind, or maybe hear 'em talk; and when they're taking that feller awa
y, you heave your cat after 'em and say, 'Devil follow corpse, cat follow devil,
 warts follow cat, I'm done with ye!' That'll fetch ANY wart.""Sounds right. D'y
ou ever try it, Huck?""No, but old Mother Hopkins told me."-75-"Well, I reckon i
t's so, then. Becuz they say she's a witch.""Say! Why, Tom, I know she is. She w
itched pap. Pap says so his own self. He come along one day, and he see she was 
a-witching him, so he took up a rock, and if she hadn't dodged, he'd a got her. 
Well, that very night he rolled off'n a shed wher' he was a layin drunk, and bro
ke his arm.""Why, that's awful. How did he know she was a-witching him?""Lord, p
ap can tell, easy. Pap says when they keep looking at you right stiddy, they're 
a-witching you. Specially if they mumble. Becuz when they mumble they're saying 
the Lord's Prayer backards.""Say, Hucky, when you going to try the cat?""To-nigh
t. I reckon they'll come after old Hoss Williams to-night.""But they buried him 
Saturday. Didn't they get him Saturday night?""Why, how you talk! How could thei
r charms work till midnight? -- and then it's Sunday. Devils don't slosh around 
much of a Sunday, I don't reckon.""I never thought of that. That's so. Lemme go 
with you?""Of course -- if you ain't afeard.""Afeard! 'Tain't likely. Will you m
eow?""Yes -- and you meow back, if you get a chance. Last time, you kep' me a-me
owing around till old-76-Hays went to throwing rocks at me and says 'Dern that c
at!' and so I hove a brick through his window -- but don't you tell.""I won't. I
 couldn't meow that night, becuz auntie was watching me, but I'll meow this time
. Say -- what's that?""Nothing but a tick.""Where'd you get him?""Out in the woo
ds.""What'll you take for him?""I don't know. I don't want to sell him.""All rig
ht. It's a mighty small tick, anyway.""Oh, anybody can run a tick down that don'
t belong to them. I'm satisfied with it. It's a good enough tick for me.""Sho, t
here's ticks a plenty. I could have a thousand of 'em if I wanted to.""Well, why
 don't you? Becuz you know mighty well you can't. This is a pretty early tick, I
 reckon. It's the first one I've seen this year.""Say, Huck -- I'll give you my 
tooth for him.""Less see it."Tom got out a bit of paper and carefully unrolled i
t. Huckleberry viewed it wistfully. The temptation was very strong. At last he s
aid:"Is it genuwyne?"Tom lifted his lip and showed the vacancy."Well, all right,
" said Huckleberry, "it's a trade."Tom enclosed the tick in the percussion-cap b
ox-77-that had lately been the pinchbug's prison, and the boys separated, each f
eeling wealthier than before.When Tom reached the little isolated frame school-h
ouse, he strode in briskly, with the manner of one who had come with all honest 
speed. He hung his hat on a peg and flung himself into his seat with business-li
ke alacrity. The master, throned on high in his great splint-bottom arm-chair, w
as dozing, lulled by the drowsy hum of study. The interruption roused him."Thoma
s Sawyer!"Tom knew that when his name was pronounced in full, it meant trouble."
Sir!""Come up here. Now, sir, why are you late again, as usual?"Tom was about to
 take refuge in a lie, when he saw two long tails of yellow hair hanging down a 
back that he recognized by the electric sympathy of love; and by that form was t
he only vacant place on the girls' side of the school-house. He instantly said:"
I STOPPED TO TALK WITH HUCKLEBERRY FINN!"The master's pulse stood still, and he 
stared helplessly. The buzz of study ceased. The pupils wondered if this foolhar
dy boy had lost his mind. The master said:"You -- you did what?""Stopped to talk
 with Huckleberry Finn."-78-There was no mistaking the words."Thomas Sawyer, thi
s is the most astounding confession I have ever listened to. No mere ferule will
 answer for this offence. Take off your jacket."The master's arm performed until
 it was tired and the stock of switches notably diminished. Then the order follo
wed:"Now, sir, go and sit with the girls! And let this be a warning to you."The 
titter that rippled around the room appeared to abash the boy, but in reality th
at result was caused rather more by his worshipful awe of his unknown idol and t
he dread pleasure that lay in his high good fortune. He sat down upon the end of
 the pine bench and the girl hitched herself away from him with a toss of her he
ad. Nudges and winks and whispers traversed the room, but Tom sat still, with hi
s arms upon the long, low desk before him, and seemed to study his book.By and b
y attention ceased from him, and the accustomed school murmur rose upon the dull
 air once more. Presently the boy began to steal furtive glances at the girl. Sh
e observed it, "made a mouth" at him and gave him the back of her head for the s
pace of a minute. When she cautiously faced around again, a peach lay before her
. She thrust it away. Tom gently put it back. She thrust it away again, but with
 less animosity. Tom patiently returned it to its place. Then she let it remain.
 Tom scrawled on his slate, "Please take-79-it -- I got more." The girl glanced 
at the words, but made no sign. Now the boy began to draw something on the slate
, hiding his work with his left hand. For a time the girl refused to notice; but
 her human curiosity presently began to manifest itself by hardly perceptible si
gns. The boy worked on, apparently unconscious. The girl made a sort of non-comm
ittal attempt to see, but the boy did not betray that he was aware of it. At las
t she gave in and hesitatingly whispered:"Let me see it."Tom partly uncovered a 
dismal caricature of a house with two gable ends to it and a corkscrew of smoke 
issuing from the chimney. Then the girl's interest began to fasten itself upon t
he work and she forgot everything else. When it was finished, she gazed a moment
, then whispered:"It's nice -- make a man."The artist erected a man in the front
 yard, that resembled a derrick. He could have stepped over the house; but the g
irl was not hypercritical; she was satisfied with the monster, and whispered:"It
's a beautiful man -- now make me coming along."Tom drew an hour-glass with a fu
ll moon and straw limbs to it and armed the spreading fingers with a portentous 
fan. The girl said:"It's ever so nice -- I wish I could draw.""It's easy," whisp
ered Tom, "I'll learn you.""Oh, will you? When"-80-"At noon. Do you go home to d
inner?""I'll stay if you will.""Good -- that's a whack. What's your name?""Becky
 Thatcher. What's yours? Oh, I know. It's Thomas Sawyer.""That's the name they l
ick me by. I'm Tom when I'm good. You call me Tom, will you?""Yes."Now Tom began
 to scrawl something on the slate, hiding the words from the girl. But she was n
ot backward this time. She begged to see. Tom said:"Oh, it ain't anything.""Yes 
it is.""No it ain't. You don't want to see.""Yes I do, indeed I do. Please let m
e.""You'll tell.""No I won't -- deed and deed and double deed won't.""You won't 
tell anybody at all? Ever, as long as you live?""No, I won't ever tell anybody. 
Now let me.""Oh, you don't want to see!""Now that you treat me so, I will see." 
And she put her small hand upon his and a little scuffle ensued, Tom pretending 
to resist in earnest but letting his hand slip by degrees till these words were 
revealed: "I LOVE YOU.""Oh, you bad thing!" And she hit his hand a smart rap, bu
t reddened and looked pleased, nevertheless.-81-Just at this juncture the boy fe
lt a slow, fateful grip closing on his ear, and a steady lifting impulse. In tha
t vise he was borne across the house and deposited in his own seat, under a pepp
ering fire of giggles from the whole school. Then the master stood over him duri
ng a few awful moments, and finally moved away to his throne without saying a wo
rd. But although Tom's ear tingled, his heart was jubilant.As the school quieted
 down Tom made an honest effort to study, but the turmoil within him was too gre
at. In turn he took his place in the reading class and made a botch of it; then 
in the geography class and turned lakes into mountains, mountains into rivers, a
nd rivers into continents, till chaos was come again; then in the spelling class
, and got "turned down," by a succession of mere baby words, till he brought up 
at the foot and yielded up the pewter medal which he had worn with ostentation f
or months.-82-Chapter VIITHE harder Tom tried to fasten his mind on his book, th
e more his ideas wandered. So at last, with a sigh and a yawn, he gave it up. It
 seemed to him that the noon recess would never come. The air was utterly dead. 
There was not a breath stirring. It was the sleepiest of sleepy days. The drowsi
ng murmur of the five and twenty studying scholars soothed the soul like the spe
ll that is in the murmur of bees. Away off in the flaming sunshine, Cardiff Hill
 lifted its soft green sides through a shimmering veil of heat, tinted with the 
purple of distance; a few birds floated on lazy wing high in the air; no other l
iving thing was visible but some cows, and they were asleep. Tom's heart ached t
o be free, or else to have something of interest to do to pass the dreary time. 
His hand wandered into his pocket and his face lit up with a glow of gratitude t
hat was prayer, though he did not know it. Then furtively the percussion-cap box
 came out. He released the tick and put him on the long flat desk. The creature 
probably glowed with a gratitude that amounted to prayer, too, at this moment, b
ut it was premature: for when he started-83-thankfully to travel off, Tom turned
 him aside with a pin and made him take a new direction.Tom's bosom friend sat n
ext him, suffering just as Tom had been, and now he was deeply and gratefully in
terested in this entertainment in an instant. This bosom friend was Joe Harper. 
The two boys were sworn friends all the week, and embattled enemies on Saturdays
. Joe took a pin out of his lapel and began to assist in exercising the prisoner
. The sport grew in interest momently. Soon Tom said that they were interfering 
with each other, and neither getting the fullest benefit of the tick. So he put 
Joe's slate on the desk and drew a line down the middle of it from top to bottom
."Now," said he, "as long as he is on your side you can stir him up and I'll let
 him alone; but if you let him get away and get on my side, you're to leave him 
alone as long as I can keep him from crossing over.""All right, go ahead; start 
him up."The tick escaped from Tom, presently, and crossed the equator. Joe haras
sed him awhile, and then he got away and crossed back again. This change of base
 occurred often. While one boy was worrying the tick with absorbing interest, th
e other would look on with interest as strong, the two heads bowed together over
 the slate, and the two souls dead to all things else. At last luck seemed to se
ttle and abide with Joe. The tick tried this, that, and the other course, and go
t as excited and as-84-anxious as the boys themselves, but time and again just a
s he would have victory in his very grasp, so to speak, and Tom's fingers would 
be twitching to begin, Joe's pin would deftly head him off, and keep possession.
 At last Tom could stand it no longer. The temptation was too strong. So he reac
hed out and lent a hand with his pin. Joe was angry in a moment. Said he:"Tom, y
ou let him alone.""I only just want to stir him up a little, Joe.""No, sir, it a
in't fair; you just let him alone.""Blame it, I ain't going to stir him much.""L
et him alone, I tell you.""I won't!""You shall -- he's on my side of the line.""
Look here, Joe Harper, whose is that tick?"" I don't care whose tick he is -- he
's on my side of the line, and you sha'n't touch him.""Well, I'll just bet I wil
l, though. He's my tick and I'll do what I blame please with him, or die!"A trem
endous whack came down on Tom's shoulders, and its duplicate on Joe's; and for t
he space of two minutes the dust continued to fly from the two jackets and the w
hole school to enjoy it. The boys had been too absorbed to notice the hush that 
had stolen upon the school awhile before when the master came tiptoeing down the
 room and stood over them. He had contemplated a good part of the performance be
fore he contributed his bit of variety to it.-85-When school broke up at noon, T
om flew to Becky Thatcher, and whispered in her ear:"Put on your bonnet and let 
on you're going home; and when you get to the corner, give the rest of 'em the s
lip, and turn down through the lane and come back. I'll go the other way and com
e it over 'em the same way."So the one went off with one group of scholars, and 
the other with another. In a little while the two met at the bottom of the lane,
 and when they reached the school they had it all to themselves. Then they sat t
ogether, with a slate before them, and Tom gave Becky the pencil and held her ha
nd in his, guiding it, and so created another surprising house. When the interes
t in art began to wane, the two fell to talking. Tom was swimming in bliss. He s
aid:"Do you love rats?""No! I hate them!""Well, I do, too -- live ones. But I me
an dead ones, to swing round your head with a string.""No, I don't care for rats
 much, anyway. What I like is chewing-gum.""Oh, I should say so! I wish I had so
me now.""Do you? I've got some. I'll let you chew it awhile, but you must give i
t back to me."That was agreeable, so they chewed it turn about, and dangled thei
r legs against the bench in excess of contentment."Was you ever at a circus?" sa
id Tom.-86-"Yes, and my pa's going to take me again some time, if I'm good.""I b
een to the circus three or four times -- lots of times. Church ain't shucks to a
 circus. There's things going on at a circus all the time. I'm going to be a clo
wn in a circus when I grow up.""Oh, are you! That will be nice. They're so lovel
y, all spotted up.""Yes, that's so. And they get slathers of money -- most a dol
lar a day, Ben Rogers says. Say, Becky, was you ever engaged?""What's that?""Why
, engaged to be married.""No.""Would you like to?""I reckon so. I don't know. Wh
at is it like?""Like? Why it ain't like anything. You only just tell a boy you w
on't ever have anybody but him, ever ever ever, and then you kiss and that's all
. Anybody can do it.""Kiss? What do you kiss for?""Why, that, you know, is to --
 well, they always do that.""Everybody?""Why, yes, everybody that's in love with
 each other. Do you remember what I wrote on the slate?""Ye -- yes.""What was it
?"-87-"I-LOVE-YOU""I sha'n't tell you.""Shall I tell you?""Ye -- yes -- but some
 other time.""No, now.""No, not now -- to-morrow.""Oh, no, now. Please, Becky --
 I'll whisper it, I'll whisper it ever so easy."Becky hesitating, Tom took silen
ce for consent, and passed his arm about her waist and whispered the tale ever s
o softly, with his mouth close to her ear. And then he added:"Now you whisper it
 to me -- just the same."She resisted, for a while, and then said:"You turn your
 face away so you can't see, and then I will. But you mustn't ever tell anybody 
-- will you, Tom? Now you won't, will you?""No, indeed, indeed I won't. Now, Bec
ky."He turned his face away. She bent timidly around till her breath stirred his
 curls and whispered, "I -- love -- you!"Then she sprang away and ran around and
 around the desks and benches, with Tom after her, and took refuge in a corner a
t last, with her little white apron to her face. Tom clasped her about her neck 
and pleaded:"Now, Becky, it's all done -- all over but the kiss. Don't you be af
raid of that -- it ain't anything at all. Please, Becky." And he tugged at her a
pron and the hands.By and by she gave up, and let her hands drop;-88-her face, a
ll glowing with the struggle, came up and submitted. Tom kissed the red lips and
 said:"Now it's all done, Becky. And always after this, you know, you ain't ever
 to love anybody but me, and you ain't ever to marry anybody but me, ever never 
and forever. Will you?""No, I'll never love anybody but you, Tom, and I'll never
 marry anybody but you -- and you ain't to ever marry anybody but me, either.""C
ertainly. Of course. That's part of it. And always coming to school or when we'r
e going home, you're to walk with me, when there ain't anybody looking -- and yo
u choose me and I choose you at parties, because that's the way you do when you'
re engaged.""It's so nice. I never heard of it before.""Oh, it's ever so gay! Wh
y, me and Amy Lawrence -- "The big eyes told Tom his blunder and he stopped, con
fused."Oh, Tom! Then I ain't the first you've ever been engaged to!"The child be
gan to cry. Tom said:"Oh, don't cry, Becky, I don't care for her any more.""Yes,
 you do, Tom -- you know you do."Tom tried to put his arm about her neck, but sh
e pushed him away and turned her face to the wall, and went on crying. Tom tried
 again, with soothing words in his mouth, and was repulsed again.-89-Then his pr
ide was up, and he strode away and went outside. He stood about, restless and un
easy, for a while, glancing at the door, every now and then, hoping she would re
pent and come to find him. But she did not. Then he began to feel badly and fear
 that he was in the wrong. It was a hard struggle with him to make new advances,
 now, but he nerved himself to it and entered. She was still standing back there
 in the corner, sobbing, with her face to the wall. Tom's heart smote him. He we
nt to her and stood a moment, not knowing exactly how to proceed. Then he said h
esitatingly:"Becky, I -- I don't care for anybody but you."No reply -- but sobs.
"Becky" -- pleadingly. "Becky, won't you say something?"More sobs.Tom got out hi
s chiefest jewel, a brass knob from the top of an andiron, and passed it around 
her so that she could see it, and said:"Please, Becky, won't you take it?"She st
ruck it to the floor. Then Tom marched out of the house and over the hills and f
ar away, to return to school no more that day. Presently Becky began to suspect.
 She ran to the door; he was not in sight; she flew around to the play-yard; he 
was not there. Then she called:"Tom! Come back, Tom!"She listened intently, but 
there was no answer. She had no companions but silence and loneliness.-90-So she
 sat down to cry again and upbraid herself; and by this time the scholars began 
to gather again, and she had to hide her griefs and still her broken heart and t
ake up the cross of a long, dreary, aching afternoon, with none among the strang
ers about her to exchange sorrows with.-91-Chapter VIIITOM dodged hither and thi
ther through lanes until he was well out of the track of returning scholars, and
 then fell into a moody jog. He crossed a small "branch" two or three times, bec
ause of a prevailing juvenile superstition that to cross water baffled pursuit. 
Half an hour later he was disappearing behind the Douglas mansion on the summit 
of Cardiff Hill, and the school-house was hardly distinguishable away off in the
 valley behind him. He entered a dense wood, picked his pathless way to the cent
re of it, and sat down on a mossy spot under a spreading oak. There was not even
 a zephyr stirring; the dead noonday heat had even stilled the songs of the bird
s; nature lay in a trance that was broken by no sound but the occasional far-off
 hammering of a wood-pecker, and this seemed to render the pervading silence and
 sense of loneliness the more profound. The boy's soul was steeped in melancholy
; his feelings were in happy accord with his surroundings. He sat long with his 
elbows on his knees and his chin in his hands, meditating. It seemed to him that
 life was but a trouble, at best,-92-and he more than half envied Jimmy Hodges, 
so lately released; it must be very peaceful, he thought, to lie and slumber and
 dream forever and ever, with the wind whispering through the trees and caressin
g the grass and the flowers over the grave, and nothing to bother and grieve abo
ut, ever any more. If he only had a clean Sunday-school record he could be willi
ng to go, and be done with it all. Now as to this girl. What had he done? Nothin
g. He had meant the best in the world, and been treated like a dog -- like a ver
y dog. She would be sorry some day -- maybe when it was too late. Ah, if he coul
d only die temporarily!But the elastic heart of youth cannot be compressed into 
one constrained shape long at a time. Tom presently began to drift insensibly ba
ck into the concerns of this life again. What if he turned his back, now, and di
sappeared mysteriously? What if he went away -- ever so far away, into unknown c
ountries beyond the seas -- and never came back any more! How would she feel the
n! The idea of being a clown recurred to him now, only to fill him with disgust.
 For frivolity and jokes and spotted tights were an offense, when they intruded 
themselves upon a spirit that was exalted into the vague august realm of the rom
antic. No, he would be a soldier, and return after long years, all war-worn and 
illustrious. No -- better still, he would join the Indians, and hunt buffaloes a
nd go on the warpath in the mountain ranges and the trackless great plains of-93
-the Far West, and away in the future come back a great chief, bristling with fe
athers, hideous with paint, and prance into Sunday-school, some drowsy summer mo
rning, with a blood-curdling war-whoop, and sear the eyeballs of all his compani
ons with unappeasable envy. But no, there was something gaudier even than this. 
He would be a pirate! That was it! Now his future lay plain before him, and glow
ing with unimaginable splendor. How his name would fill the world, and make peop
le shudder! How gloriously he would go plowing the dancing seas, in his long, lo
w, black-hulled racer, the Spirit of the Storm, with his grisly flag flying at t
he fore! And at the zenith of his fame, how he would suddenly appear at the old 
village and stalk into church, brown and weather-beaten, in his black velvet dou
blet and trunks, his great jack-boots, his crimson sash, his belt bristling with
 horse-pistols, his crime-rusted cutlass at his side, his slouch hat with waving
 plumes, his black flag unfurled, with the skull and crossbones on it, and hear 
with swelling ecstasy the whisperings, "It's Tom Sawyer the Pirate! -- the Black
 Avenger of the Spanish Main!"Yes, it was settled; his career was determined. He
 would run away from home and enter upon it. He would start the very next mornin
g. Therefore he must now begin to get ready. He would collect his resources toge
ther. He went to a rotten log near at hand and began to dig under one end of it 
with his Barlow knife. He soon struck wood that-94-sounded hollow. He put his ha
nd there and uttered this incantation impressively:"What hasn't come here, come!
 What's here, stay here!"Then he scraped away the dirt, and exposed a pine shing
le. He took it up and disclosed a shapely little treasure-house whose bottom and
 sides were of shingles. In it lay a marble. Tom's astonishment was boundless! H
e scratched his head with a perplexed air, and said:"Well, that beats anything!"
Then he tossed the marble away pettishly, and stood cogitating. The truth was, t
hat a superstition of his had failed, here, which he and all his comrades had al
ways looked upon as infallible. If you buried a marble with certain necessary in
cantations, and left it alone a fortnight, and then opened the place with the in
cantation he had just used, you would find that all the marbles you had ever los
t had gathered themselves together there, meantime, no matter how widely they ha
d been separated. But now, this thing had actually and unquestionably failed. To
m's whole structure of faith was shaken to its foundations. He had many a time h
eard of this thing succeeding but never of its failing before. It did not occur 
to him that he had tried it several times before, himself, but could never find 
the hiding-places afterward. He puzzled over the matter some time, and finally d
ecided that some witch had interfered and broken the charm. He thought he would 
satisfy-95-himself on that point; so he searched around till he found a small sa
ndy spot with a little funnel-shaped depression in it. He laid himself down and 
put his mouth close to this depression and called --"Doodle-bug, doodle-bug, tel
l me what I want to know! Doodle-bug, doodle-bug, tell me what I want to know!"T
he sand began to work, and presently a small black bug appeared for a second and
 then darted under again in a fright."He dasn't tell! So it was a witch that don
e it. I just knowed it."He well knew the futility of trying to contend against w
itches, so he gave up discouraged. But it occurred to him that he might as well 
have the marble he had just thrown away, and therefore he went and made a patien
t search for it. But he could not find it. Now he went back to his treasure-hous
e and carefully placed himself just as he had been standing when he tossed the m
arble away; then he took another marble from his pocket and tossed it in the sam
e way, saying:"Brother, go find your brother!"He watched where it stopped, and w
ent there and looked. But it must have fallen short or gone too far; so he tried
 twice more. The last repetition was successful. The two marbles lay within a fo
ot of each other.Just here the blast of a toy tin trumpet came faintly down the 
green aisles of the forest. Tom-96-flung off his jacket and trousers, turned a s
uspender into a belt, raked away some brush behind the rotten log, disclosing a 
rude bow and arrow, a lath sword and a tin trumpet, and in a moment had seized t
hese things and bounded away, barelegged, with fluttering shirt. He presently ha
lted under a great elm, blew an answering blast, and then began to tiptoe and lo
ok warily out, this way and that. He said cautiously -- to an imaginary company:
"Hold, my merry men! Keep hid till I blow."Now appeared Joe Harper, as airily cl
ad and elaborately armed as Tom. Tom called:"Hold! Who comes here into Sherwood 
Forest without my pass?""Guy of Guisborne wants no man's pass. Who art thou that
 -- that -- ""Dares to hold such language," said Tom, prompting -- for they talk
ed "by the book," from memory."Who art thou that dares to hold such language?""I
, indeed! I am Robin Hood, as thy caitiff carcase soon shall know.""Then art tho
u indeed that famous outlaw? Right gladly will I dispute with thee the passes of
 the merry wood. Have at thee!"They took their lath swords, dumped their other t
raps on the ground, struck a fencing attitude, foot to foot, and began a grave, 
careful combat, "two up and two down." Presently Tom said:"Now, if you've got th
e hang, go it lively!"-97-So they "went it lively," panting and perspiring with 
the work. By and by Tom shouted:"Fall! fall! Why don't you fall?""I sha'n't! Why
 don't you fall yourself? You're getting the worst of it.""Why, that ain't anyth
ing. I can't fall; that ain't the way it is in the book. The book says, 'Then wi
th one back-handed stroke he slew poor Guy of Guisborne.' You're to turn around 
and let me hit you in the back."There was no getting around the authorities, so 
Joe turned, received the whack and fell."Now," said Joe, getting up, "you got to
 let me kill you. That's fair.""Why, I can't do that, it ain't in the book.""Wel
l, it's blamed mean -- that's all.""Well, say, Joe, you can be Friar Tuck or Muc
h the miller's son, and lam me with a quarter-staff; or I'll be the Sheriff of N
ottingham and you be Robin Hood a little while and kill me."This was satisfactor
y, and so these adventures were carried out. Then Tom became Robin Hood again, a
nd was allowed by the treacherous nun to bleed his strength away through his neg
lected wound. And at last Joe, representing a whole tribe of weeping outlaws, dr
agged him sadly forth, gave his bow into his feeble hands, and Tom said, "Where 
this arrow falls, there bury poor Robin Hood under the greenwood tree." Then he 
shot the arrow and fell back and would have died, but he-98-lit on a nettle and 
sprang up too gaily for a corpse.The boys dressed themselves, hid their accoutre
ments, and went off grieving that there were no outlaws any more, and wondering 
what modern civilization could claim to have done to compensate for their loss. 
They said they would rather be outlaws a year in Sherwood Forest than President 
of the United States forever.-99-Chapter IXAT half-past nine, that night, Tom an
d Sid were sent to bed, as usual. They said their prayers, and Sid was soon asle
ep. Tom lay awake and waited, in restless impatience. When it seemed to him that
 it must be nearly daylight, he heard the clock strike ten! This was despair. He
 would have tossed and fidgeted, as his nerves demanded, but he was afraid he mi
ght wake Sid. So he lay still, and stared up into the dark. Everything was disma
lly still. By and by, out of the stillness, little, scarcely preceptible noises 
began to emphasize themselves. The ticking of the clock began to bring itself in
to notice. Old beams began to crack mysteriously. The stairs creaked faintly. Ev
idently spirits were abroad. A measured, muffled snore issued from Aunt Polly's 
chamber. And now the tiresome chirping of a cricket that no human ingenuity coul
d locate, began. Next the ghastly ticking of a death-watch in the wall at the be
d's head made Tom shudder -- it meant that somebody's days were numbered. Then t
he howl of a far-off dog rose on the-100-night air, and was answered by a fainte
r howl from a remoter distance. Tom was in an agony. At last he was satisfied th
at time had ceased and eternity begun; he began to doze, in spite of himself; th
e clock chimed eleven, but he did not hear it. And then there came, mingling wit
h his half-formed dreams, a most melancholy caterwauling. The raising of a neigh
boring window disturbed him. A cry of "Scat! you devil!" and the crash of an emp
ty bottle against the back of his aunt's woodshed brought him wide awake, and a 
single minute later he was dressed and out of the window and creeping along the 
roof of the "ell" on all fours. He "meow'd" with caution once or twice, as he we
nt; then jumped to the roof of the woodshed and thence to the ground. Huckleberr
y Finn was there, with his dead cat. The boys moved off and disappeared in the g
loom. At the end of half an hour they were wading through the tall grass of the 
graveyard.It was a graveyard of the old-fashioned Western kind. It was on a hill
, about a mile and a half from the village. It had a crazy board fence around it
, which leaned inward in places, and outward the rest of the time, but stood upr
ight nowhere. Grass and weeds grew rank over the whole cemetery. All the old gra
ves were sunken in, there was not a tombstone on the place; round-topped, worm-e
aten boards staggered over the graves, leaning for support and finding none. "Sa
cred to the memory of" So--101-and-So had been painted on them once, but it coul
d no longer have been read, on the most of them, now, even if there had been lig
ht.A faint wind moaned through the trees, and Tom feared it might be the spirits
 of the dead, complaining at being disturbed. The boys talked little, and only u
nder their breath, for the time and the place and the pervading solemnity and si
lence oppressed their spirits. They found the sharp new heap they were seeking, 
and ensconced themselves within the protection of three great elms that grew in 
a bunch within a few feet of the grave.Then they waited in silence for what seem
ed a long time. The hooting of a distant owl was all the sound that troubled the
 dead stillness. Tom's reflections grew oppressive. He must force some talk. So 
he said in a whisper:"Hucky, do you believe the dead people like it for us to be
 here?"Huckleberry whispered:"I wisht I knowed. It's awful solemn like, ain't it
?""I bet it is."There was a considerable pause, while the boys canvassed this ma
tter inwardly. Then Tom whispered:"Say, Hucky -- do you reckon Hoss Williams hea
rs us talking?""O' course he does. Least his sperrit does."Tom, after a pause:-1
02-"I wish I'd said Mister Williams. But I never meant any harm. Everybody calls
 him Hoss.""A body can't be too partic'lar how they talk 'bout these-yer dead pe
ople, Tom."This was a damper, and conversation died again.Presently Tom seized h
is comrade's arm and said:"Sh!""What is it, Tom?" And the two clung together wit
h beating hearts."Sh! There 'tis again! Didn't you hear it?""I -- ""There! Now y
ou hear it.""Lord, Tom, they're coming! They're coming, sure. What'll we do?""I 
dono. Think they'll see us?""Oh, Tom, they can see in the dark, same as cats. I 
wisht I hadn't come.""Oh, don't be afeard. I don't believe they'll bother us. We
 ain't doing any harm. If we keep perfectly still, maybe they won't notice us at
 all.""I'll try to, Tom, but, Lord, I'm all of a shiver.""Listen!"The boys bent 
their heads together and scarcely breathed. A muffled sound of voices floated up
 from the far end of the graveyard."Look! See there!" whispered Tom. "What is it
?""It's devil-fire. Oh, Tom, this is awful."Some vague figures approached throug
h the gloom, swinging an old-fashioned tin lantern that freckled-103-the ground 
with innumerable little spangles of light. Presently Huckleberry whispered with 
a shudder:"It's the devils sure enough. Three of 'em! Lordy, Tom, we're goners! 
Can you pray?""I'll try, but don't you be afeard. They ain't going to hurt us. '
Now I lay me down to sleep, I -- '""Sh!""What is it, Huck?""They're humans! One 
of 'em is, anyway. One of 'em's old Muff Potter's voice.""No -- 'tain't so, is i
t?""I bet I know it. Don't you stir nor budge. He ain't sharp enough to notice u
s. Drunk, the same as usual, likely -- blamed old rip!""All right, I'll keep sti
ll. Now they're stuck. Can't find it. Here they come again. Now they're hot. Col
d again. Hot again. Red hot! They're p'inted right, this time. Say, Huck, I know
 another o' them voices; it's Injun Joe.""That's so -- that murderin' half-breed
! I'd druther they was devils a dern sight. What kin they be up to?"The whisper 
died wholly out, now, for the three men had reached the grave and stood within a
 few feet of the boys' hiding-place."Here it is," said the third voice; and the 
owner of it held the lantern up and revealed the face of young Doctor Robinson.P
otter and Injun Joe were carrying a handbarrow-104-with a rope and a couple of s
hovels on it. They cast down their load and began to open the grave. The doctor 
put the lantern at the head of the grave and came and sat down with his back aga
inst one of the elm trees. He was so close the boys could have touched him."Hurr
y, men!" he said, in a low voice; "the moon might come out at any moment."They g
rowled a response and went on digging. For some time there was no noise but the 
grating sound of the spades discharging their freight of mould and gravel. It wa
s very monotonous. Finally a spade struck upon the coffin with a dull woody acce
nt, and within another minute or two the men had hoisted it out on the ground. T
hey pried off the lid with their shovels, got out the body and dumped it rudely 
on the ground. The moon drifted from behind the clouds and exposed the pallid fa
ce. The barrow was got ready and the corpse placed on it, covered with a blanket
, and bound to its place with the rope. Potter took out a large spring-knife and
 cut off the dangling end of the rope and then said:"Now the cussed thing's read
y, Sawbones, and you'll just out with another five, or here she stays.""That's t
he talk!" said Injun Joe."Look here, what does this mean?" said the doctor. "You
 required your pay in advance, and I've paid you.""Yes, and you done more than t
hat," said Injun-105-Joe, approaching the doctor, who was now standing. "Five ye
ars ago you drove me away from your father's kitchen one night, when I come to a
sk for something to eat, and you said I warn't there for any good; and when I sw
ore I'd get even with you if it took a hundred years, your father had me jailed 
for a vagrant. Did you think I'd forget? The Injun blood ain't in me for nothing
. And now I've got you, and you got to settle, you know!"He was threatening the 
doctor, with his fist in his face, by this time. The doctor struck out suddenly 
and stretched the ruffian on the ground. Potter dropped his knife, and exclaimed
:"Here, now, don't you hit my pard!" and the next moment he had grappled with th
e doctor and the two were struggling with might and main, trampling the grass an
d tearing the ground with their heels. Injun Joe sprang to his feet, his eyes fl
aming with passion, snatched up Potter's knife, and went creeping, catlike and s
tooping, round and round about the combatants, seeking an opportunity. All at on
ce the doctor flung himself free, seized the heavy headboard of Williams' grave 
and felled Potter to the earth with it -- and in the same instant the half-breed
 saw his chance and drove the knife to the hilt in the young man's breast. He re
eled and fell partly upon Potter, flooding him with his blood, and in the same m
oment the clouds blotted out the dreadful spectacle and the two frightened boys 
went speeding away in the dark.-106-Presently, when the moon emerged again, Inju
n Joe was standing over the two forms, contemplating them. The doctor murmured i
narticulately, gave a long gasp or two and was still. The half-breed muttered:"T
hat score is settled -- damn you."Then he robbed the body. After which he put th
e fatal knife in Potter's open right hand, and sat down on the dismantled coffin
. Three -- four -- five minutes passed, and then Potter began to stir and moan. 
His hand closed upon the knife; he raised it, glanced at it, and let it fall, wi
th a shudder. Then he sat up, pushing the body from him, and gazed at it, and th
en around him, confusedly. His eyes met Joe's."Lord, how is this, Joe?" he said.
"It's a dirty business," said Joe, without moving."What did you do it for?""I! I
 never done it!""Look here! That kind of talk won't wash."Potter trembled and gr
ew white."I thought I'd got sober. I'd no business to drink to-night. But it's i
n my head yet -- worse'n when we started here. I'm all in a muddle; can't recoll
ect anything of it, hardly. Tell me, Joe -- honest, now, old feller -- did I do 
it? Joe, I never meant to -- 'pon my soul and honor, I never meant to, Joe. Tell
 me how it was, Joe. Oh, it's awful -- and him so young and promising.""Why, you
 two was scuffling, and he fetched you-107-one with the headboard and you fell f
lat; and then up you come, all reeling and staggering like, and snatched the kni
fe and jammed it into him, just as he fetched you another awful clip -- and here
 you've laid, as dead as a wedge til now.""Oh, I didn't know what I was a-doing.
 I wish I may die this minute if I did. It was all on account of the whiskey and
 the excitement, I reckon. I never used a weepon in my life before, Joe. I've fo
ught, but never with weepons. They'll all say that. Joe, don't tell! Say you won
't tell, Joe -- that's a good feller. I always liked you, Joe, and stood up for 
you, too. Don't you remember? You won't tell, will you, Joe?" And the poor creat
ure dropped on his knees before the stolid murderer, and clasped his appealing h
ands."No, you've always been fair and square with me, Muff Potter, and I won't g
o back on you. There, now, that's as fair as a man can say.""Oh, Joe, you're an 
angel. I'll bless you for this the longest day I live." And Potter began to cry.
"Come, now, that's enough of that. This ain't any time for blubbering. You be of
f yonder way and I'll go this. Move, now, and don't leave any tracks behind you.
"Potter started on a trot that quickly increased to a run. The half-breed stood 
looking after him. He muttered:"If he's as much stunned with the lick and fuddle
d with the rum as he had the look of being, he-108-won't think of the knife till
 he's gone so far he'll be afraid to come back after it to such a place by himse
lf -- chicken-heart!"Two or three minutes later the murdered man, the blanketed 
corpse, the lidless coffin, and the open grave were under no inspection but the 
moon's. The stillness was complete again, too.-109-Chapter XTHE two boys flew on
 and on, toward the village, speechless with horror. They glanced backward over 
their shoulders from time to time, apprehensively, as if they feared they might 
be followed. Every stump that started up in their path seemed a man and an enemy
, and made them catch their breath; and as they sped by some outlying cottages t
hat lay near the village, the barking of the aroused watch-dogs seemed to give w
ings to their feet."If we can only get to the old tannery before we break down!"
 whispered Tom, in short catches between breaths. "I can't stand it much longer.
"Huckleberry's hard pantings were his only reply, and the boys fixed their eyes 
on the goal of their hopes and bent to their work to win it. They gained steadil
y on it, and at last, breast to breast, they burst through the open door and fel
l grateful and exhausted in the sheltering shadows beyond. By and by their pulse
s slowed down, and Tom whispered:"Huckleberry, what do you reckon'll come of thi
s?""If Doctor Robinson dies, I reckon hanging'll come of it.""Do you though?""Wh
y, I know it, Tom."Tom thought a while, then he said:"Who'll tell? We?""What are
 you talking about? S'pose something happened and Injun Joe didn't hang? Why, he
'd kill us some time or other, just as dead sure as we're a laying here.""That's
 just what I was thinking to myself, Huck.""If anybody tells, let Muff Potter do
 it, if he's fool enough. He's generally drunk enough."Tom said nothing -- went 
on thinking. Presently he whispered:"Huck, Muff Potter don't know it. How can he
 tell?""What's the reason he don't know it?""Because he'd just got that whack wh
en Injun Joe done it. D'you reckon he could see anything? D'you reckon he knowed
 anything?""By hokey, that's so, Tom!""And besides, look-a-here -- maybe that wh
ack done for him!""No, 'taint likely, Tom. He had liquor in him; I could see tha
t; and besides, he always has. Well, when pap's full, you might take and belt hi
m over the head with a church and you couldn't phase him. He says so, his own se
lf. So it's the same with-111-Muff Potter, of course. But if a man was dead sobe
r, I reckon maybe that whack might fetch him; I dono."After another reflective s
ilence, Tom said:"Hucky, you sure you can keep mum?""Tom, we got to keep mum. Yo
u know that. That Injun devil wouldn't make any more of drownding us than a coup
le of cats, if we was to squeak 'bout this and they didn't hang him. Now, look-a
-here, Tom, less take and swear to one another -- that's what we got to do -- sw
ear to keep mum.""I'm agreed. It's the best thing. Would you just hold hands and
 swear that we -- ""Oh no, that wouldn't do for this. That's good enough for lit
tle rubbishy common things -- specially with gals, cuz they go back on you anywa
y, and blab if they get in a huff -- but there orter be writing 'bout a big thin
g like this. And blood."Tom's whole being applauded this idea. It was deep, and 
dark, and awful; the hour, the circumstances, the surroundings, were in keeping 
with it. He picked up a clean pine shingle that lay in the moon-light, took a li
ttle fragment of "red keel" out of his pocket, got the moon on his work, and pai
nfully scrawled these lines, emphasizing each slow down-stroke by clamping his t
ongue between his teeth, and letting up the pressure on the up-strokes. [See nex
t page.]Huckleberry was filled with admiration of Tom's facility in writing, and
 the sublimity of his language.-112-He at once took a pin from his lapel and was
 going to prick his flesh, but Tom said:"Hold on! Don't do that. A pin's brass. 
It might have verdigrease on it.""What's verdigrease?""It's p'ison. That's what 
it is. You just swaller some of it once -- you'll see."So Tom unwound the thread
 from one of his needles, and each boy pricked the ball of his thumb and squeeze
d out a drop of blood. In time, after many squeezes, Tom managed to sign his ini
tials, using-113-the ball of his little finger for a pen. Then he showed Huckleb
erry how to make an H and an F, and the oath was complete. They buried the shing
le close to the wall, with some dismal ceremonies and incantations, and the fett
ers that bound their tongues were considered to be locked and the key thrown awa
y.A figure crept stealthily through a break in the other end of the ruined build
ing, now, but they did not notice it."Tom," whispered Huckleberry, "does this ke
ep us from ever telling -- always?""Of course it does. It don't make any differe
nce what happens, we got to keep mum. We'd drop down dead -- don't you know that
?""Yes, I reckon that's so."They continued to whisper for some little time. Pres
ently a dog set up a long, lugubrious howl just outside -- within ten feet of th
em. The boys clasped each other suddenly, in an agony of fright."Which of us doe
s he mean?" gasped Huckleberry."I dono -- peep through the crack. Quick!""No, yo
u, Tom!""I can't -- I can't do it, Huck!""Please, Tom. There 'tis again!""Oh, lo
rdy, I'm thankful!" whispered Tom. "I know his voice. It's Bull Harbison." *Note
: * If Mr. Harbison had owned a slave named Bull, Tom would have spoken of him a
s "Harbison's Bull," but a son or a dog of that name was "Bull Harbison."-114-"O
h, that's good -- I tell you, Tom, I was most scared to death; I'd a bet anythin
g it was a stray dog."The dog howled again. The boys' hearts sank once more."Oh,
 my! that ain't no Bull Harbison!" whispered Huckleberry. " Do , Tom!"Tom, quaki
ng with fear, yielded, and put his eye to the crack. His whisper was hardly audi
ble when he said:"Oh, Huck, IT'S A STRAY DOG!""Quick, Tom, quick! Who does he me
an?""Huck, he must mean us both -- we're right together.""Oh, Tom, I reckon we'r
e goners. I reckon there ain't no mistake 'bout where I'll go to. I been so wick
ed.""Dad fetch it! This comes of playing hookey and doing everything a feller's 
told not to do. I might a been good, like Sid, if I'd a tried -- but no, I would
n't, of course. But if ever I get off this time, I lay I'll just waller in Sunda
y-schools!" And Tom began to snuffle a little." You bad!" and Huckleberry began 
to snuffle too. "Consound it, Tom Sawyer, you're just old pie, 'longside o' what
 I am. Oh, lordy , lordy, lordy, I wisht I only had half your chance."Tom choked
 off and whispered:"Look, Hucky, look! He's got his BACK to us!"Hucky looked, wi
th joy in his heart.-115-"Well, he has, by jingoes! Did he before?""Yes, he did.
 But I, like a fool, never thought. Oh, this is bully, you know. Now who can he 
mean?"The howling stopped. Tom pricked up his ears."Sh! What's that?" he whisper
ed."Sounds like -- like hogs grunting. No -- it's somebody snoring, Tom.""That i
s it! Where 'bouts is it, Huck?""I bleeve it's down at 'tother end. Sounds so, a
nyway. Pap used to sleep there, sometimes, 'long with the hogs, but laws bless y
ou, he just lifts things when he snores. Besides, I reckon he ain't ever coming 
back to this town any more."The spirit of adventure rose in the boys' souls once
 more."Hucky, do you das't to go if I lead?""I don't like to, much. Tom, s'pose 
it's Injun Joe!"Tom quailed. But presently the temptation rose up strong again a
nd the boys agreed to try, with the understanding that they would take to their 
heels if the snoring stopped. So they went tiptoeing stealthily down, the one be
hind the other. When they had got to within five steps of the snorer, Tom steppe
d on a stick, and it broke with a sharp snap. The man moaned, writhed a little, 
and his face came into the moonlight. It was Muff Potter. The boys' hearts had s
tood still, and their hopes too, when the man moved, but their fears passed away
 now. They-116-tiptoed out, through the broken weather-boarding, and stopped at 
a little distance to exchange a parting word. That long, lugubrious howl rose on
 the night air again! They turned and saw the strange dog standing within a few 
feet of where Potter was lying, and facing Potter, with his nose pointing heaven
ward."Oh, geeminy, it's him!" exclaimed both boys, in a breath."Say, Tom -- they
 say a stray dog come howling around Johnny Miller's house, 'bout midnight, as m
uch as two weeks ago; and a whippoorwill come in and lit on the banisters and su
ng, the very same evening; and there ain't anybody dead there yet.""Well, I know
 that. And suppose there ain't. Didn't Gracie Miller fall in the kitchen fire an
d burn herself terrible the very next Saturday?""Yes, but she ain't dead. And wh
at's more, she's getting better, too.""All right, you wait and see. She's a gone
r, just as dead sure as Muff Potter's a goner. That's what the niggers say, and 
they know all about these kind of things, Huck."Then they separated, cogitating.
 When Tom crept in at his bedroom window the night was almost spent. He undresse
d with excessive caution, and fell asleep congratulating himself that nobody kne
w of his escapade. He was not aware that the gently-snoring Sid was awake, and h
ad been so for an hour.When Tom awoke, Sid was dressed and gone.-117-There was a
 late look in the light, a late sense in the atmosphere. He was startled. Why ha
d he not been called -- persecuted till he was up, as usual? The thought filled 
him with bodings. Within five minutes he was dressed and down-stairs, feeling so
re and drowsy. The family were still at table, but they had finished breakfast. 
There was no voice of rebuke; but there were averted eyes; there was a silence a
nd an air of solemnity that struck a chill to the culprit's heart. He sat down a
nd tried to seem gay, but it was up-hill work; it roused no smile, no response, 
and he lapsed into silence and let his heart sink down to the depths.After break
fast his aunt took him aside, and Tom almost brightened in the hope that he was 
going to be flogged; but it was not so. His aunt wept over him and asked him how
 he could go and break her old heart so; and finally told him to go on, and ruin
 himself and bring her gray hairs with sorrow to the grave, for it was no use fo
r her to try any more. This was worse than a thousand whippings, and Tom's heart
 was sorer now than his body. He cried, he pleaded for forgiveness, promised to 
reform over and over again, and then received his dismissal, feeling that he had
 won but an imperfect forgiveness and established but a feeble confidence.He lef
t the presence too miserable to even feel revengeful toward Sid; and so the latt
er's prompt retreat through the back gate was unnecessary. He moped to school gl
oomy and sad, and took his flogging,-118-along with Joe Harper, for playing hook
ey the day before, with the air of one whose heart was busy with heavier woes an
d wholly dead to trifles. Then he betook himself to his seat, rested his elbows 
on his desk and his jaws in his hands, and stared at the wall with the stony sta
re of suffering that has reached the limit and can no further go. His elbow was 
pressing against some hard substance. After a long time he slowly and sadly chan
ged his position, and took up this object with a sigh. It was in a paper. He unr
olled it. A long, lingering, colossal sigh followed, and his heart broke. It was
 his brass andiron knob!This final feather broke the camel's back.-119-Chapter X
ICLOSE upon the hour of noon the whole village was suddenly electrified with the
 ghastly news. No need of the as yet undreamed-of telegraph; the tale flew from 
man to man, from group to group, from house to house, with little less than tele
graphic speed. Of course the schoolmaster gave holiday for that afternoon; the t
own would have thought strangely of him if he had not.A gory knife had been foun
d close to the murdered man, and it had been recognized by somebody as belonging
 to Muff Potter -- so the story ran. And it was said that a belated citizen had 
come upon Potter washing himself in the "branch" about one or two o'clock in the
 morning, and that Potter had at once sneaked off -- suspicious circumstances, e
specially the washing which was not a habit with Potter. It was also said that t
he town had been ransacked for this "murderer" (the public are not slow in the m
atter of sifting evidence and arriving at a verdict), but that he could not be f
ound. Horsemen had departed down all the roads in every direction, and the Sheri
ff "was confident" that he would be captured before night.-120-All the town was 
drifting toward the graveyard. Tom's heartbreak vanished and he joined the proce
ssion, not because he would not a thousand times rather go anywhere else, but be
cause an awful, unaccountable fascination drew him on. Arrived at the dreadful p
lace, he wormed his small body through the crowd and saw the dismal spectacle. I
t seemed to him an age since he was there before. Somebody pinched his arm. He t
urned, and his eyes met Huckleberry's. Then both looked elsewhere at once, and w
ondered if anybody had noticed anything in their mutual glance. But everybody wa
s talking, and intent upon the grisly spectacle before them."Poor fellow!" "Poor
 young fellow!" "This ought to be a lesson to grave robbers!" "Muff Potter'll ha
ng for this if they catch him!" This was the drift of remark; and the minister s
aid, "It was a judgment; His hand is here."Now Tom shivered from head to heel; f
or his eye fell upon the stolid face of Injun Joe. At this moment the crowd bega
n to sway and struggle, and voices shouted, "It's him! it's him! he's coming him
self!""Who? Who?" from twenty voices."Muff Potter!""Hallo, he's stopped! -- Look
 out, he's turning! Don't let him get away!"People in the branches of the trees 
over Tom's head said he wasn't trying to get away -- he only looked doubtful and
 perplexed.-121-"Infernal impudence!" said a bystander; "wanted to come and take
 a quiet look at his work, I reckon -- didn't expect any company."The crowd fell
 apart, now, and the Sheriff came through, ostentatiously leading Potter by the 
arm. The poor fellow's face was haggard, and his eyes showed the fear that was u
pon him. When he stood before the murdered man, he shook as with a palsy, and he
 put his face in his hands and burst into tears."I didn't do it, friends," he so
bbed; "'pon my word and honor I never done it.""Who's accused you?" shouted a vo
ice.This shot seemed to carry home. Potter lifted his face and looked around him
 with a pathetic hopelessness in his eyes. He saw Injun Joe, and exclaimed:"Oh, 
Injun Joe, you promised me you'd never -- ""Is that your knife?" and it was thru
st before him by the Sheriff.Potter would have fallen if they had not caught him
 and eased him to the ground. Then he said:"Something told me 't if I didn't com
e back and get -- " He shuddered; then waved his nerveless hand with a vanquishe
d gesture and said, "Tell 'em, Joe, tell 'em -- it ain't any use any more."Then 
Huckleberry and Tom stood dumb and staring, and heard the stony-hearted liar ree
l off his serene statement, they expecting every moment that the clear sky would
 deliver God's lightnings upon his head, and wondering to see how long the strok
e-122-was delayed. And when he had finished and still stood alive and whole, the
ir wavering impulse to break their oath and save the poor betrayed prisoner's li
fe faded and vanished away, for plainly this miscreant had sold himself to Satan
 and it would be fatal to meddle with the property of such a power as that."Why 
didn't you leave? What did you want to come here for?" somebody said."I couldn't
 help it -- I couldn't help it," Potter moaned. "I wanted to run away, but I cou
ldn't seem to come anywhere but here." And he fell to sobbing again.Injun Joe re
peated his statement, just as calmly, a few minutes afterward on the inquest, un
der oath; and the boys, seeing that the lightnings were still withheld, were con
firmed in their belief that Joe had sold himself to the devil. He was now become
, to them, the most balefully interesting object they had ever looked upon, and 
they could not take their fascinated eyes from his face.They inwardly resolved t
o watch him nights, when opportunity should offer, in the hope of getting a glim
pse of his dread master.Injun Joe helped to raise the body of the murdered man a
nd put it in a wagon for removal; and it was whispered through the shuddering cr
owd that the wound bled a little! The boys thought that this happy circumstance 
would turn suspicion in the right direction; but they were disappointed, for mor
e than one villager remarked:-123-"It was within three feet of Muff Potter when 
it done it."Tom's fearful secret and gnawing conscience disturbed his sleep for 
as much as a week after this; and at breakfast one morning Sid said:"Tom, you pi
tch around and talk in your sleep so much that you keep me awake half the time."
Tom blanched and dropped his eyes."It's a bad sign," said Aunt Polly, gravely. "
What you got on your mind, Tom?""Nothing. Nothing 't I know of." But the boy's h
and shook so that he spilled his coffee."And you do talk such stuff," Sid said. 
"Last night you said, 'It's blood, it's blood, that's what it is!' You said that
 over and over. And you said, 'Don't torment me so -- I'll tell!' Tell what? Wha
t is it you'll tell?"Everything was swimming before Tom. There is no telling wha
t might have happened, now, but luckily the concern passed out of Aunt Polly's f
ace and she came to Tom's relief without knowing it. She said:"Sho! It's that dr
eadful murder. I dream about it most every night myself. Sometimes I dream it's 
me that done it."Mary said she had been affected much the same way. Sid seemed s
atisfied. Tom got out of the presence as quick as he plausibly could, and after 
that he complained of toothache for a week, and tied up his jaws every night. He
 never knew that Sid lay-124-nightly watching, and frequently slipped the bandag
e free and then leaned on his elbow listening a good while at a time, and afterw
ard slipped the bandage back to its place again. Tom's distress of mind wore off
 gradually and the toothache grew irksome and was discarded. If Sid really manag
ed to make anything out of Tom's disjointed mutterings, he kept it to himself.It
 seemed to Tom that his schoolmates never would get done holding inquests on dea
d cats, and thus keeping his trouble present to his mind. Sid noticed that Tom n
ever was coroner at one of these inquiries, though it had been his habit to take
 the lead in all new enterprises; he noticed, too, that Tom never acted as a wit
ness -- and that was strange; and Sid did not overlook the fact that Tom even sh
owed a marked aversion to these inquests, and always avoided them when he could.
 Sid marvelled, but said nothing. However, even inquests went out of vogue at la
st, and ceased to torture Tom's conscience.Every day or two, during this time of
 sorrow, Tom watched his opportunity and went to the little grated jail-window a
nd smuggled such small comforts through to the "murderer" as he could get hold o
f. The jail was a trifling little brick den that stood in a marsh at the edge of
 the village, and no guards were afforded for it; indeed, it was seldom occupied
. These offerings greatly helped to ease Tom's conscience.The villagers had a st
rong desire to tar-and-feather-125-Injun Joe and ride him on a rail, for body-sn
atching, but so formidable was his character that nobody could be found who was 
willing to take the lead in the matter, so it was dropped. He had been careful t
o begin both of his inquest-statements with the fight, without confessing the gr
ave-robbery that preceded it; therefore it was deemed wisest not to try the case
 in the courts at present.-126-Chapter XIIONE of the reasons why Tom's mind had 
drifted away from its secret troubles was, that it had found a new and weighty m
atter to interest itself about. Becky Thatcher had stopped coming to school. Tom
 had struggled with his pride a few days, and tried to "whistle her down the win
d," but failed. He began to find himself hanging around her father's house, nigh
ts, and feeling very miserable. She was ill. What if she should die! There was d
istraction in the thought. He no longer took an interest in war, nor even in pir
acy. The charm of life was gone; there was nothing but dreariness left. He put h
is hoop away, and his bat; there was no joy in them any more. His aunt was conce
rned. She began to try all manner of remedies on him. She was one of those peopl
e who are infatuated with patent medicines and all new-fangled methods of produc
ing health or mending it. She was an inveterate experimenter in these things. Wh
en something fresh in this line came out she was in a fever, right away, to try 
it; not on herself, for she was never ailing, but on anybody else that came hand
y. She was-127-a subscriber for all the "Health" periodicals and phrenological f
rauds; and the solemn ignorance they were inflated with was breath to her nostri
ls. All the "rot" they contained about ventilation, and how to go to bed, and ho
w to get up, and what to eat, and what to drink, and how much exercise to take, 
and what frame of mind to keep one's self in, and what sort of clothing to wear,
 was all gospel to her, and she never observed that her health-journals of the c
urrent month customarily upset everything they had recommended the month before.
 She was as simple-hearted and honest as the day was long, and so she was an eas
y victim. She gathered together her quack periodicals and her quack medicines, a
nd thus armed with death, went about on her pale horse, metaphorically speaking,
 with "hell following after." But she never suspected that she was not an angel 
of healing and the balm of Gilead in disguise, to the suffering neighbors.The wa
ter treatment was new, now, and Tom's low condition was a windfall to her. She h
ad him out at daylight every morning, stood him up in the wood-shed and drowned 
him with a deluge of cold water; then she scrubbed him down with a towel like a 
file, and so brought him to; then she rolled him up in a wet sheet and put him a
way under blankets till she sweated his soul clean and "the yellow stains of it 
came through his pores" -- as Tom said.Yet notwithstanding all this, the boy gre
w more and more melancholy and pale and dejected. She-128-added hot baths, sitz 
baths, shower baths, and plunges. The boy remained as dismal as a hearse. She be
gan to assist the water with a slim oatmeal diet and blister-plasters. She calcu
lated his capacity as she would a jug's, and filled him up every day with quack 
cure-alls.Tom had become indifferent to persecution by this time. This phase fil
led the old lady's heart with consternation. This indifference must be broken up
 at any cost. Now she heard of Pain-killer for the first time. She ordered a lot
 at once. She tasted it and was filled with gratitude. It was simply fire in a l
iquid form. She dropped the water treatment and everything else, and pinned her 
faith to Pain-killer. She gave Tom a teaspoonful and watched with the deepest an
xiety for the result. Her troubles were instantly at rest, her soul at peace aga
in; for the "indifference" was broken up. The boy could not have shown a wilder,
 heartier interest, if she had built a fire under him.Tom felt that it was time 
to wake up; this sort of life might be romantic enough, in his blighted conditio
n, but it was getting to have too little sentiment and too much distracting vari
ety about it. So he thought over various plans for relief, and finally hit pon t
hat of professing to be fond of Pain-killer. He asked for it so often that he be
came a nuisance, and his aunt ended by telling him to help himself and quit both
ering her. If it had been Sid, she would have had no misgivings to alloy her del
ight;-129-but since it was Tom, she watched the bottle clandestinely. She found 
that the medicine did really diminish, but it did not occur to her that the boy 
was mending the health of a crack in the sitting-room floor with it.One day Tom 
was in the act of dosing the crack when his aunt's yellow cat came along, purrin
g, eying the teaspoon avariciously, and begging for a taste. Tom said:"Don't ask
 for it unless you want it, Peter."But Peter signified that he did want it."You 
better make sure."Peter was sure."Now you've asked for it, and I'll give it to y
ou, because there ain't anything mean about me; but if you find you don't like i
t, you mustn't blame anybody but your own self."Peter was agreeable. So Tom prie
d his mouth open and poured down the Pain-killer. Peter sprang a couple of yards
 in the air, and then delivered a war-whoop and set off round and round the room
, banging against furniture, upsetting flower-pots, and making general havoc. Ne
xt he rose on his hind feet and pranced around, in a frenzy of enjoyment, with h
is head over his shoulder and his voice proclaiming his unappeasable happiness. 
Then he went tearing around the house again spreading chaos and destruction in h
is path. Aunt Polly entered in time to see him throw a few double summersets, de
liver a final mighty hurrah, and sail through the open-130-window, carrying the 
rest of the flower-pots with him. The old lady stood petrified with astonishment
, peering over her glasses; Tom lay on the floor expiring with laughter."Tom, wh
at on earth ails that cat?""I don't know, aunt," gasped the boy."Why, I never se
e anything like it. What did make him act so?""Deed I don't know, Aunt Polly; ca
ts always act so when they're having a good time.""They do, do they?" There was 
something in the tone that made Tom apprehensive."Yes'm. That is, I believe they
 do.""You do?""Yes'm."The old lady was bending down, Tom watching, with interest
 emphasized by anxiety. Too late he divined her "drift." The handle of the tellt
ale teaspoon was visible under the bed-valance. Aunt Polly took it, held it up. 
Tom winced, and dropped his eyes. Aunt Polly raised him by the usual handle -- h
is ear -- and cracked his head soundly with her thimble."Now, sir, what did you 
want to treat that poor dumb beast so, for?""I done it out of pity for him -- be
cause he hadn't any aunt.""Hadn't any aunt! -- you numskull. What has that got t
o do with it?""Heaps. Because if he'd had one she'd a burnt-131-him out herself!
 She'd a roasted his bowels out of him 'thout any more feeling than if he was a 
human!"Aunt Polly felt a sudden pang of remorse. This was putting the thing in a
 new light; what was cruelty to a cat might be cruelty to a boy, too. She began 
to soften; she felt sorry. Her eyes watered a little, and she put her hand on To
m's head and said gently:"I was meaning for the best, Tom. And, Tom, it did do y
ou good."Tom looked up in her face with just a perceptible twinkle peeping throu
gh his gravity."I know you was meaning for the best, aunty, and so was I with Pe
ter. It done him good, too. I never see him get around so since -- ""Oh, go 'lon
g with you, Tom, before you aggravate me again. And you try and see if you can't
 be a good boy, for once, and you needn't take any more medicine."Tom reached sc
hool ahead of time. It was noticed that this strange thing had been occurring ev
ery day latterly. And now, as usual of late, he hung about the gate of the schoo
lyard instead of playing with his comrades. He was sick, he said, and he looked 
it. He tried to seem to be looking everywhere but whither he really was looking 
-- down the road. Presently Jeff Thatcher hove in sight, and Tom's face lighted;
 he gazed a moment, and then turned sorrowfully away. When Jeff arrived, Tom acc
osted him; and "led up" warily to opportunities for remark-132-about Becky, but 
the giddy lad never could see the bait. Tom watched and watched, hoping whenever
 a frisking frock came in sight, and hating the owner of it as soon as he saw sh
e was not the right one. At last frocks ceased to appear, and he dropped hopeles
sly into the dumps; he entered the empty schoolhouse and sat down to suffer. The
n one more frock passed in at the gate, and Tom's heart gave a great bound. The 
next instant he was out, and "going on" like an Indian; yelling, laughing, chasi
ng boys, jumping over the fence at risk of life and limb, throwing handsprings, 
standing on his head -- doing all the heroic things he could conceive of, and ke
eping a furtive eye out, all the while, to see if Becky Thatcher was noticing. B
ut she seemed to be unconscious of it all; she never looked. Could it be possibl
e that she was not aware that he was there? He carried his exploits to her immed
iate vicinity; came war-whooping around, snatched a boy's cap, hurled it to the 
roof of the schoolhouse, broke through a group of boys, tumbling them in every d
irection, and fell sprawling, himself, under Becky's nose, almost upsetting her 
-- and she turned, with her nose in the air, and he heard her say: "Mf! some peo
ple think they're mighty smart -- always showing off!"Tom's cheeks burned. He ga
thered himself up and sneaked off, crushed and crestfallen.-133-Chapter XIIITOM'
S mind was made up now. He was gloomy and desperate. He was a forsaken, friendle
ss boy, he said; nobody loved him; when they found out what they had driven him 
to, perhaps they would be sorry; he had tried to do right and get along, but the
y would not let him; since nothing would do them but to be rid of him, let it be
 so; and let them blame him for the consequences -- why shouldn't they? What rig
ht had the friendless to complain? Yes, they had forced him to it at last: he wo
uld lead a life of crime. There was no choice.By this time he was far down Meado
w Lane, and the bell for school to "take up" tinkled faintly upon his ear. He so
bbed, now, to think he should never, never hear that old familiar sound any more
 -- it was very hard, but it was forced on him; since he was driven out into the
 cold world, he must submit -- but he forgave them. Then the sobs came thick and
 fast.Just at this point he met his soul's sworn comrade, Joe Harper -- hard-eye
d, and with evidently a great and dismal purpose in his heart. Plainly here were
-134-"two souls with but a single thought." Tom, wiping his eyes with his sleeve
, began to blubber out something about a resolution to escape from hard usage an
d lack of sympathy at home by roaming abroad into the great world never to retur
n; and ended by hoping that Joe would not forget him.But it transpired that this
 was a request which Joe had just been going to make of Tom, and had come to hun
t him up for that purpose. His mother had whipped him for drinking some cream wh
ich he had never tasted and knew nothing about; it was plain that she was tired 
of him and wished him to go; if she felt that way, there was nothing for him to 
do but succumb; he hoped she would be happy, and never regret having driven her 
poor boy out into the unfeeling world to suffer and die.As the two boys walked s
orrowing along, they made a new compact to stand by each other and be brothers a
nd never separate till death relieved them of their troubles. Then they began to
 lay their plans. Joe was for being a hermit, and living on crusts in a remote c
ave, and dying, some time, of cold and want and grief; but after listening to To
m, he conceded that there were some conspicuous advantages about a life of crime
, and so he consented to be a pirate.Three miles below St. Petersburg, at a poin
t where the Mississippi River was a trifle over a mile wide, there was a long, n
arrow, wooded island, with a shallow bar at the head of it, and this offered wel
l-135-as a rendezvous. It was not inhabited; it lay far over toward the further 
shore, abreast a dense and almost wholly unpeopled forest. So Jackson's Island w
as chosen. Who were to be the subjects of their piracies was a matter that did n
ot occur to them. Then they hunted up Huckleberry Finn, and he joined them promp
tly, for all careers were one to him; he was indifferent. They presently separat
ed to meet at a lonely spot on the river-bank two miles above the village at the
 favorite hour -- which was midnight. There was a small log raft there which the
y meant to capture. Each would bring hooks and lines, and such provision as he c
ould steal in the most dark and mysterious way -- as became outlaws. And before 
the afternoon was done, they had all managed to enjoy the sweet glory of spreadi
ng the fact that pretty soon the town would "hear something." All who got this v
ague hint were cautioned to "be mum and wait."About midnight Tom arrived with a 
boiled ham and a few trifles, and stopped in a dense undergrowth on a small bluf
f overlooking the meeting-place. It was starlight, and very still. The mighty ri
ver lay like an ocean at rest. Tom listened a moment, but no sound disturbed the
 quiet. Then he gave a low, distinct whistle. It was answered from under the blu
ff. Tom whistled twice more; these signals were answered in the same way. Then a
 guarded voice said:"Who goes there?"-136-"Tom Sawyer, the Black Avenger of the 
Spanish Main. Name your names.""Huck Finn the Red-Handed, and Joe Harper the Ter
ror of the Seas." Tom had furnished these titles, from his favorite literature."
'Tis well. Give the countersign."Two hoarse whispers delivered the same awful wo
rd simultaneously to the brooding night:"BLOOD!"Then Tom tumbled his ham over th
e bluff and let himself down after it, tearing both skin and clothes to some ext
ent in the effort. There was an easy, comfortable path along the shore under the
 bluff, but it lacked the advantages of difficulty and danger so valued by a pir
ate.The Terror of the Seas had brought a side of bacon, and had about worn himse
lf out with getting it there. Finn the Red-Handed had stolen a skillet and a qua
ntity of half-cured leaf tobacco, and had also brought a few corn-cobs to make p
ipes with. But none of the pirates smoked or "chewed" but himself. The Black Ave
nger of the Spanish Main said it would never do to start without some fire. That
 was a wise thought; matches were hardly known there in that day. They saw a fir
e smouldering upon a great raft a hundred yards above, and they went stealthily 
thither and helped themselves to a chunk. They made an imposing adventure of it,
 saying, "Hist!" every now and then, and suddenly halting with finger on lip; mo
ving with hands on-137-imaginary dagger-hilts; and giving orders in dismal whisp
ers that if "the foe" stirred, to "let him have it to the hilt," because "dead m
en tell no tales." They knew well enough that the raftsmen were all down at the 
village laying in stores or having a spree, but still that was no excuse for the
ir conducting this thing in an unpiratical way.They shoved off, presently, Tom i
n command, Huck at the after oar and Joe at the forward. Tom stood amidships, gl
oomy-browed, and with folded arms, and gave his orders in a low, stern whisper:"
Luff, and bring her to the wind!""Aye-aye, sir!""Steady, steady-y-y-y!""Steady i
t is, sir!""Let her go off a point!""Point it is, sir!"As the boys steadily and 
monotonously drove the raft toward mid-stream it was no doubt understood that th
ese orders were given only for "style," and were not intended to mean anything i
n particular."What sail's she carrying?""Courses, tops'ls, and flying-jib, sir."
"Send the r'yals up! Lay out aloft, there, half a dozen of ye -- foretopmaststun
s'l! Lively, now!""Aye-aye, sir!""Shake out that maintogalans'l! Sheets and brac
es! Now my hearties!""Aye-aye, sir!""Hellum-a-lee -- hard a port! Stand by to me
et-138-her when she comes! Port, port! Now, men! With a will! Stead-y-y-y!""Stea
dy it is, sir!"The raft drew beyond the middle of the river; the boys pointed he
r head right, and then lay on their oars. The river was not high, so there was n
ot more than a two or three mile current. Hardly a word was said during the next
 three-quarters of an hour. Now the raft was passing before the distant town. Tw
o or three glimmering lights showed where it lay, peacefully sleeping, beyond th
e vague vast sweep of star-gemmed water, unconscious of the tremendous event tha
t was happening. The Black Avenger stood still with folded arms, "looking his la
st" upon the scene of his former joys and his later sufferings, and wishing "she
" could see him now, abroad on the wild sea, facing peril and death with dauntle
ss heart, going to his doom with a grim smile on his lips. It was but a small st
rain on his imagination to remove Jackson's Island beyond eye-shot of the villag
e, and so he "looked his last" with a broken and satisfied heart. The other pira
tes were looking their last, too; and they all looked so long that they came nea
r letting the current drift them out of the range of the island. But they discov
ered the danger in time, and made shift to avert it. About two o'clock in the mo
rning the raft grounded on the bar two hundred yards above the head of the islan
d, and they waded back and forth until they had landed their freight. Part of th
e little-139-raft's belongings consisted of an old sail, and this they spread ov
er a nook in the bushes for a tent to shelter their provisions; but they themsel
ves would sleep in the open air in good weather, as became outlaws.They built a 
fire against the side of a great log twenty or thirty steps within the sombre de
pths of the forest, and then cooked some bacon in the frying-pan for supper, and
 used up half of the corn "pone" stock they had brought. It seemed glorious spor
t to be feasting in that wild, free way in the virgin forest of an unexplored an
d uninhabited island, far from the haunts of men, and they said they never would
 return to civilization. The climbing fire lit up their faces and threw its rudd
y glare upon the pillared tree-trunks of their forest temple, and upon the varni
shed foliage and festooning vines.When the last crisp slice of bacon was gone, a
nd the last allowance of corn pone devoured, the boys stretched themselves out o
n the grass, filled with contentment. They could have found a cooler place, but 
they would not deny themselves such a romantic feature as the roasting camp-fire
."AIN'T it gay?" said Joe."It's NUTS!" said Tom. "What would the boys say if the
y could see us?""Say? Well, they'd just die to be here -- hey, Hucky!""I reckon 
so," said Huckleberry; "anyways-140-,I'm suited. I don't want nothing better'n t
his. I don't ever get enough to eat, gen'ally -- and here they can't come and pi
ck at a feller and bullyrag him so.""It's just the life for me," said Tom. "You 
don't have to get up, mornings, and you don't have to go to school, and wash, an
d all that blame foolishness. You see a pirate don't have to do anything, Joe, w
hen he's ashore, but a hermit he has to be praying considerable, and then he don
't have any fun, anyway, all by himself that way.""Oh yes, that's so," said Joe,
 "but I hadn't thought much about it, you know. I'd a good deal rather be a pira
te, now that I've tried it.""You see," said Tom, "people don't go much on hermit
s, nowadays, like they used to in old times, but a pirate's always respected. An
d a hermit's got to sleep on the hardest place he can find, and put sackcloth an
d ashes on his head, and stand out in the rain, and -- ""What does he put sackcl
oth and ashes on his head for?" inquired Huck." I dono. But they've got to do it
. Hermits always do. You'd have to do that if you was a hermit.""Dern'd if I wou
ld," said Huck."Well, what would you do?""I dono. But I wouldn't do that.""Why, 
Huck, you'd have to. How'd you get around it?"-141-"Why, I just wouldn't stand i
t. I'd run away.""Run away! Well, you would be a nice old slouch of a hermit. Yo
u'd be a disgrace."The Red-Handed made no response, being better employed. He ha
d finished gouging out a cob, and now he fitted a weed stem to it, loaded it wit
h tobacco, and was pressing a coal to the charge and blowing a cloud of fragrant
 smoke -- he was in the full bloom of luxurious contentment. The other pirates e
nvied him this majestic vice, and secretly resolved to acquire it shortly. Prese
ntly Huck said:"What does pirates have to do?"Tom said:"Oh, they have just a bul
ly time -- take ships and burn them, and get the money and bury it in awful plac
es in their island where there's ghosts and things to watch it, and kill everybo
dy in the ships -- make 'em walk a plank.""And they carry the women to the islan
d," said Joe; "they don't kill the women.""No," assented Tom, "they don't kill t
he women -- they're too noble. And the women's always beautiful, too."And don't 
they wear the bulliest clothes! Oh no! All gold and silver and di'monds," said J
oe, with enthusiasm."Who?" said Huck."Why, the pirates."Huck scanned his own clo
thing forlornly."I reckon I ain't dressed fitten for a pirate," said-142-he, wit
h a regretful pathos in his voice; "but I ain't got none but these."But the othe
r boys told him the fine clothes would come fast enough, after they should have 
begun their adventures. They made him understand that his poor rags would do to 
begin with, though it was customary for wealthy pirates to start with a proper w
ardrobe.Gradually their talk died out and drowsiness began to steal upon the eye
lids of the little waifs. The pipe dropped from the fingers of the Red-Handed, a
nd he slept the sleep of the conscience-free and the weary. The Terror of the Se
as and the Black Avenger of the Spanish Main had more difficulty in getting to s
leep. They said their prayers inwardly, and lying down, since there was nobody t
here with authority to make them kneel and recite aloud; in truth, they had a mi
nd not to say them at all, but they were afraid to proceed to such lengths as th
at, lest they might call down a sudden and special thunderbolt from heaven. Then
 at once they reached and hovered upon the imminent verge of sleep -- but an int
ruder came, now, that would not "down." It was conscience. They began to feel a 
vague fear that they had been doing wrong to run away; and next they thought of 
the stolen meat, and then the real torture came. They tried to argue it away by 
reminding conscience that they had purloined sweetmeats and apples scores of tim
es; but conscience was not to be appeased by such thin-143-plausibilities; it se
emed to them, in the end, that there was no getting around the stubborn fact tha
t taking sweetmeats was only "hooking," while taking bacon and hams and such val
uables was plain simple stealing -- and there was a command against that in the 
Bible. So they inwardly resolved that so long as they remained in the business, 
their piracies should not again be sullied with the crime of stealing. Then cons
cience granted a truce, and these curiously inconsistent pirates fell peacefully
 to sleep.-144-Chapter XIVWHEN Tom awoke in the morning, he wondered where he wa
s. He sat up and rubbed his eyes and looked around. Then he comprehended. It was
 the cool gray dawn, and there was a delicious sense of repose and peace in the 
deep pervading calm and silence of the woods. Not a leaf stirred; not a sound ob
truded upon great Nature's meditation. Beaded dewdrops stood upon the leaves and
 grasses. A white layer of ashes covered the fire, and a thin blue breath of smo
ke rose straight into the air. Joe and Huck still slept.Now, far away in the woo
ds a bird called; another answered; presently the hammering of a woodpecker was 
heard. Gradually the cool dim gray of the morning whitened, and as gradually sou
nds multiplied and life manifested itself. The marvel of Nature shaking off slee
p and going to work unfolded itself to the musing boy. A little green worm came 
crawling over a dewy leaf, lifting two-thirds of his body into the air from time
 to time and "sniffing around," then proceeding again -- for he was measuring, T
om said; and when the worm approached-145-him, of its own accord, he sat as stil
l as a stone, with his hopes rising and falling, by turns, as the creature still
 came toward him or seemed inclined to go elsewhere; and when at last it conside
red a painful moment with its curved body in the air and then came decisively do
wn upon Tom's leg and began a journey over him, his whole heart was glad -- for 
that meant that he was going to have a new suit of clothes -- without the shadow
 of a doubt a gaudy piratical uniform. Now a procession of ants appeared, from n
owhere in particular, and went about their labors; one struggled manfully by wit
h a dead spider five times as big as itself in its arms, and lugged it straight 
up a tree-trunk. A brown spotted lady-bug climbed the dizzy height of a grass bl
ade, and Tom bent down close to it and said, "Lady-bug, lady-bug, fly away home,
 your house is on fire, your children's alone," and she took wing and went off t
o see about it -- which did not surprise the boy, for he knew of old that this i
nsect was credulous about conflagrations, and he had practised upon its simplici
ty more than once. A tumblebug came next, heaving sturdily at its ball, and Tom 
touched the creature, to see it shut its legs against its body and pretend to be
 dead. The birds were fairly rioting by this time. A catbird, the Northern mocke
r, lit in a tree over Tom's head, and trilled out her imitations of her neighbor
s in a rapture of enjoyment; then a shrill jay swept down, a flash of blue flame
, and stopped on a twig almost within the boy's-146-reach, cocked his head to on
e side and eyed the strangers with a consuming curiosity; a gray squirrel and a 
big fellow of the "fox" kind came skurrying along, sitting up at intervals to in
spect and chatter at the boys, for the wild things had probably never seen a hum
an being before and scarcely knew whether to be afraid or not. All Nature was wi
de awake and stirring, now; long lances of sunlight pierced down through the den
se foliage far and near, and a few butterflies came fluttering upon the scene.To
m stirred up the other pirates and they all clattered away with a shout, and in 
a minute or two were stripped and chasing after and tumbling over each other in 
the shallow limpid water of the white sandbar. They felt no longing for the litt
le village sleeping in the distance beyond the majestic waste of water. A vagran
t current or a slight rise in the river had carried off their raft, but this onl
y gratified them, since its going was something like burning the bridge between 
them and civilization.They came back to camp wonderfully refreshed, glad-hearted
, and ravenous; and they soon had the camp-fire blazing up again. Huck found a s
pring of clear cold water close by, and the boys made cups of broad oak or hicko
ry leaves, and felt that water, sweetened with such a wildwood charm as that, wo
uld be a good enough substitute for coffee. While Joe was slicing bacon for brea
kfast, Tom and Huck asked him to hold on a minute; they stepped to a promising n
ook in the river-bank and threw in their-147-lines; almost immediately they had 
reward. Joe had not had time to get impatient before they were back again with s
ome handsome bass, a couple of sun-perch and a small catfish -- provisions enoug
h for quite a family. They fried the fish with the bacon, and were astonished; f
or no fish had ever seemed so delicious before. They did not know that the quick
er a fresh-water fish is on the fire after he is caught the better he is; and th
ey reflected little upon what a sauce open-air sleeping, open-air exercise, bath
ing, and a large ingredient of hunger make, too.They lay around in the shade, af
ter breakfast, while Huck had a smoke, and then went off through the woods on an
 exploring expedition. They tramped gayly along, over decaying logs, through tan
gled underbrush, among solemn monarchs of the forest, hung from their crowns to 
the ground with a drooping regalia of grape-vines. Now and then they came upon s
nug nooks carpeted with grass and jeweled with flowers.They found plenty of thin
gs to be delighted with, but nothing to be astonished at. They discovered that t
he island was about three miles long and a quarter of a mile wide, and that the 
shore it lay closest to was only separated from it by a narrow channel hardly tw
o hundred yards wide. They took a swim about every hour, so it was close upon th
e middle of the afternoon when they got back to camp. They were too hungry to st
op to fish, but-148-they fared sumptuously upon cold ham, and then threw themsel
ves down in the shade to talk. But the talk soon began to drag, and then died. T
he stillness, the solemnity that brooded in the woods, and the sense of loneline
ss, began to tell upon the spirits of the boys. They fell to thinking. A sort of
 undefined longing crept upon them. This took dim shape, presently -- it was bud
ding homesickness. Even Finn the Red-Handed was dreaming of his doorsteps and em
pty hogsheads. But they were all ashamed of their weakness, and none was brave e
nough to speak his thought.For some time, now, the boys had been dully conscious
 of a peculiar sound in the distance, just as one sometimes is of the ticking of
 a clock which he takes no distinct note of. But now this mysterious sound becam
e more pronounced, and forced a recognition. The boys started, glanced at each o
ther, and then each assumed a listening attitude. There was a long silence, prof
ound and unbroken; then a deep, sullen boom came floating down out of the distan
ce."What is it!" exclaimed Joe, under his breath."I wonder," said Tom in a whisp
er."'Tain't thunder," said Huckleberry, in an awed tone, "becuz thunder -- ""Har
k!" said Tom. "Listen -- don't talk."They waited a time that seemed an age, and 
then the same muffled boom troubled the solemn hush."Let's go and see."-149-They
 sprang to their feet and hurried to the shore toward the town. They parted the 
bushes on the bank and peered out over the water. The little steam ferry-boat wa
s about a mile below the village, drifting with the current. Her broad deck seem
ed crowded with people. There were a great many skiffs rowing about or floating 
with the stream in the neighborhood of the ferryboat, but the boys could not det
ermine what the men in them were doing. Presently a great jet of white smoke bur
st from the ferryboat's side, and as it expanded and rose in a lazy cloud, that 
same dull throb of sound was borne to the listeners again."I know now!" exclaime
d Tom; "somebody's drownded!""That's it!" said Huck; "they done that last summer
, when Bill Turner got drownded; they shoot a cannon over the water, and that ma
kes him come up to the top. Yes, and they take loaves of bread and put quicksilv
er in 'em and set 'em afloat, and wherever there's anybody that's drownded, they
'll float right there and stop.""Yes, I've heard about that," said Joe. "I wonde
r what makes the bread do that.""Oh, it ain't the bread, so much," said Tom; "I 
reckon it's mostly what they SAY over it before they start it out.""But they don
't say anything over it," said Huck. "I've seen 'em and they don't.""Well, that'
s funny," said Tom. "But maybe-150-they say it to themselves. Of course they do.
 Anybody might know that."The other boys agreed that there was reason in what To
m said, because an ignorant lump of bread, uninstructed by an incantation, could
 not be expected to act very intelligently when set upon an errand of such gravi
ty."By jings, I wish I was over there, now," said Joe."I do too" said Huck "I'd 
give heaps to know who it is."The boys still listened and watched. Presently a r
evealing thought flashed through Tom's mind, and he exclaimed:"Boys, I know who'
s drownded -- it's us!"They felt like heroes in an instant. Here was a gorgeous 
triumph; they were missed; they were mourned; hearts were breaking on their acco
unt; tears were being shed; accusing memories of unkindness to these poor lost l
ads were rising up, and unavailing regrets and remorse were being indulged; and 
best of all, the departed were the talk of the whole town, and the envy of all t
he boys, as far as this dazzling notoriety was concerned. This was fine. It was 
worth while to be a pirate, after all.As twilight drew on, the ferryboat went ba
ck to her accustomed business and the skiffs disappeared. The pirates returned t
o camp. They were jubilant with vanity over their new grandeur and the illustrio
us trouble they were making. They caught fish,-151-cooked supper and ate it, and
 then fell to guessing at what the village was thinking and saying about them; a
nd the pictures they drew of the public distress on their account were gratifyin
g to look upon -- from their point of view. But when the shadows of night closed
 them in, they gradually ceased to talk, and sat gazing into the fire, with thei
r minds evidently wandering elsewhere. The excitement was gone, now, and Tom and
 Joe could not keep back thoughts of certain persons at home who were not enjoyi
ng this fine frolic as much as they were. Misgivings came; they grew troubled an
d unhappy; a sigh or two escaped, unawares. By and by Joe timidly ventured upon 
a roundabout "feeler" as to how the others might look upon a return to civilizat
ion -- not right now, but --Tom withered him with derision! Huck, being uncommit
ted as yet, joined in with Tom, and the waverer quickly "explained," and was gla
d to get out of the scrape with as little taint of chicken-hearted home-sickness
 clinging to his garments as he could. Mutiny was effectually laid to rest for t
he moment.As the night deepened, Huck began to nod, and presently to snore. Joe 
followed next. Tom lay upon his elbow motionless, for some time, watching the tw
o intently. At last he got up cautiously, on his knees, and went searching among
 the grass and the flickering reflections flung by the camp-fire. He picked up a
nd inspected several large semi-cylinders-152-of the thin white bark of a sycamo
re, and finally chose two which seemed to suit him. Then he knelt by the fire an
d painfully wrote something upon each of these with his "red keel"; one he rolle
d up and put in his jacket pocket, and the other he put in Joe's hat and removed
 it to a little distance from the owner. And he also put into the hat certain sc
hoolboy treasures of almost inestimable value -- among them a lump of chalk, an 
India-rubber ball, three fishhooks, and one of that kind of marbles known as a "
sure 'nough crystal." Then he tiptoed his way cautiously among the trees till he
 felt that he was out of hearing, and straightway broke into a keen run in the d
irection of the sandbar.-153-Chapter XVA FEW minutes later Tom was in the shoal 
water of the bar, wading toward the Illinois shore. Before the depth reached his
 middle he was half-way over; the current would permit no more wading, now, so h
e struck out confidently to swim the remaining hundred yards. He swam quartering
 upstream, but still was swept downward rather faster than he had expected. Howe
ver, he reached the shore finally, and drifted along till he found a low place a
nd drew himself out. He put his hand on his jacket pocket, found his piece of ba
rk safe, and then struck through the woods, following the shore, with streaming 
garments. Shortly before ten o'clock he came out into an open place opposite the
 village, and saw the ferryboat lying in the shadow of the trees and the high ba
nk. Everything was quiet under the blinking stars. He crept down the bank, watch
ing with all his eyes, slipped into the water, swam three or four strokes and cl
imbed into the skiff that did "yawl" duty at the boat's stern. He laid himself d
own under the thwarts and waited, panting-154-.Presently the cracked bell tapped
 and a voice gave the order to "cast off." A minute or two later the skiff's hea
d was standing high up, against the boat's swell, and the voyage was begun. Tom 
felt happy in his success, for he knew it was the boat's last trip for the night
. At the end of a long twelve or fifteen minutes the wheels stopped, and Tom sli
pped overboard and swam ashore in the dusk, landing fifty yards downstream, out 
of danger of possible stragglers.He flew along unfrequented alleys, and shortly 
found himself at his aunt's back fence. He climbed over, approached the "ell," a
nd looked in at the sitting-room window, for a light was burning there. There sa
t Aunt Polly, Sid, Mary, and Joe Harper's mother, grouped together, talking. The
y were by the bed, and the bed was between them and the door. Tom went to the do
or and began to softly lift the latch; then he pressed gently and the door yield
ed a crack; he continued pushing cautiously, and quaking every time it creaked, 
till he judged he might squeeze through on his knees; so he put his head through
 and began, warily."What makes the candle blow so?" said Aunt Polly. Tom hurried
 up. "Why, that door's open, I believe. Why, of course it is. No end of strange 
things now. Go 'long and shut it, Sid."Tom disappeared under the bed just in tim
e. He lay and "breathed" himself for a time, and then crept to where he could al
most touch his aunt's foot.-155-"But as I was saying," said Aunt Polly, "he warn
't bad, so to say -- only mischeevous. Only just giddy, and harum-scarum, you kn
ow. He warn't any more responsible than a colt. He never meant any harm, and he 
was the best-hearted boy that ever was" -- and she began to cry."It was just so 
with my Joe -- always full of his devilment, and up to every kind of mischief, b
ut he was just as unselfish and kind as he could be -- and laws bless me, to thi
nk I went and whipped him for taking that cream, never once recollecting that I 
throwed it out myself because it was sour, and I never to see him again in this 
world, never, never, never, poor abused boy!" And Mrs. Harper sobbed as if her h
eart would break."I hope Tom's better off where he is," said Sid, "but if he'd b
een better in some ways -- ""Sid !" Tom felt the glare of the old lady's eye, th
ough he could not see it. "Not a word against my Tom, now that he's gone! God'll
 take care of him -- never you trouble yourself, sir! Oh, Mrs. Harper, I don't k
now how to give him up! I don't know how to give him up! He was such a comfort t
o me, although he tormented my old heart out of me, 'most.""The Lord giveth and 
the Lord hath taken away -- Blessed be the name of the Lord! But it's so hard --
 Oh, it's so hard! Only last Saturday my Joe busted a firecracker right under my
 nose and I knocked him sprawling. Little did I know then,-156-how soon -- Oh, i
f it was to do over again I'd hug him and bless him for it.""Yes, yes, yes, I kn
ow just how you feel, Mrs. Harper, I know just exactly how you feel. No longer a
go than yesterday noon, my Tom took and filled the cat full of Pain-killer, and 
I did think the cretur would tear the house down. And God forgive me, I cracked 
Tom's head with my thimble, poor boy, poor dead boy. But he's out of all his tro
ubles now. And the last words I ever heard him say was to reproach -- "But this 
memory was too much for the old lady, and she broke entirely down. Tom was snuff
ling, now, himself -- and more in pity of himself than anybody else. He could he
ar Mary crying, and putting in a kindly word for him from time to time. He began
 to have a nobler opinion of himself than ever before. Still, he was sufficientl
y touched by his aunt's grief to long to rush out from under the bed and overwhe
lm her with joy -- and the theatrical gorgeousness of the thing appealed strongl
y to his nature, too, but he resisted and lay still.He went on listening, and ga
thered by odds and ends that it was conjectured at first that the boys had got d
rowned while taking a swim; then the small raft had been missed; next, certain b
oys said the missing lads had promised that the village should "hear something" 
soon; the wise-heads had "put this and that together" and decided that the lads 
had gone off on that raft and would turn up at the-157-next town below, presentl
y; but toward noon the raft had been found, lodged against the Missouri shore so
me five or six miles below the village -- and then hope perished; they must be d
rowned, else hunger would have driven them home by nightfall if not sooner. It w
as believed that the search for the bodies had been a fruitless effort merely be
cause the drowning must have occurred in mid-channel, since the boys, being good
 swimmers, would otherwise have escaped to shore. This was Wednesday night. If t
he bodies continued missing until Sunday, all hope would be given over, and the 
funerals would be preached on that morning. Tom shuddered.Mrs. Harper gave a sob
bing good-night and turned to go. Then with a mutual impulse the two bereaved wo
men flung themselves into each other's arms and had a good, consoling cry, and t
hen parted. Aunt Polly was tender far beyond her wont, in her good-night to Sid 
and Mary. Sid snuffled a bit and Mary went off crying with all her heart.Aunt Po
lly knelt down and prayed for Tom so touchingly, so appealingly, and with such m
easureless love in her words and her old trembling voice, that he was weltering 
in tears again, long before she was through.He had to keep still long after she 
went to bed, for she kept making broken-hearted ejaculations from time to time, 
tossing unrestfully, and turning over. But at last she was still, only moaning a
-158-little in her sleep. Now the boy stole out, rose gradually by the bedside, 
shaded the candle-light with his hand, and stood regarding her. His heart was fu
ll of pity for her. He took out his sycamore scroll and placed it by the candle.
 But something occurred to him, and he lingered considering. His face lighted wi
th a happy solution of his thought; he put the bark hastily in his pocket. Then 
he bent over and kissed the faded lips, and straightway made his stealthy exit, 
latching the door behind him.He threaded his way back to the ferry landing, foun
d nobody at large there, and walked boldly on board the boat, for he knew she wa
s tenantless except that there was a watchman, who always turned in and slept li
ke a graven image. He untied the skiff at the stern, slipped into it, and was so
on rowing cautiously upstream. When he had pulled a mile above the village, he s
tarted quartering across and bent himself stoutly to his work. He hit the landin
g on the other side neatly, for this was a familiar bit of work to him. He was m
oved to capture the skiff, arguing that it might be considered a ship and theref
ore legitimate prey for a pirate, but he knew a thorough search would be made fo
r it and that might end in revelations. So he stepped ashore and entered the woo
ds.He sat down and took a long rest, torturing himself meanwhile to keep awake, 
and then started warily down the home-stretch. The night was far spent. It was b
road daylight before he found himself fairly-159-abreast the island bar. He rest
ed again until the sun was well up and gilding the great river with its splendor
, and then he plunged into the stream. A little later he paused, dripping, upon 
the threshold of the camp, and heard Joe say:"No, Tom's true-blue, Huck, and he'
ll come back. He won't desert. He knows that would be a disgrace to a pirate, an
d Tom's too proud for that sort of thing. He's up to something or other. Now I w
onder what?""Well, the things is ours, anyway, ain't they?""Pretty near, but not
 yet, Huck. The writing says they are if he ain't back here to breakfast.""Which
 he is!" exclaimed Tom, with fine dramatic effect, stepping grandly into camp.A 
sumptuous breakfast of bacon and fish was shortly provided, and as the boys set 
to work upon it, Tom recounted (and adorned) his adventures. They were a vain an
d boastful company of heroes when the tale was done. Then Tom hid himself away i
n a shady nook to sleep till noon, and the other pirates got ready to fish and e
xplore.-160-Chapter XVIAFTER dinner all the gang turned out to hunt for turtle e
ggs on the bar. They went about poking sticks into the sand, and when they found
 a soft place they went down on their knees and dug with their hands. Sometimes 
they would take fifty or sixty eggs out of one hole. They were perfectly round w
hite things a trifle smaller than an English walnut. They had a famous fried-egg
 feast that night, and another on Friday morning.After breakfast they went whoop
ing and prancing out on the bar, and chased each other round and round, shedding
 clothes as they went, until they were naked, and then continued the frolic far 
away up the shoal water of the bar, against the stiff current, which latter trip
ped their legs from under them from time to time and greatly increased the fun. 
And now and then they stooped in a group and splashed water in each other's face
s with their palms, gradually approaching each other, with averted faces to avoi
d the strangling sprays, and finally gripping and struggling till the best man d
ucked his neighbor, and then they all went under-161-in a tangle of white legs a
nd arms and came up blowing, sputtering, laughing, and gasping for breath at one
 and the same time.When they were well exhausted, they would run out and sprawl 
on the dry, hot sand, and lie there and cover themselves up with it, and by and 
by break for the water again and go through the original performance once more. 
Finally it occurred to them that their naked skin represented flesh-colored "tig
hts" very fairly; so they drew a ring in the sand and had a circus -- with three
 clowns in it, for none would yield this proudest post to his neighbor.Next they
 got their marbles and played "knucks" and "ring-taw" and "keeps" till that amus
ement grew stale. Then Joe and Huck had another swim, but Tom would not venture,
 because he found that in kicking off his trousers he had kicked his string of r
attlesnake rattles off his ankle, and he wondered how he had escaped cramp so lo
ng without the protection of this mysterious charm. He did not venture again unt
il he had found it, and by that time the other boys were tired and ready to rest
. They gradually wandered apart, dropped into the "dumps," and fell to gazing lo
ngingly across the wide river to where the village lay drowsing in the sun. Tom 
found himself writing "BECKY" in the sand with his big toe; he scratched it out,
 and was angry with himself for his weakness. But he wrote it again, nevertheles
s; he could not help it. He erased it once more and then took himself out of-162
-temptation by driving the other boys together and joining them.But Joe's spirit
s had gone down almost beyond resurrection. He was so homesick that he could har
dly endure the misery of it. The tears lay very near the surface. Huck was melan
choly, too. Tom was down-hearted, but tried hard not to show it. He had a secret
 which he was not ready to tell, yet, but if this mutinous depression was not br
oken up soon, he would have to bring it out. He said, with a great show of cheer
fulness:"I bet there's been pirates on this island before, boys. We'll explore i
t again. They've hid treasures here somewhere. How'd you feel to light on a rott
en chest full of gold and silver -- hey?"But it roused only faint enthusiasm, wh
ich faded out, with no reply. Tom tried one or two other seductions; but they fa
iled, too. It was discouraging work. Joe sat poking up the sand with a stick and
 looking very gloomy. Finally he said:"Oh, boys, let's give it up. I want to go 
home. It's so lonesome.""Oh no, Joe, you'll feel better by and by," said Tom. "J
ust think of the fishing that's here.""I don't care for fishing. I want to go ho
me.""But, Joe, there ain't such another swimming-place anywhere.""Swimming's no 
good. I don't seem to care for it, somehow, when there ain't anybody to say I sh
a'n't go in. I mean to go home."-163-"Oh, shucks! Baby! You want to see your mot
her, I reckon.""Yes, I do want to see my mother -- and you would, too, if you ha
d one. I ain't any more baby than you are." And Joe snuffled a little."Well, we'
ll let the cry-baby go home to his mother, won't we, Huck? Poor thing -- does it
 want to see its mother? And so it shall. You like it here, don't you, Huck? We'
ll stay, won't we?"Huck said, "Y-e-s" -- without any heart in it."I'll never spe
ak to you again as long as I live," said Joe, rising. "There now!" And he moved 
moodily away and began to dress himself."Who cares!" said Tom. "Nobody wants you
 to. Go 'long home and get laughed at. Oh, you're a nice pirate. Huck and me ain
't cry-babies. We'll stay, won't we, Huck? Let him go if he wants to. I reckon w
e can get along without him, per'aps."But Tom was uneasy, nevertheless, and was 
alarmed to see Joe go sullenly on with his dressing. And then it was discomforti
ng to see Huck eying Joe's preparations so wistfully, and keeping up such an omi
nous silence. Presently, without a parting word, Joe began to wade off toward th
e Illinois shore. Tom's heart began to sink. He glanced at Huck. Huck could not 
bear the look, and dropped his eyes. Then he said:"I want to go, too, Tom. It wa
s getting so lonesome anyway, and now it'll be worse. Let's us go, too, Tom."-16
4-"I won't! You can all go, if you want to. I mean to stay.""Tom, I better go.""
Well, go 'long -- who's hendering you."Huck began to pick up his scattered cloth
es. He said:"Tom, I wisht you'd come, too. Now you think it over. We'll wait for
 you when we get to shore.""Well, you'll wait a blame long time, that's all."Huc
k started sorrowfully away, and Tom stood looking after him, with a strong desir
e tugging at his heart to yield his pride and go along too. He hoped the boys wo
uld stop, but they still waded slowly on. It suddenly dawned on Tom that it was 
become very lonely and still. He made one final struggle with his pride, and the
n darted after his comrades, yelling:"Wait! Wait! I want to tell you something!"
They presently stopped and turned around. When he got to where they were, he beg
an unfolding his secret, and they listened moodily till at last they saw the "po
int" he was driving at, and then they set up a war-whoop of applause and said it
 was "splendid!" and said if he had told them at first, they wouldn't have start
ed away. He made a plausible excuse; but his real reason had been the fear that 
not even the secret would keep them with him any very great length of time, and 
so he had meant to hold it in reserve as a last seduction.The lads came gayly ba
ck and went at their sports-165-again with a will, chattering all the time about
 Tom's stupendous plan and admiring the genius of it. After a dainty egg and fis
h dinner, Tom said he wanted to learn to smoke, now. Joe caught at the idea and 
said he would like to try, too. So Huck made pipes and filled them. These novice
s had never smoked anything before but cigars made of grape-vine, and they "bit"
 the tongue, and were not considered manly anyway.Now they stretched themselves 
out on their elbows and began to puff, charily, and with slender confidence. The
 smoke had an unpleasant taste, and they gagged a little, but Tom said:"Why, it'
s just as easy! If I'd a knowed this was all, I'd a learnt long ago.""So would I
," said Joe. "It's just nothing.""Why, many a time I've looked at people smoking
, and thought well I wish I could do that; but I never thought I could," said To
m."That's just the way with me, hain't it, Huck? You've heard me talk just that 
way -- haven't you, Huck? I'll leave it to Huck if I haven't.""Yes -- heaps of t
imes," said Huck."Well, I have too," said Tom; "oh, hundreds of times. Once down
 by the slaughter-house. Don't you remember, Huck? Bob Tanner was there, and Joh
nny Miller, and Jeff Thatcher, when I said it. Don't you remember, Huck, 'bout m
e saying that?""Yes, that's so," said Huck. "That was the-166-day after I lost a
 white alley. No, 'twas the day before.""There -- I told you so," said Tom. "Huc
k recollects it.""I bleeve I could smoke this pipe all day," said Joe. "I don't 
feel sick.""Neither do I," said Tom. " I could smoke it all day. But I bet you J
eff Thatcher couldn't.""Jeff Thatcher! Why, he'd keel over just with two draws. 
Just let him try it once. He'd see!""I bet he would. And Johnny Miller -- I wish
 could see Johnny Miller tackle it once.""Oh, don't I!" said Joe. "Why, I bet yo
u Johnny Miller couldn't any more do this than nothing. Just one little snifter 
would fetch him .""'Deed it would, Joe. Say -- I wish the boys could see us now.
""So do I.""Say -- boys, don't say anything about it, and some time when they're
 around, I'll come up to you and say, 'Joe, got a pipe? I want a smoke.' And you
'll say, kind of careless like, as if it warn't anything, you'll say, 'Yes, I go
t my old pipe, and another one, but my tobacker ain't very good.' And I'll say, 
'Oh, that's all right, if it's strong enough.' And then you'll out with the pipe
s, and we'll light up just as ca'm, and then just see 'em look!""By jings, that'
ll be gay, Tom! I wish it wasnow!"-167-"So do I! And when we tell 'em we learned
 when we was off pirating, won't they wish they'd been along?""Oh, I reckon not!
 I'll just bet they will!"So the talk ran on. But presently it began to flag a t
rifle, and grow disjointed. The silences widened; the expectoration marvellously
 increased. Every pore inside the boys' cheeks became a spouting fountain; they 
could scarcely bail out the cellars under their tongues fast enough to prevent a
n inundation; little overflowings down their throats occurred in spite of all th
ey could do, and sudden retchings followed every time. Both boys were looking ve
ry pale and miserable, now. Joe's pipe dropped from his nerveless fingers. Tom's
 followed. Both fountains were going furiously and both pumps bailing with might
 and main. Joe said feebly:"I've lost my knife. I reckon I better go and find it
."Tom said, with quivering lips and halting utterance:"I'll help you. You go ove
r that way and I'll hunt around by the spring. No, you needn't come, Huck -- we 
can find it."So Huck sat down again, and waited an hour. Then he found it loneso
me, and went to find his comrades. They were wide apart in the woods, both very 
pale, both fast asleep. But something informed him that if they had had any trou
ble they had got rid of it.They were not talkative at supper that night.-168-The
y had a humble look, and when Huck prepared his pipe after the meal and was goin
g to prepare theirs, they said no, they were not feeling very well -- something 
they ate at dinner had disagreed with them.About midnight Joe awoke, and called 
the boys. There was a brooding oppressiveness in the air that seemed to bode som
ething. The boys huddled themselves together and sought the friendly companionsh
ip of the fire, though the dull dead heat of the breathless atmosphere was stifl
ing. They sat still, intent and waiting. The solemn hush continued. Beyond the l
ight of the fire everything was swallowed up in the blackness of darkness. Prese
ntly there came a quivering glow that vaguely revealed the foliage for a moment 
and then vanished. By and by another came, a little stronger. Then another. Then
 a faint moan came sighing through the branches of the forest and the boys felt 
a fleeting breath upon their cheeks, and shuddered with the fancy that the Spiri
t of the Night had gone by. There was a pause. Now a weird flash turned night in
to day and showed every little grass-blade, separate and distinct, that grew abo
ut their feet. And it showed three white, startled faces, too. A deep peal of th
under went rolling and tumbling down the heavens and lost itself in sullen rumbl
ings in the distance. A sweep of chilly air passed by, rustling all the leaves a
nd snowing the flaky ashes broadcast about the fire. Another fierce glare lit up
 the forest and an instant crash followed that seemed to rend-169-the tree-tops 
right over the boys' heads. They clung together in terror, in the thick gloom th
at followed. A few big rain-drops fell pattering upon the leaves."Quick! boys, g
o for the tent!" exclaimed Tom.They sprang away, stumbling over roots and among 
vines in the dark, no two plunging in the same direction. A furious blast roared
 through the trees, making everything sing as it went. One blinding flash after 
another came, and peal on peal of deafening thunder. And now a drenching rain po
ured down and the rising hurricane drove it in sheets along the ground. The boys
 cried out to each other, but the roaring wind and the booming thunder-blasts dr
owned their voices utterly. However, one by one they straggled in at last and to
ok shelter under the tent, cold, scared, and streaming with water; but to have c
ompany in misery seemed something to be grateful for. They could not talk, the o
ld sail flapped so furiously, even if the other noises would have allowed them. 
The tempest rose higher and higher, and presently the sail tore loose from its f
astenings and went winging away on the blast. The boys seized each others' hands
 and fled, with many tumblings and bruises, to the shelter of a great oak that s
tood upon the river-bank. Now the battle was at its highest. Under the ceaseless
 conflagration of lightning that flamed in the skies, everything below stood out
 in clean-cut and shadowless distinctness: the bending trees, the billowy-170-ri
ver, white with foam, the driving spray of spume-flakes, the dim outlines of the
 high bluffs on the other side, glimpsed through the drifting cloud-rack and the
 slanting veil of rain. Every little while some giant tree yielded the fight and
 fell crashing through the younger growth; and the unflagging thunder-peals came
 now in ear-splitting explosive bursts, keen and sharp, and unspeakably appallin
g. The storm culminated in one matchless effort that seemed likely to tear the i
sland to pieces, burn it up, drown it to the tree-tops, blow it away, and deafen
 every creature in it, all at one and the same moment. It was a wild night for h
omeless young heads to be out in.But at last the battle was done, and the forces
 retired with weaker and weaker threatenings and grumblings, and peace resumed h
er sway. The boys went back to camp, a good deal awed; but they found there was 
still something to be thankful for, because the great sycamore, the shelter of t
heir beds, was a ruin, now, blasted by the lightnings, and they were not under i
t when the catastrophe happened.Everything in camp was drenched, the camp-fire a
s well; for they were but heedless lads, like their generation, and had made no 
provision against rain. Here was matter for dismay, for they were soaked through
 and chilled. They were eloquent in their distress; but they presently discovere
d that the fire had eaten so far up under the great log it had been-171-built ag
ainst (where it curved upward and separated itself from the ground), that a hand
breadth or so of it had escaped wetting; so they patiently wrought until, with s
hreds and bark gathered from the under sides of sheltered logs, they coaxed the 
fire to burn again. Then they piled on great dead boughs till they had a roaring
 furnace, and were glad-hearted once more. They dried their boiled ham and had a
 feast, and after that they sat by the fire and expanded and glorified their mid
night adventure until morning, for there was not a dry spot to sleep on, anywher
e around.As the sun began to steal in upon the boys, drowsiness came over them, 
and they went out on the sandbar and lay down to sleep. They got scorched out by
 and by, and drearily set about getting breakfast. After the meal they felt rust
y, and stiff-jointed, and a little home-sick once more. Tom saw the signs, and f
ell to cheering up the pirates as well as he could. But they cared nothing for m
arbles, or circus, or swimming, or anything. He reminded them of the imposing se
cret, and raised a ray of cheer. While it lasted, he got them interested in a ne
w device. This was to knock off being pirates, for a while, and be Indians for a
 change. They were attracted by this idea; so it was not long before they were s
tripped, and striped from head to heel with black mud, like so many zebras -- al
l of them chiefs, of course -- and then they went tearing through the woods to a
ttack an English settlement.-172-By and by they separated into three hostile tri
bes, and darted upon each other from ambush with dreadful war-whoops, and killed
 and scalped each other by thousands. It was a gory day. Consequently it was an 
extremely satisfactory one.They assembled in camp toward supper-time, hungry and
 happy; but now a difficulty arose -- hostile Indians could not break the bread 
of hospitality together without first making peace, and this was a simple imposs
ibility without smoking a pipe of peace. There was no other process that ever th
ey had heard of. Two of the savages almost wished they had remained pirates. How
ever, there was no other way; so with such show of cheerfulness as they could mu
ster they called for the pipe and took their whiff as it passed, in due form.And
 behold, they were glad they had gone into savagery, for they had gained somethi
ng; they found that they could now smoke a little without having to go and hunt 
for a lost knife; they did not get sick enough to be seriously uncomfortable. Th
ey were not likely to fool away this high promise for lack of effort. No, they p
ractised cautiously, after supper, with right fair success, and so they spent a 
jubilant evening. They were prouder and happier in their new acquirement than th
ey would have been in the scalping and skinning of the Six Nations. We will leav
e them to smoke and chatter and brag, since we have no further use for them at p
resent.-173-Chapter XVIIBUT there was no hilarity in the little town that same t
ranquil Saturday afternoon. The Harpers, and Aunt Polly's family, were being put
 into mourning, with great grief and many tears. An unusual quiet possessed the 
village, although it was ordinarily quiet enough, in all conscience. The village
rs conducted their concerns with an absent air, and talked little; but they sigh
ed often. The Saturday holiday seemed a burden to the children. They had no hear
t in their sports, and gradually gave them up.In the afternoon Becky Thatcher fo
und herself moping about the deserted schoolhouse yard, and feeling very melanch
oly. But she found nothing there to comfort her. She soliloquized:"Oh, if I only
 had a brass andiron-knob again! But I haven't got anything now to remember him 
by." And she choked back a little sob.Presently she stopped, and said to herself
:"It was right here. Oh, if it was to do over again, I wouldn't say that -- I wo
uldn't say it for the whole world. But he's gone now; I'll never, never, never s
ee him any more."-174-This thought broke her down, and she wandered away, with t
ears rolling down her cheeks. Then quite a group of boys and girls -- playmates 
of Tom's and Joe's -- came by, and stood looking over the paling fence and talki
ng in reverent tones of how Tom did so-and-so the last time they saw him, and ho
w Joe said this and that small trifle (pregnant with awful prophecy, as they cou
ld easily see now!) -- and each speaker pointed out the exact spot where the los
t lads stood at the time, and then added something like "and I was a-standing ju
st so -- just as I am now, and as if you was him -- I was as close as that -- an
d he smiled, just this way -- and then something seemed to go all over me, like 
-- awful, you know -- and I never thought what it meant, of course, but I can se
e now!"Then there was a dispute about who saw the dead boys last in life, and ma
ny claimed that dismal distinction, and offered evidences, more or less tampered
 with by the witness; and when it was ultimately decided who DID see the departe
d last, and exchanged the last words with them, the lucky parties took upon them
selves a sort of sacred importance, and were gaped at and envied by all the rest
. One poor chap, who had no other grandeur to offer, said with tolerably manifes
t pride in the remembrance:"Well, Tom Sawyer he licked me once."But that bid for
 glory was a failure. Most of the boys could say that, and so that cheapened the
-175-distinction too much. The group loitered away, still recalling memories of 
the lost heroes, in awed voices.When the Sunday-school hour was finished, the ne
xt morning, the bell began to toll, instead of ringing in the usual way. It was 
a very still Sabbath, and the mournful sound seemed in keeping with the musing h
ush that lay upon nature. The villagers began to gather, loitering a moment in t
he vestibule to converse in whispers about the sad event. But there was no whisp
ering in the house; only the funereal rustling of dresses as the women gathered 
to their seats disturbed the silence there. None could remember when the little 
church had been so full before. There was finally a waiting pause, an expectant 
dumbness, and then Aunt Polly entered, followed by Sid and Mary, and they by the
 Harper family, all in deep black, and the whole congregation, the old minister 
as well, rose reverently and stood until the mourners were seated in the front p
ew. There was another communing silence, broken at intervals by muffled sobs, an
d then the minister spread his hands abroad and prayed. A moving hymn was sung, 
and the text followed: "I am the Resurrection and the Life."As the service proce
eded, the clergyman drew such pictures of the graces, the winning ways, and the 
rare promise of the lost lads that every soul there, thinking he recognized thes
e pictures, felt a pang in remembering that he had persistently blinded-176-hims
elf to them always before, and had as persistently seen only faults and flaws in
 the poor boys. The minister related many a touching incident in the lives of th
e departed, too, which illustrated their sweet, generous natures, and the people
 could easily see, now, how noble and beautiful those episodes were, and remembe
red with grief that at the time they occurred they had seemed rank rascalities, 
well deserving of the cowhide. The congregation became more and more moved, as t
he pathetic tale went on, till at last the whole company broke down and joined t
he weeping mourners in a chorus of anguished sobs, the preacher himself giving w
ay to his feelings, and crying in the pulpit.There was a rustle in the gallery, 
which nobody noticed; a moment later the church door creaked; the minister raise
d his streaming eyes above his handkerchief, and stood transfixed! First one and
 then another pair of eyes followed the minister's, and then almost with one imp
ulse the congregation rose and stared while the three dead boys came marching up
 the aisle, Tom in the lead, Joe next, and Huck, a ruin of drooping rags, sneaki
ng sheepishly in the rear! They had been hid in the unused gallery listening to 
their own funeral sermon!Aunt Polly, Mary, and the Harpers threw themselves upon
 their restored ones, smothered them with kisses and poured out thanksgivings, w
hile poor Huck stood abashed and uncomfortable, not knowing exactly what to do o
r where to hide from so many-177-unwelcoming eyes. He wavered, and started to sl
ink away, but Tom seized him and said:"Aunt Polly, it ain't fair. Somebody's got
 to be glad to see Huck.""And so they shall. I'm glad to see him, poor motherles
s thing!" And the loving attentions Aunt Polly lavished upon him were the one th
ing capable of making him more uncomfortable than he was before.Suddenly the min
ister shouted at the top of his voice: "Praise God from whom all blessings flow 
-- SING! -- and put your hearts in it!"And they did. Old Hundred swelled up with
 a triumphant burst, and while it shook the rafters Tom Sawyer the Pirate looked
 around upon the envying juveniles about him and confessed in his heart that thi
s was the proudest moment of his life.As the "sold" congregation trooped out the
y said they would almost be willing to be made ridiculous again to hear Old Hund
red sung like that once more.Tom got more cuffs and kisses that day -- according
 to Aunt Polly's varying moods -- than he had earned before in a year; and he ha
rdly knew which expressed the most gratefulness to God and affection for himself
.-178-Chapter XVIIITHAT was Tom's great secret -- the scheme to return home with
 his brother pirates and attend their own funerals. They had paddled over to the
 Missouri shore on a log, at dusk on Saturday, landing five or six miles below t
he village; they had slept in the woods at the edge of the town till nearly dayl
ight, and had then crept through back lanes and alleys and finished their sleep 
in the gallery of the church among a chaos of invalided benches.At breakfast, Mo
nday morning, Aunt Polly and Mary were very loving to Tom, and very attentive to
 his wants. There was an unusual amount of talk. In the course of it Aunt Polly 
said:"Well, I don't say it wasn't a fine joke, Tom, to keep everybody suffering 
'most a week so you boys had a good time, but it is a pity you could be so hard-
hearted as to let me suffer so. If you could come over on a log to go to your fu
neral, you could have come over and give me a hint some way that you warn't dead
, but only run off.""Yes, you could have done that, Tom," said Mary; "and I beli
eve you would if you had thought of it."-179-"Would you, Tom?" said Aunt Polly, 
her face lightingwistfully. "Say, now, would you, if you'd thought of it?""I -- 
well, I don't know. 'Twould 'a' spoiled everything.""Tom, I hoped you loved me t
hat much," said Aunt Polly, with a grieved tone that discomforted the boy. "It w
ould have been something if you'd cared enough to think of it, even if you didn'
t do it.""Now, auntie, that ain't any harm," pleaded Mary; "it's only Tom's gidd
y way -- he is always in such a rush that he never thinks of anything.""More's t
he pity. Sid would have thought. And Sid would have come and done it, too. Tom, 
you'll look back, some day, when it's too late, and wish you'd cared a little mo
re for me when it would have cost you so little.""Now, auntie, you know I do car
e for you," said Tom."I'd know it better if you acted more like it.""I wish now 
I'd thought," said Tom, with a repentant tone; "but I dreamt about you, anyway. 
That's something, ain't it?""It ain't much -- a cat does that much -- but it's b
etter than nothing. What did you dream?""Why, Wednesday night I dreamt that you 
was sitting over there by the bed, and Sid was sitting by the woodbox, and Mary 
next to him.""Well, so we did. So we always do. I'm glad-180-your dreams could t
ake even that much trouble about us.""And I dreamt that Joe Harper's mother was 
here.""Why, she was here! Did you dream any more?""Oh, lots. But it's so dim, no
w.""Well, try to recollect -- can't you?""Somehow it seems to me that the wind -
- the wind blowed the -- the -- ""Try harder, Tom! The wind did blow something. 
Come!"Tom pressed his fingers on his forehead an anxious minute, and then said:"
I've got it now! I've got it now! It blowed the candle!""Mercy on us! Go on, Tom
 -- go on!""And it seems to me that you said, 'Why, I believe that that door -- 
'""Go on, Tom!""Just let me study a moment -- just a moment. Oh, yes -- you said
 you believed the door was open.""As I'm sitting here, I did! Didn't I, Mary! Go
 on!""And then -- and then -- well I won't be certain, but it seems like as if y
ou made Sid go and -- and -- ""Well? Well? What did I make him do, Tom? What did
 I make him do?"-181-"You made him -- you -- Oh, you made him shut it.""Well, fo
r the land's sake! I never heard the beat of that in all my days! Don't tell me 
there ain't anything in dreams, any more. Sereny Harper shall know of this befor
e I'm an hour older. I'd like to see her get around this with her rubbage 'bout 
superstition. Go on, Tom!""Oh, it's all getting just as bright as day, now. Next
 you said I warn't bad, only mischeevous and harum-scarum, and not any more resp
onsible than -- than -- I think it was a colt, or something.""And so it was! Wel
l, goodness gracious! Go on, Tom!""And then you began to cry.""So I did. So I di
d. Not the first time, neither. And then -- ""Then Mrs. Harper she began to cry,
 and said Joe was just the same, and she wished she hadn't whipped him for takin
g cream when she'd throwed it out her own self -- ""Tom! The sperrit was upon yo
u! You was a prophesying -- that's what you was doing! Land alive, go on, Tom!""
Then Sid he said -- he said -- ""I don't think I said anything," said Sid."Yes y
ou did, Sid," said Mary."Shut your heads and let Tom go on! What did he say, Tom
?""He said -- I think he said he hoped I was better off where I was gone to, but
 if I'd been better sometimes -- ""There, d'you hear that! It was his very words
!""And you shut him up sharp.""I lay I did! There must 'a' been an angel there. 
There was an angel there, somewheres!""And Mrs. Harper told about Joe scaring he
r with a firecracker, and you told about Peter and the Painkiller -- ""Just as t
rue as I live!""And then there was a whole lot of talk 'bout dragging the river 
for us, and 'bout having the funeral Sunday, and then you and old Miss Harper hu
gged and cried, and she went.""It happened just so! It happened just so, as sure
 as I'm a-sitting in these very tracks. Tom, you couldn't told it more like if y
ou'd 'a' seen it! And then what? Go on, Tom!""Then I thought you prayed for me -
- and I could see you and hear every word you said. And you went to bed, and I w
as so sorry that I took and wrote on a piece of sycamore bark, 'We ain't dead --
 we are only off being pirates,' and put it on the table by the candle; and then
 you looked so good, laying there asleep, that I thought I went and leaned over 
and kissed you on the lips.""Did you, Tom, did you! I just forgive you everythin
g for that!" And she seized the boy in a crushing embrace that made him feel lik
e the guiltiest of villains.-183-"It was very kind, even though it was only a --
 dream," Sid soliloquized just audibly."Shut up, Sid! A body does just the same 
in a dream as he'd do if he was awake. Here's a big Milum apple I've been saving
 for you, Tom, if you was ever found again -- now go 'long to school. I'm thankf
ul to the good God and Father of us all I've got you back, that's long-suffering
 and merciful to them that believe on Him and keep His word, though goodness kno
ws I'm unworthy of it, but if only the worthy ones got His blessings and had His
 hand to help them over the rough places, there's few enough would smile here or
 ever enter into His rest when the long night comes. Go 'long Sid, Mary, Tom -- 
take yourselves off -- you've hendered me long enough."The children left for sch
ool, and the old lady to call on Mrs. Harper and vanquish her realism with Tom's
 marvellous dream. Sid had better judgment than to utter the thought that was in
 his mind as he left the house. It was this: "Pretty thin -- as long a dream as 
that, without any mistakes in it!"What a hero Tom was become, now! He did not go
 skipping and prancing, but moved with a dignified swagger as became a pirate wh
o felt that the public eye was on him. And indeed it was; he tried not to seem t
o see the looks or hear the remarks as he passed along, but they were food and d
rink to him. Smaller boys than himself flocked at his heels, as proud to be seen
 with him, and tolerated by him, as-184-if he had been the drummer at the head o
f a procession or the elephant leading a menagerie into town. Boys of his own si
ze pretended not to know he had been away at all; but they were consuming with e
nvy, nevertheless. They would have given anything to have that swarthy suntanned
 skin of his, and his glittering notoriety; and Tom would not have parted with e
ither for a circus.At school the children made so much of him and of Joe, and de
livered such eloquent admiration from their eyes, that the two heroes were not l
ong in becoming insufferably "stuck-up." They began to tell their adventures to 
hungry listeners -- but they only began; it was not a thing likely to have an en
d, with imaginations like theirs to furnish material. And finally, when they got
 out their pipes and went serenely puffing around, the very summit of glory was 
reached.Tom decided that he could be independent of Becky Thatcher now. Glory wa
s sufficient. He would live for glory. Now that he was distinguished, maybe she 
would be wanting to "make up." Well, let her -- she should see that he could be 
as indifferent as some other people. Presently she arrived. Tom pretended not to
 see her. He moved away and joined a group of boys and girls and began to talk. 
Soon he observed that she was tripping gayly back and forth with flushed face an
d dancing eyes, pretending to be busy chasing schoolmates, and screaming with la
ughter when she made a capture;-185-but he noticed that she always made her capt
ures in his vicinity, and that she seemed to cast a conscious eye in his directi
on at such times, too. It gratified all the vicious vanity that was in him; and 
so, instead of winning him, it only "set him up" the more and made him the more 
diligent to avoid betraying that he knew she was about. Presently she gave over 
skylarking, and moved irresolutely about, sighing once or twice and glancing fur
tively and wistfully toward Tom. Then she observed that now Tom was talking more
 particularly to Amy Lawrence than to any one else. She felt a sharp pang and gr
ew disturbed and uneasy at once. She tried to go away, but her feet were treache
rous, and carried her to the group instead. She said to a girl almost at Tom's e
lbow -- with sham vivacity:"Why, Mary Austin! you bad girl, why didn't you come 
to Sunday-school?""I did come -- didn't you see me?""Why, no! Did you? Where did
 you sit?""I was in Miss Peters' class, where I always go. I saw you.""Did you? 
Why, it's funny I didn't see you. I wanted to tell you about the picnic.""Oh, th
at's jolly. Who's going to give it?""My ma's going to let me have one.""Oh, good
y; I hope she'll let me come.""Well, she will. The picnic's for me. She'll let a
nybody come that I want, and I want you.""That's ever so nice. When is it going 
to be?"-186-"By and by. Maybe about vacation.""Oh, won't it be fun! You going to
 have all the girls and boys?""Yes, every one that's friends to me -- or wants t
o be"; and she glanced ever so furtively at Tom, but he talked right along to Am
y Lawrence about the terrible storm on the island, and how the lightning tore th
e great sycamore tree "all to flinders" while he was "standing within three feet
 of it.""Oh, may I come?" said Grace Miller."Yes.""And me?" said Sally Rogers."Y
es.""And me, too?" said Susy Harper. "And Joe?""Yes."And so on, with clapping of
 joyful hands till all the group had begged for invitations but Tom and Amy. The
n Tom turned coolly away, still talking, and took Amy with him. Becky's lips tre
mbled and the tears came to her eyes; she hid these signs with a forced gayety a
nd went on chattering, but the life had gone out of the picnic, now, and out of 
everything else; she got away as soon as she could and hid herself and had what 
her sex call "a good cry." Then she sat moody, with wounded pride, till the bell
 rang. She roused up, now, with a vindictive cast in her eye, and gave her plait
ed tails a shake and said she knew what she'd do.At recess Tom continued his fli
rtation with Amy with jubilant self-satisfaction. And he kept drifting-187-about
 to find Becky and lacerate her with the performance. At last hespied her, but t
here was a sudden falling of his mercury. She was sitting cosily on a little ben
ch behind the schoolhouse looking at a picture-book with Alfred Temple -- and so
 absorbed were they, and their heads so close together over the book, that they 
did not seem to be conscious of anything in the world besides. Jealousy ran red-
hot through Tom's veins. He began to hate himself for throwing away the chance B
ecky had offered for a reconciliation. He called himself a fool, and all the har
d names he could think of. He wanted to cry with vexation. Amy chatted happily a
long, as they walked, for her heart was singing, but Tom's tongue had lost its f
unction. He did not hear what Amy was saying, and whenever she paused expectantl
y he could only stammer an awkward assent, which was as often misplaced as other
wise. He kept drifting to the rear of the school-house, again and again, to sear
 his eyeballs with the hateful spectacle there. He could not help it. And it mad
dened him to see, as he thought he saw, that Becky Thatcher never once suspected
 that he was even in the land of the living. But she did see, nevertheless; and 
she knew she was winning her fight, too, and was glad to see him suffer as she h
ad suffered.Amy's happy prattle became intolerable. Tom hinted at things he had 
to attend to; things that must be done; and time was fleeting. But in vain-188--
- the girl chirped on. Tom thought, "Oh, hang her, ain't I ever going to get rid
 of her?" At last he must be attending to those things -- and she said artlessly
 that she would be "around" when school let out. And he hastened away, hating he
r for it."Any other boy!" Tom thought, grating his teeth. "Any boy in the whole 
town but that Saint Louis smarty that thinks he dresses so fine and is aristocra
cy! Oh, all right, I licked you the first day you ever saw this town, mister, an
d I'll lick you again! You just wait till I catch you out! I'll just take and --
 "And he went through the motions of thrashing an imaginary boy -- pummelling th
e air, and kicking and gouging. "Oh, you do, do you? You holler 'nough, do you? 
Now, then, let that learn you!" And so the imaginary flogging was finished to hi
s satisfaction.Tom fled home at noon. His conscience could not endure any more o
f Amy's grateful happiness, and his jealousy could bear no more of the other dis
tress. Becky resumed her picture inspections with Alfred, but as the minutes dra
gged along and no Tom came to suffer, her triumph began to cloud and she lost in
terest; gravity and absent-mindedness followed, and then melancholy; two or thre
e times she pricked up her ear at a footstep, but it was a false hope; no Tom ca
me. At last she grew entirely miserable and wished she hadn't carried it so far.
 When poor Alfred, seeing that he was losing her,-189-he did not know how, kept 
exclaiming: "Oh,here's a jolly one! look at this!" she lost patience at last, an
d said, "Oh, don't bother me! I don't care for them!" and burst into tears, and 
got up and walked away.Alfred dropped alongside and was going to try to comfort 
her, but she said:"Go away and leave me alone, can't you! I hate you!"So the boy
 halted, wondering what he could have done -- for she had said she would look at
 pictures all through the nooning -- and she walked on, crying. Then Alfred went
 musing into the deserted school-house. He was humiliated and angry. He easily g
uessed his way to the truth -- the girl had simply made a convenience of him to 
vent her spite upon Tom Sawyer. He was far from hating Tom the less when this th
ought occurred to him. He wished there was some way to get that boy into trouble
 without much risk to himself. Tom's spelling-book fell under his eye. Here was 
his opportunity. He gratefully opened to the lesson for the afternoon and poured
 ink upon the page.Becky, glancing in at a window behind him at the moment, saw 
the act, and moved on, without discovering herself. She started homeward, now, i
ntending to find Tom and tell him; Tom would be thankful and their troubles woul
d be healed. Before she was half way home, however, she had changed her mind. Th
e thought of Tom's treatment of her-190-when she was talking about her picnic ca
me scorching back and filled her with shame. She resolved to let him get whipped
 on the damaged spelling-book's account, and to hate him forever, into the barga
in.-191-Chapter XIXTOM arrived at home in a dreary mood, and the first thing his
 aunt said to him showed him that he had brought his sorrows to an unpromising m
arket:"Tom, I've a notion to skin you alive!""Auntie, what have I done?""Well, y
ou've done enough. Here I go over to Sereny Harper, like an old softy, expecting
 I'm going to make her believe all that rubbage about that dream, when lo and be
hold you she'd found out from Joe that you was over here and heard all the talk 
we had that night. Tom, I don't know what is to become of a boy that will act li
ke that. It makes me feel so bad to think you could let me go to Sereny Harper a
nd make such a fool of myself and never say a word."This was a new aspect of the
 thing. His smartness of the morning had seemed to Tom a good joke before, and v
ery ingenious. It merely looked mean and shabby now. He hung his head and could 
not think of anything to say for a moment. Then he said:-192-"Auntie, I wish I h
adn't done it -- but I didn't think.""Oh, child, you never think. You never thin
k of anything but your own selfishness. You could think to come all the way over
 here from Jackson's Island in the night to laugh at our troubles, and you could
 think to fool me with a lie about a dream; but you couldn't ever think to pity 
us and save us from sorrow.""Auntie, I know now it was mean, but I didn't mean t
o be mean. I didn't, honest. And besides, I didn't come over here to laugh at yo
u that night.""What did you come for, then?""It was to tell you not to be uneasy
 about us, because we hadn't got drownded.""Tom, Tom, I would be the thankfulles
t soul in this world if I could believe you ever had as good a thought as that, 
but you know you never did -- and I know it, Tom.""Indeed and 'deed I did, aunti
e -- I wish I may never stir if I didn't.""Oh, Tom, don't lie -- don't do it. It
 only makes things a hundred times worse.""It ain't a lie, auntie; it's the trut
h. I wanted to keep you from grieving -- that was all that made me come.""I'd gi
ve the whole world to believe that -- it would cover up a power of sins, Tom. I'
d 'most be glad you'd run off and acted so bad. But it ain't reasonable; because
, why didn't you tell me, child?"-193-"Why, you see, when you got to talking abo
ut the funeral, I just got all full of the idea of our coming and hiding in the 
church, and I couldn't somehow bear to spoil it. So I just put the bark back in 
my pocket and kept mum.""What bark?""The bark I had wrote on to tell you we'd go
ne pirating. I wish, now, you'd waked up when I kissed you -- I do, honest."The 
hard lines in his aunt's face relaxed and a sudden tenderness dawned in her eyes
." Did you kiss me, Tom?""Why, yes, I did.""Are you sure you did, Tom?""Why, yes
, I did, auntie -- certain sure.""What did you kiss me for, Tom?""Because I love
d you so, and you laid there moaning and I was so sorry."The words sounded like 
truth. The old lady could not hide a tremor in her voice when she said:"Kiss me 
again, Tom! -- and be off with you to school, now, and don't bother me any more.
"The moment he was gone, she ran to a closet and got out the ruin of a jacket wh
ich Tom had gone pirating in. Then she stopped, with it in her hand, and said to
 herself:"No, I don't dare. Poor boy, I reckon he's lied about it -- but it's a 
blessed, blessed lie, there's such a comfort come from it. I hope the Lord -- I 
know the Lord will forgive him, because it was such-194-goodheartedness in him t
o tell it. But I don't want to find out it's a lie. I won't look."She put the ja
cket away, and stood by musing a minute. Twice she put out her hand to take the 
garment again, and twice she refrained. Once more she ventured, and this time sh
e fortified herself with the thought: "It's a good lie -- it's a good lie -- I w
on't let it grieve me." So she sought the jacket pocket. A moment later she was 
reading Tom's piece of bark through flowing tears and saying: "I could forgive t
he boy, now, if he'd committed a million sins!"-195-Chapter XXTHERE was somethin
g about Aunt Polly's manner, when she kissed Tom, that swept away his low spirit
s and made him light-hearted and happy again. He started to school and had the l
uck of coming upon Becky Thatcher at the head of Meadow Lane. His mood always de
termined his manner. Without a moment's hesitation he ran to her and said:"I act
ed mighty mean to-day, Becky, and I'm so sorry. I won't ever, ever do that way a
gain, as long as ever I live -- please make up, won't you?"The girl stopped and 
looked him scornfully in the face:"I'll thank you to keep yourself to yourself, 
Mr. Thomas Sawyer. I'll never speak to you again."She tossed her head and passed
 on. Tom was so stunned that he had not even presence of mind enough to say "Who
 cares, Miss Smarty?" until the right time to say it had gone by. So he said not
hing. But he was in a fine rage, nevertheless. He moped into the schoolyard wish
ing she were a boy, and imagining how he would trounce her if she-196-were. He p
resently encountered her and delivered a stinging remark as he passed. She hurle
d one in return, and the angry breach was complete. It seemed to Becky, in her h
ot resentment, that she could hardly wait for school to "take in," she was so im
patient to see Tom flogged for the injured spelling-book. If she had had any lin
gering notion of exposing Alfred Temple, Tom's offensive fling had driven it ent
irely away.Poor girl, she did not know how fast she was nearing trouble herself.
 The master, Mr. Dobbins, had reached middle age with an unsatisfied ambition. T
he darling of his desires was, to be a doctor, but poverty had decreed that he s
hould be nothing higher than a village schoolmaster. Every day he took a mysteri
ous book out of his desk and absorbed himself in it at times when no classes wer
e reciting. He kept that book under lock and key. There was not an urchin in sch
ool but was perishing to have a glimpse of it, but the chance never came. Every 
boy and girl had a theory about the nature of that book; but no two theories wer
e alike, and there was no way of getting at the facts in the case. Now, as Becky
 was passing by the desk, which stood near the door, she noticed that the key wa
s in the lock! It was a precious moment. She glanced around; found herself alone
, and the next instant she had the book in her hands. The title-page -- Professo
r Somebody's ANATOMY -- carried no information to her mind; so she began to turn
 the leaves. She-197-came at once upon a handsomely engraved and colored frontis
piece -- a human figure, stark naked. At that moment a shadow fell on the page a
nd Tom Sawyer stepped in at the door and caught a glimpse of the picture. Becky 
snatched at the book to close it, and had the hard luck to tear the pictured pag
e half down the middle. She thrust the volume into the desk, turned the key, and
 burst out crying with shame and vexation."Tom Sawyer, you are just as mean as y
ou can be, to sneak up on a person and look at what they're looking at.""How cou
ld I know you was looking at anything?""You ought to be ashamed of yourself, Tom
 Sawyer; you know you're going to tell on me, and oh, what shall I do, what shal
l I do! I'll be whipped, and I never was whipped in school."Then she stamped her
 little foot and said:" Be so mean if you want to! I know something that's going
 to happen. You just wait and you'll see! Hateful, hateful, hateful!" -- and she
 flung out of the house with a new explosion of crying.Tom stood still, rather f
lustered by this onslaught. Presently he said to himself:"What a curious kind of
 a fool a girl is! Never been licked in school! Shucks! What's a licking! That's
 just like a girl -- they're so thin-skinned and chicken-hearted. Well, of cours
e I ain't going to tell old Dobbins on this little fool, because there's-198-oth
er ways of getting even on her, that ain't so mean; but what of it? Old Dobbins 
will ask who it was tore his book. Nobody'll answer. Then he'll do just the way 
he always does -- ask first one and then t'other, and when he comes to the right
 girl he'll know it, without any telling. Girls' faces always tell on them. They
 ain't got any backbone. She'll get licked. Well, it's a kind of a tight place f
or Becky Thatcher, because there ain't any way out of it." Tom conned the thing 
a moment longer, and then added: "All right, though; she'd like to see me in jus
t such a fix -- let her sweat it out!"Tom joined the mob of skylarking scholars 
outside. In a few moments the master arrived and school "took in." Tom did not f
eel a strong interest in his studies. Every time he stole a glance at the girls'
 side of the room Becky's face troubled him. Considering all things, he did not 
want to pity her, and yet it was all he could do to help it. He could get up no 
exultation that was really worthy the name. Presently the spelling-book discover
y was made, and Tom's mind was entirely full of his own matters for a while afte
r that. Becky roused up from her lethargy of distress and showed good interest i
n the proceedings. She did not expect that Tom could get out of his trouble by d
enying that he spilt the ink on the book himself; and she was right. The denial 
only seemed to make the thing worse for Tom. Becky supposed she would be glad of
 that, and she tried to believe she was glad-199-of it, but she found she was no
t certain. When the worst came to the worst, she had an impulse to get up and te
ll on Alfred Temple, but she made an effort and forced herself to keep still -- 
because, said she to herself, "he'll tell about me tearing the picture sure. I w
ouldn't say a word, not to save his life!"Tom took his whipping and went back to
 his seat not at all broken-hearted, for he thought it was possible that he had 
unknowingly upset the ink on the spelling-book himself, in some skylarking bout 
-- he had denied it for form's sake and because it was custom, and had stuck to 
the denial from principle.A whole hour drifted by, the master sat nodding in his
 throne, the air was drowsy with the hum of study. By and by, Mr. Dobbins straig
htened himself up, yawned, then unlocked his desk, and reached for his book, but
 seemed undecided whether to take it out or leave it. Most of the pupils glanced
 up languidly, but there were two among them that watched his movements with int
ent eyes. Mr. Dobbins fingered his book absently for a while, then took it out a
nd settled himself in his chair to read! Tom shot a glance at Becky. He had seen
 a hunted and helpless rabbit look as she did, with a gun levelled at its head. 
Instantly he forgot his quarrel with her. Quick -- something must be done! done 
in a flash, too! But the very imminence of the emergency paralyzed his invention
. Good! -- he had an inspiration! He would run and snatch the-200-book, spring t
hrough the door and fly. But his resolution shook for one little instant, and th
e chance was lost -- the master opened the volume. If Tom only had the wasted op
portunity back again! Too late. There was no help for Becky now, he said. The ne
xt moment the master faced the school. Every eye sank under his gaze. There was 
that in it which smote even the innocent with fear. There was silence while one 
might count ten -- the master was gathering his wrath. Then he spoke: "Who tore 
this book?"There was not a sound. One could have heard a pin drop. The stillness
 continued; the master searched face after face for signs of guilt."Benjamin Rog
ers, did you tear this book?"A denial. Another pause."Joseph Harper, did you?"An
other denial. Tom's uneasiness grew more and more intense under the slow torture
 of these proceedings. The master scanned the ranks of boys -- considered a whil
e, then turned to the girls:"Amy Lawrence?"A shake of the head."Gracie Miller?"T
he same sign."Susan Harper, did you do this?"Another negative. The next girl was
 Becky Thatcher. Tom was trembling from head to foot with excitement and a sense
 of the hopelessness of the situation.-201-"Rebecca Thatcher" [Tom glanced at he
r face -- it was white with terror] -- "did you tear -- no, look me in the face"
 [her hands rose in appeal] -- "did you tear this book?"A thought shot like ligh
tning through Tom's brain. He sprang to his feet and shouted -- " I done it!"The
 school stared in perplexity at this incredible folly. Tom stood a moment, to ga
ther his dismembered faculties; and when he stepped forward to go to his punishm
ent the surprise, the gratitude, the adoration that shone upon him out of poor B
ecky's eyes seemed pay enough for a hundred floggings. Inspired by the splendor 
of his own act, he took without an outcry the most merciless flaying that even M
r. Dobbins had ever administered; and also received with indifference the added 
cruelty of a command to remain two hours after school should be dismissed -- for
 he knew who would wait for him outside till his captivity was done, and not cou
nt the tedious time as loss, either.Tom went to bed that night planning vengeanc
e against Alfred Temple; for with shame and repentance Becky had told him all, n
ot forgetting her own treachery; but even the longing for vengeance had to give 
way, soon, to pleasanter musings, and he fell asleep at last with Becky's latest
 words lingering dreamily in his ear --"Tom, how could you be so noble!"-202-Cha
pter XXIVACATION was approaching. The school-master, always severe, grew severer
 and more exacting than ever, for he wanted the school to make a good showing on
 "Examination" day. His rod and his ferule were seldom idle now -- at least amon
g the smaller pupils. Only the biggest boys, and young ladies of eighteen and tw
enty, escaped lashing. Mr. Dobbins' lashings were very vigorous ones, too; for a
lthough he carried, under his wig, a perfectly bald and shiny head, he had only 
reached middle age, and there was no sign of feebleness in his muscle. As the gr
eat day approached, all the tyranny that was in him came to the surface; he seem
ed to take a vindictive pleasure in punishing the least shortcomings. The conseq
uence was, that the smaller boys spent their days in terror and suffering and th
eir nights in plotting revenge. They threw away no opportunity to do the master 
a mischief. But he kept ahead all the time. The retribution that followed every 
vengeful success was so sweeping and majestic that the boys always retired from 
the field badly worsted. At last they conspired together-203-and hit upon a plan
 that promised a dazzling victory. They swore in the sign-painter's boy, told hi
m the scheme, and asked his help. He had his own reasons for being delighted, fo
r the master boarded in his father's family and had given the boy ample cause to
 hate him. The master's wife would go on a visit to the country in a few days, a
nd there would be nothing to interfere with the plan; the master always prepared
 himself for great occasions by getting pretty well fuddled, and the sign-painte
r's boy said that when the dominie had reached the proper condition on Examinati
on Evening he would "manage the thing" while he napped in his chair; then he wou
ld have him awakened at the right time and hurried away to school.In the fulness
 of time the interesting occasion arrived. At eight in the evening the schoolhou
se was brilliantly lighted, and adorned with wreaths and festoons of foliage and
 flowers. The master sat throned in his great chair upon a raised platform, with
 his blackboard behind him. He was looking tolerably mellow. Three rows of bench
es on each side and six rows in front of him were occupied by the dignitaries of
 the town and by the parents of the pupils. To his left, back of the rows of cit
izens, was a spacious temporary platform upon which were seated the scholars who
 were to take part in the exercises of the evening; rows of small boys, washed a
nd dressed to an intolerable state of discomfort; rows of gawky big boys; snowba
nks of-204-girls and young ladies clad in lawn and muslin and conspicuously cons
cious of their bare arms, their grandmothers' ancient trinkets, their bits of pi
nk and blue ribbon and the flowers in their hair. All the rest of the house was 
filled with non-participating scholars.The exercises began. A very little boy st
ood up and sheepishly recited, "You'd scarce expect one of my age to speak in pu
blic on the stage," etc. -- accompanying himself with the painfully exact and sp
asmodic gestures which a machine might have used -- supposing the machine to be 
a trifle out of order. But he got through safely, though cruelly scared, and got
 a fine round of applause when he made his manufactured bow and retired.A little
 shamefaced girl lisped, "Mary had a little lamb," etc., performed a compassion-
inspiring curtsy, got her meed of applause, and sat down flushed and happy.Tom S
awyer stepped forward with conceited confidence and soared into the unquenchable
 and indestructible "Give me liberty or give me death" speech, with fine fury an
d frantic gesticulation, and broke down in the middle of it. A ghastly stage-fri
ght seized him, his legs quaked under him and he was like to choke. True, he had
 the manifest sympathy of the house but he had the house's silence, too, which w
as even worse than its sympathy. The master frowned, and this completed the disa
ster. Tom struggled awhile and then retired, utterly-205-defeated. There was a w
eak attempt at applause, but it died early."The Boy Stood on the Burning Deck" f
ollowed; also "The Assyrian Came Down," and other declamatory gems. Then there w
ere reading exercises, and a spelling fight. The meagre Latin class recited with
 honor. The prime feature of the evening was in order, now -- original "composit
ions" by the young ladies. Each in her turn stepped forward to the edge of the p
latform, cleared her throat, held up her manuscript (tied with dainty ribbon), a
nd proceeded to read, with labored attention to "expression" and punctuation. Th
e themes were the same that had been illuminated upon similar occasions by their
 mothers before them, their grandmothers, and doubtless all their ancestors in t
he female line clear back to the Crusades. "Friendship" was one; "Memories of Ot
her Days"; "Religion in History"; "Dream Land"; "The Advantages of Culture"; "Fo
rms of Political Government Compared and Contrasted"; "Melancholy"; "Filial Love
"; "Heart Longings," etc., etc.A prevalent feature in these compositions was a n
ursed and petted melancholy; another was a wasteful and opulent gush of "fine la
nguage"; another was a tendency to lug in by the ears particularly prized words 
and phrases until they were worn entirely out; and a peculiarity that conspicuou
sly marked and marred them was the inveterate-206-and intolerable sermon that wa
gged its crippled tail at the end of each and every one of them. No matter what 
the subject might be, a brain-racking effort was made to squirm it into some asp
ect or other that the moral and religious mind could contemplate with edificatio
n. The glaring insincerity of these sermons was not sufficient to compass the ba
nishment of the fashion from the schools, and it is not sufficient to-day; it ne
ver will be sufficient while the world stands, perhaps. There is no school in al
l our land where the young ladies do not feel obliged to close their composition
s with a sermon; and you will find that the sermon of the most frivolous and the
 least religious girl in the school is always the longest and the most relentles
sly pious. But enough of this. Homely truth is unpalatable.Let us return to the 
"Examination." The first composition that was read was one entitled "Is this, th
en, Life?" Perhaps the reader can endure an extract from it:"In the common walks
 of life, with what delightful emotions does the youthful mind look forward to s
ome anticipated scene of festivity! Imagination is busy sketching rose-tinted pi
ctures of joy. In fancy, the voluptuous votary of fashion sees herself amid the 
festive throng, 'the observed of all observers.' Her graceful form, arrayed in s
nowy robes, is whirling through the mazes of the joyous dance; her eye is bright
est, her step is lightest in the gay assembly."In such delicious fancies time qu
ickly glides by, and the welcome hour arrives for her entrance into the Elysian 
world, of which she has had such bright dreams. How fairy-like does everything a
ppear to her enchanted vision! Each new scene is more charming than the last. Bu
t after a while she finds that beneath this goodly exterior, all is vanity:-207-
the flattery which once charmed her soul, now grates harshly upon her ear; the b
all-room has lost its charms; and with wasted health and imbittered heart, she t
urns away with the conviction that earthly pleasures cannot satisfy the longings
 of the soul!"And so forth and so on. There was a buzz of gratification from tim
e to time during the reading, accompanied by whispered ejaculations of "How swee
t!" "How eloquent!" "So true!" etc., and after the thing had closed with a pecul
iarly afflicting sermon the applause was enthusiastic.Then arose a slim, melanch
oly girl, whose face had the "interesting" paleness that comes of pills and indi
gestion, and read a "poem." Two stanzas of it will do:A MISSOURI MAIDEN'S FAREWE
LL TO ALABAMA"Alabama, good-bye! I love thee well!But yet for a while do I leave
 thee now!Sad, yes, sad thoughts of thee my heart doth swell,And burning recolle
ctions throng my brow!For I have wandered through thy flowery woods;Have roamed 
and read near Tallapoosa's stream;Have listened to Tallassee's warring floods,An
d wooed on Coosa's side Aurora's beam."Yet shame I not to bear an o'er-full hear
t,Nor blush to turn behind my tearful eyes;'Tis from no stranger land I now must
 part,'Tis to no strangers left I yield these sighs.Welcome and home were mine w
ithin this State,Whose vales I leave -- whose spires fade fast from meAnd cold m
ust be mine eyes, and heart, and tete,When, dear Alabama! they turn cold on thee
!"There were very few there who knew what "tete"-208-meant, but the poem was ver
y satisfactory, nevertheless.Next appeared a dark-complexioned, black-eyed, blac
k-haired young lady, who paused an impressive moment, assumed a tragic expressio
n, and began to read in a measured, solemn tone:A VISIONDark and tempestuous was
 night. Around the throne on high not a single star quivered; but the deep inton
ations of the heavy thunder constantly vibrated upon the ear; whilst the terrifi
c lightning revelled in angry mood through the cloudy chambers of heaven, seemin
g to scorn the power exerted over its terror by the illustrious Franklin! Even t
he boisterous winds unanimously came forth from their mystic homes, and blustere
d about as if to enhance by their aid the wildness of the scene.At such a time, 
so dark, so dreary, for human sympathy my very spirit sighed; but instead thereo
f,"My dearest friend, my counsellor, my comforter and guide --My joy in grief, m
y second bliss in joy,' came to my side. She moved like one of those bright bein
gs pictured in the sunny walks of fancy's Eden by the romantic and young, a quee
n of beauty unadorned save by her own transcendent loveliness. So soft was her s
tep, it failed to make even a sound, and but for the magical thrill imparted by 
her genial touch, as other unobtrusive beauties, she would have glided away un-p
erceived -- unsought. A strange sadness rested upon her features, like icy tears
 upon the robe of December, as she pointed to the contending elements without, a
nd bade me contemplate the two beings presented."This nightmare occupied some te
n pages of manuscript and wound up with a sermon so destructive of all hope to n
on-Presbyterians that it took the first prize. This composition was considered t
o be the very finest effort of the evening. The mayor of the village, in deliver
ing the prize to the author of it,-209-made a warm speech in which he said that 
it was by far the most "eloquent" thing he had ever listened to, and that Daniel
 Webster himself might well be proud of it.It may be remarked, in passing, that 
the number of compositions in which the word "beauteous" was over-fondled, and h
uman experience referred to as "life's page," was up to the usual average.Now th
e master, mellow almost to the verge of geniality, put his chair aside, turned h
is back to the audience, and began to draw a map of America on the blackboard, t
o exercise the geography class upon. But he made a sad business of it with his u
nsteady hand, and a smothered titter rippled over the house. He knew what the ma
tter was, and set himself to right it. He sponged out lines and remade them; but
 he only distorted them more than ever, and the tittering was more pronounced. H
e threw his entire attention upon his work, now, as if determined not to be put 
down by the mirth. He felt that all eyes were fastened upon him; he imagined he 
was succeeding, and yet the tittering continued; it even manifestly increased. A
nd well it might. There was a garret above, pierced with a scuttle over his head
; and down through this scuttle came a cat, suspended around the haunches by a s
tring; she had a rag tied about her head and jaws to keep her from mewing; as sh
e slowly descended she curved upward and clawed at the string, she swung downwar
d and clawed at the intangible air.-210-The tittering rose higher and higher -- 
the cat was within six inches of the absorbed teacher's head -- down, down, a li
ttle lower, and she grabbed his wig with her desperate claws, clung to it, and w
as snatched up into the garret in an instant with her trophy still in her posses
sion! And how the light did blaze abroad from the master's bald pate -- for the 
sign-painter's boy had gilded it!That broke up the meeting. The boys were avenge
d. Vacation had come.Note: NOTE. -- The pretended "compositions" quoted in this 
chapter are taken without alteration from a volume entitled "Prose and Poetry, b
y a Western Lady" -- but they are exactly and precisely after the schoolgirl pat
tern, and hence are much happier than any mere imitations could be.-211-Chapter 
XXIITOM joined the new order of Cadets of Temperance, being attracted by the sho
wy character of their "regalia." He promised to abstain from smoking, chewing, a
nd profanity as long as he remained a member. Now he found out a new thing -- na
mely, that to promise not to do a thing is the surest way in the world to make a
 body want to go and do that very thing. Tom soon found himself tormented with a
 desire to drink and swear; the desire grew to be so intense that nothing but th
e hope of a chance to display himself in his red sash kept him from withdrawing 
from the order. Fourth of July was coming; but he soon gave that up -- gave it u
p before he had worn his shackles over forty-eight hours -- and fixed his hopes 
upon old Judge Frazer, justice of the peace, who was apparently on his deathbed 
and would have a big public funeral, since he was so high an official. During th
ree days Tom was deeply concerned about the Judge's condition and hungry for new
s of it. Sometimes his hopes ran high -- so high that he would venture to get ou
t his regalia and practise before the looking-glass. But the Judge had a most-21
2-discouraging way of fluctuating. At last he was pronounced upon the mend -- an
d then convalescent. Tom was disgusted; and felt a sense of injury, too. He hand
ed in his resignation at once -- and that night the Judge suffered a relapse and
 died. Tom resolved that he would never trust a man like that again.The funeral 
was a fine thing. The Cadets paraded in a style calculated to kill the late memb
er with envy. Tom was a free boy again, however -- there was something in that. 
He could drink and swear, now -- but found to his surprise that he did not want 
to. The simple fact that he could, took the desire away, and the charm of it.Tom
 presently wondered to find that his coveted vacation was beginning to hang a li
ttle heavily on his hands.He attempted a diary -- but nothing happened during th
ree days, and so he abandoned it.The first of all the negro minstrel shows came 
to town, and made a sensation. Tom and Joe Harper got up a band of performers an
d were happy for two days.Even the Glorious Fourth was in some sense a failure, 
for it rained hard, there was no procession in consequence, and the greatest man
 in the world (as Tom supposed), Mr. Benton, an actual United States Senator, pr
oved an overwhelming disappointment -- for he was not twenty-five feet high, nor
 even anywhere in the neighborhood of it.-213-A circus came. The boys played cir
cus for three days afterward in tents made of rag carpeting -- admission, three 
pins for boys, two for girls -- and then circusing was abandoned.A phrenologist 
and a mesmerizer came -- and went again and left the village duller and drearier
 than ever.There were some boys-and-girls' parties, but they were so few and so 
delightful that they only made the aching voids between ache the harder.Becky Th
atcher was gone to her Constantinople home to stay with her parents during vacat
ion -- so there was no bright side to life anywhere.The dreadful secret of the m
urder was a chronic misery. It was a very cancer for permanency and pain.Then ca
me the measles.During two long weeks Tom lay a prisoner, dead to the world and i
ts happenings. He was very ill, he was interested in nothing. When he got upon h
is feet at last and moved feebly down-town, a melancholy change had come over ev
erything and every creature. There had been a "revival," and everybody had "got 
religion," not only the adults, but even the boys and girls. Tom went about, hop
ing against hope for the sight of one blessed sinful face, but disappointment cr
ossed him everywhere. He found Joe Harper studying a Testament, and turned sadly
 away from the depressing spectacle. He sought Ben Rogers, and found him visitin
g the-214-poor with a basket of tracts. He hunted up Jim Hollis, who called his 
attention to the precious blessing of his late measles as a warning. Every boy h
e encountered added another ton to his depression; and when, in desperation, he 
flew for refuge at last to the bosom of Huckleberry Finn and was received with a
 Scriptural quotation, his heart broke and he crept home and to bed realizing th
at he alone of all the town was lost, forever and forever.And that night there c
ame on a terrific storm, with driving rain, awful claps of thunder and blinding 
sheets of lightning. He covered his head with the bedclothes and waited in a hor
ror of suspense for his doom; for he had not the shadow of a doubt that all this
 hubbub was about him. He believed he had taxed the forbearance of the powers ab
ove to the extremity of endurance and that this was the result. It might have se
emed to him a waste of pomp and ammunition to kill a bug with a battery of artil
lery, but there seemed nothing incongruous about the getting up such an expensiv
e thunder-storm as this to knock the turf from under an insect like himself.By a
nd by the tempest spent itself and died without accomplishing its object. The bo
y's first impulse was to be grateful, and reform. His second was to wait -- for 
there might not be any more storms.The next day the doctors were back; Tom had r
elapsed. The three weeks he spent on his back-215-this time seemed an entire age
. When he got abroad at last he was hardly grateful that he had been spared, rem
embering how lonely was his estate, how companionless and forlorn he was. He dri
fted listlessly down the street and found Jim Hollis acting as judge in a juveni
le court that was trying a cat for murder, in the presence of her victim, a bird
. He found Joe Harper and Huck Finn up an alley eating a stolen melon. Poor lads
! they -- like Tom -- had suffered a relapse.-216-Chapter XXIIIAT last the sleep
y atmosphere was stirred -- and vigorously: the murder trial came on in the cour
t. It became the absorbing topic of village talk immediately. Tom could not get 
away from it. Every reference to the murder sent a shudder to his heart, for his
 troubled conscience and fears almost persuaded him that these remarks were put 
forth in his hearing as "feelers"; he did not see how he could be suspected of k
nowing anything about the murder, but still he could not be comfortable in the m
idst of this gossip. It kept him in a cold shiver all the time. He took Huck to 
a lonely place to have a talk with him. It would be some relief to unseal his to
ngue for a little while; to divide his burden of distress with another sufferer.
 Moreover, he wanted to assure himself that Huck had remained discreet."Huck, ha
ve you ever told anybody about -- that?""'Bout what?""You know what.""Oh -- 'cou
rse I haven't."-217-"Never a word?""Never a solitary word, so help me. What make
s you ask?""Well, I was afeard.""Why, Tom Sawyer, we wouldn't be alive two days 
if that got found out. You know that."Tom felt more comfortable. After a pause:"
Huck, they couldn't anybody get you to tell, could they?""Get me to tell? Why, i
f I wanted that half-breed devil to drownd me they could get me to tell. They ai
n't no different way.""Well, that's all right, then. I reckon we're safe as long
 as we keep mum. But let's swear again, anyway. It's more surer.""I'm agreed."So
 they swore again with dread solemnities."What is the talk around, Huck? I've he
ard a power of it.""Talk? Well, it's just Muff Potter, Muff Potter, Muff Potter 
all the time. It keeps me in a sweat, constant, so's I want to hide som'ers.""Th
at's just the same way they go on round me. I reckon he's a goner. Don't you fee
l sorry for him, sometimes?""Most always -- most always. He ain't no account; bu
t then he hain't ever done anything to hurt anybody. Just fishes a little, to ge
t money to get drunk on -- and loafs around considerable; but lord, we all do th
at -- leastways most of us ---218-preachers and such like. But he's kind of good
 -- he give me half a fish, once, when there warn't enough for two; and lots of 
times he's kind of stood by me when I was out of luck.""Well, he's mended kites 
for me, Huck, and knitted hooks on to my line. I wish we could get him out of th
ere.""My! we couldn't get him out, Tom. And besides, 'twouldn't do any good; the
y'd ketch him again.""Yes -- so they would. But I hate to hear 'em abuse him so 
like the dickens when he never done -- that.""I do too, Tom. Lord, I hear 'em sa
y he's the bloodiest looking villain in this country, and they wonder he wasn't 
ever hung before.""Yes, they talk like that, all the time. I've heard 'em say th
at if he was to get free they'd lynch him.""And they'd do it, too."The boys had 
a long talk, but it brought them little comfort. As the twilight drew on, they f
ound themselves hanging about the neighborhood of the little isolated jail, perh
aps with an undefined hope that something would happen that might clear away the
ir difficulties. But nothing happened; there seemed to be no angels or fairies i
nterested in this luckless captive.The boys did as they had often done before --
 went to the cell grating and gave Potter some tobacco-219-and matches. He was o
n the ground floor and there were no guards.His gratitude for their gifts had al
ways smote their consciences before -- it cut deeper than ever, this time. They 
felt cowardly and treacherous to the last degree when Potter said:"You've been m
ighty good to me, boys -- better'n anybody else in this town. And I don't forget
 it, I don't. Often I says to myself, says I, 'I used to mend all the boys' kite
s and things, and show 'em where the good fishin' places was, and befriend 'em w
hat I could, and now they've all forgot old Muff when he's in trouble; but Tom d
on't, and Huck don't -- they don't forget him, says I, 'and I don't forget them.
' Well, boys, I done an awful thing -- drunk and crazy at the time -- that's the
 only way I account for it -- and now I got to swing for it, and it's right. Rig
ht, and best, too, I reckon -- hope so, anyway. Well, we won't talk about that. 
I don't want to make you feel bad; you've befriended me. But what I want to say,
 is, don't you ever get drunk -- then you won't ever get here. Stand a litter fu
rder west -- so -- that's it; it's a prime comfort to see faces that's friendly 
when a body's in such a muck of trouble, and there don't none come here but your
n. Good friendly faces -- good friendly faces. Git up on one another's backs and
 let me touch 'em. That's it. Shake hands -- yourn'll come through the bars, but
 mine's too big. Little hands, and weak -- but they've helped Muff-220-Potter a 
power, and they'd help him more if they could."Tom went home miserable, and his 
dreams that night were full of horrors. The next day and the day after, he hung 
about the court-room, drawn by an almost irresistible impulse to go in, but forc
ing himself to stay out. Huck was having the same experience. They studiously av
oided each other. Each wandered away, from time to time, but the same dismal fas
cination always brought them back presently. Tom kept his ears open when idlers 
sauntered out of the court-room, but invariably heard distressing news -- the to
ils were closing more and more relentlessly around poor Potter. At the end of th
e second day the village talk was to the effect that Injun Joe's evidence stood 
firm and unshaken, and that there was not the slightest question as to what the 
jury's verdict would be.Tom was out late, that night, and came to bed through th
e window. He was in a tremendous state of excitement. It was hours before he got
 to sleep. All the village flocked to the court-house the next morning, for this
 was to be the great day. Both sexes were about equally represented in the packe
d audience. After a long wait the jury filed in and took their places; shortly a
fterward, Potter, pale and haggard, timid and hopeless, was brought in, with cha
ins upon him, and seated where all the curious eyes could stare at him; no less 
conspicuous was Injun Joe, stolid as ever. There was another-221-pause, and then
 the judge arrived andthe sheriff proclaimed the opening of the court. The usual
 whisperings among the lawyers and gathering together of papers followed. These 
details and accompanying delays worked up an atmosphere of preparation that was 
as impressive as it was fascinating.Now a witness was called who testified that 
he found Muff Potter washing in the brook, at an early hour of the morning that 
the murder was discovered, and that he immediately sneaked away. After some furt
her questioning, counsel for the prosecution said:"Take the witness."The prisone
r raised his eyes for a moment, but dropped them again when his own counsel said
:"I have no questions to ask him."The next witness proved the finding of the kni
fe near the corpse. Counsel for the prosecution said:"Take the witness.""I have 
no questions to ask him," Potter's lawyer replied.A third witness swore he had o
ften seen the knife in Potter's possession."Take the witness."Counsel for Potter
 declined to question him. The faces of the audience began to betray annoyance. 
Did this attorney mean to throw away his client's life without an effort?Several
 witnesses deposed concerning Potter's guilty behavior when brought to the scene
 of the-222-murder. They were allowed to leave the stand without being cross-que
stioned.Every detail of the damaging circumstances that occurred in the graveyar
d upon that morning which all present remembered so well was brought out by cred
ible witnesses, but none of them were cross-examined by Potter's lawyer. The per
plexity and dissatisfaction of the house expressed itself in murmurs and provoke
d a reproof from the bench. Counsel for the prosecution now said:"By the oaths o
f citizens whose simple word is above suspicion, we have fastened this awful cri
me, beyond all possibility of question, upon the unhappy prisoner at the bar. We
 rest our case here."A groan escaped from poor Potter, and he put his face in hi
s hands and rocked his body softly to and fro, while a painful silence reigned i
n the court-room. Many men were moved, and many women's compassion testified its
elf in tears. Counsel for the defence rose and said:"Your honor, in our remarks 
at the opening of this trial, we foreshadowed our purpose to prove that our clie
nt did this fearful deed while under the influence of a blind and irresponsible 
delirium produced by drink. We have changed our mind. We shall not offer that pl
ea." [Then to the clerk:] "Call Thomas Sawyer!"A puzzled amazement awoke in ever
y face in the house, not even excepting Potter's. Every eye fastened itself with
 wondering interest upon Tom as he-223-rose and took his place upon the stand. T
he boy looked wild enough, for he was badly scared. The oath was administered."T
homas Sawyer, where were you on the seventeenth of June, about the hour of midni
ght?"Tom glanced at Injun Joe's iron face and his tongue failed him. The audienc
e listened breathless, but the words refused to come. After a few moments, howev
er, the boy got a little of his strength back, and managed to put enough of it i
nto his voice to make part of the house hear:"In the graveyard!""A little bit lo
uder, please. Don't be afraid. You were -- ""In the graveyard."A contemptuous sm
ile flitted across Injun Joe's face."Were you anywhere near Horse Williams' grav
e?""Yes, sir.""Speak up -- just a trifle louder. How near were you?""Near as I a
m to you.""Were you hidden, or not?""I was hid.""Where?""Behind the elms that's 
on the edge of the grave."Injun Joe gave a barely perceptible start."Any one wit
h you?"-224-"Yes, sir. I went there with -- ""Wait -- wait a moment. Never mind 
mentioning your companion's name. We will produce him at the proper time. Did yo
u carry anything there with you."Tom hesitated and looked confused."Speak out, m
y boy -- don't be diffident. The truth is always respectable. What did you take 
there?""Only a -- a -- dead cat."There was a ripple of mirth, which the court ch
ecked."We will produce the skeleton of that cat. Now, my boy, tell us everything
 that occurred -- tell it in your own way -- don't skip anything, and don't be a
fraid."Tom began -- hesitatingly at first, but as he warmed to his subject his w
ords flowed more and more easily; in a little while every sound ceased but his o
wn voice; every eye fixed itself upon him; with parted lips and bated breath the
 audience hung upon his words, taking no note of time, rapt in the ghastly fasci
nations of the tale. The strain upon pent emotion reached its climax when the bo
y said:" -- and as the doctor fetched the board around and Muff Potter fell, Inj
un Joe jumped with the knife and -- "Crash! Quick as lightning the half-breed sp
rang for a window, tore his way through all opposers, and was gone!-225-Chapter 
XXIVTOM was a glittering hero once more -- the pet of the old, the envy of the y
oung. His name even went into immortal print, for the village paper magnified hi
m. There were some that believed he would be President, yet, if he escaped hangi
ng.As usual, the fickle, unreasoning world took Muff Potter to its bosom and fon
dled him as lavishly as it had abused him before. But that sort of conduct is to
 the world's credit; therefore it is not well to find fault with it.Tom's days w
ere days of splendor and exultation to him, but his nights were seasons of horro
r. Injun Joe infested all his dreams, and always with doom in his eye. Hardly an
y temptation could persuade the boy to stir abroad after nightfall. Poor Huck wa
s in the same state of wretchedness and terror, for Tom had told the whole story
 to the lawyer the night before the great day of the trial, and Huck was sore af
raid that his share in the business might leak out, yet, notwithstanding Injun J
oe's flight had saved him the suffering of testifying in court. The poor fellow 
had got the attorney to promise secrecy, but-226-what of that? Since Tom's haras
sed conscience had managed to drive him to the lawyer's house by night and wring
 a dread tale from lips that had been sealed with the dismalest and most formida
ble of oaths, Huck's confidence in the human race was well-nigh obliterated.Dail
y Muff Potter's gratitude made Tom glad he had spoken; but nightly he wished he 
had sealed up his tongue.Half the time Tom was afraid Injun Joe would never be c
aptured; the other half he was afraid he would be. He felt sure he never could d
raw a safe breath again until that man was dead and he had seen the corpse.Rewar
ds had been offered, the country had been scoured, but no Injun Joe was found. O
ne of those omniscient and awe-inspiring marvels, a detective, came up from St. 
Louis, moused around, shook his head, looked wise, and made that sort of astound
ing success which members of that craft usually achieve. That is to say, he "fou
nd a clew." But you can't hang a "clew" for murder, and so after that detective 
had got through and gone home, Tom felt just as insecure as he was before.The sl
ow days drifted on, and each left behind it a slightly lightened weight of appre
hension.-227-Chapter XXVTHERE comes a time in every rightly-constructed boy's li
fe when he has a raging desire to go somewhere and dig for hidden treasure. This
 desire suddenly came upon Tom one day. He sallied out to find Joe Harper, but f
ailed of success. Next he sought Ben Rogers; he had gone fishing. Presently he s
tumbled upon Huck Finn the Red-Handed. Huck would answer. Tom took him to a priv
ate place and opened the matter to him confidentially. Huck was willing. Huck wa
s always willing to take a hand in any enterprise that offered entertainment and
 required no capital, for he had a troublesome superabundance of that sort of ti
me which is not money. "Where'll we dig?" said Huck."Oh, most anywhere.""Why, is
 it hid all around?""No, indeed it ain't. It's hid in mighty particular places, 
Huck -- sometimes on islands, sometimes in rotten chests under the end of a limb
 of an old dead tree, just where the shadow falls at midnight; but mostly under 
the floor in ha'nted houses.""Who hides it?"-228-"Why, robbers, of course -- who
'd you reckon? Sunday-school sup'rintendents?""I don't know. If 'twas mine I wou
ldn't hide it; I'd spend it and have a good time.""So would I. But robbers don't
 do that way. They always hide it and leave it there.""Don't they come after it 
any more?""No, they think they will, but they generally forget the marks, or els
e they die. Anyway, it lays there a long time and gets rusty; and by and by some
body finds an old yellow paper that tells how to find the marks -- a paper that'
s got to be ciphered over about a week because it's mostly signs and hy'roglyphi
cs.""HyroQwhich?""Hy'roglyphics -- pictures and things, you know, that don't see
m to mean anything.""Have you got one of them papers, Tom?""No.""Well then, how 
you going to find the marks?""I don't want any marks. They always bury it under 
a ha'nted house or on an island, or under a dead tree that's got one limb sticki
ng out. Well, we've tried Jackson's Island a little, and we can try it again som
e time; and there's the old ha'nted house up the Still-House branch, and there's
 lots of deadlimb trees -- dead loads of 'em.""Is it under all of them?""How you
 talk! No!""Then how you going to know which one to go for?"-229-"Go for all of 
'em!""Why, Tom, it'll take all summer.""Well, what of that? Suppose you find a b
rass pot with a hundred dollars in it, all rusty and gray, or rotten chest full 
of di'monds. How's that?"Huck's eyes glowed."That's bully. Plenty bully enough f
or me. Just you gimme the hundred dollars and I don't want no di'monds.""All rig
ht. But I bet you I ain't going to throw off on di'monds. Some of 'em's worth tw
enty dollars apiece -- there ain't any, hardly, but's worth six bits or a dollar
.""No! Is that so?""Cert'nly -- anybody'll tell you so. Hain't you ever seen one
, Huck?""Not as I remember.""Oh, kings have slathers of them.""Well, I don' know
 no kings, Tom.""I reckon you don't. But if you was to go to Europe you'd see a 
raft of 'em hopping around.""Do they hop?""Hop? -- your granny! No!""Well, what 
did you say they did, for?""Shucks, I only meant you'd see 'em -- not hopping, o
f course -- what do they want to hop for? -- but I mean you'd just see 'em -- sc
attered around, you know, in a kind of a general way. Like that old humpbacked R
ichard.""Richard? What's his other name?"-230-"He didn't have any other name. Ki
ngs don't have any but a given name.""No?""But they don't.""Well, if they like i
t, Tom, all right; but I don't want to be a king and have only just a given name
, like a nigger. But say -- where you going to dig first?""Well, I don't know. S
'pose we tackle that old dead-limb tree on the hill t'other side of Still-House 
branch?""I'm agreed."So they got a crippled pick and a shovel, and set out on th
eir three-mile tramp. They arrived hot and panting, and threw themselves down in
 the shade of a neighboring elm to rest and have a smoke."I like this," said Tom
."So do I.""Say, Huck, if we find a treasure here, what you going to do with you
r share?""Well, I'll have pie and a glass of soda every day, and I'll go to ever
y circus that comes along. I bet I'll have a gay time.""Well, ain't you going to
 save any of it?""Save it? What for?""Why, so as to have something to live on, b
y and by.""Oh, that ain't any use. Pap would come back to thish-yer town some da
y and get his claws on it-231-if I didn't hurry up, and I tell you he'd clean it
 out pretty quick. What you going to do with yourn, Tom?""I'm going to buy a new
 drum, and a sure-'nough sword, and a red necktie and a bull pup, and get marrie
d.""Married!""That's it.""Tom, you -- why, you ain't in your right mind.""Wait -
- you'll see.""Well, that's the foolishest thing you could do. Look at pap and m
y mother. Fight! Why, they used to fight all the time. I remember, mighty well."
"That ain't anything. The girl I'm going to marry won't fight.""Tom, I reckon th
ey're all alike. They'll all comb a body. Now you better think 'bout this awhile
. I tell you you better. What's the name of the gal?""It ain't a gal at all -- i
t's a girl.""It's all the same, I reckon; some says gal, some says girl -- both'
s right, like enough. Anyway, what's her name, Tom?""I'll tell you some time -- 
not now.""All right -- that'll do. Only if you get married I'll be more lonesome
r than ever.""No you won't. You'll come and live with me. Now stir out of this a
nd we'll go to digging."They worked and sweated for half an hour. No-232-result.
 They toiled another half-hour. Still no result. Huck said:"Do they always bury 
it as deep as this?""Sometimes -- not always. Not generally. I reckon we haven't
 got the right place."So they chose a new spot and began again. The labor dragge
d a little, but still they made progress. They pegged away in silence for some t
ime. Finally Huck leaned on his shovel, swabbed the beaded drops from his brow w
ith his sleeve, and said:"Where you going to dig next, after we get this one?""I
 reckon maybe we'll tackle the old tree that's over yonder on Cardiff Hill back 
of the widow's.""I reckon that'll be a good one. But won't the widow take it awa
y from us, Tom? It's on her land.""She take it away! Maybe she'd like to try it 
once. Whoever finds one of these hid treasures, it belongs to him. It don't make
 any difference whose land it's on."That was satisfactory. The work went on. By 
and by Huck said:"Blame it, we must be in the wrong place again. What do you thi
nk?""It is mighty curious, Huck. I don't understand it. Sometimes witches interf
ere. I reckon maybe that's what's the trouble now.""Shucks! Witches ain't got no
 power in the daytime."-233-"Well, that's so. I didn't think of that. Oh, I know
 what the matter is! What a blamed lot of fools we are! You got to find out wher
e the shadow of the limb falls at midnight, and that's where you dig!""Then cons
ound it, we've fooled away all this work for nothing. Now hang it all, we got to
 come back in the night. It's an awful long way. Can you get out?""I bet I will.
 We've got to do it to-night, too, because if somebody sees these holes they'll 
know in a minute what's here and they'll go for it.""Well, I'll come around and 
maow to-night.""All right. Let's hide the tools in the bushes."The boys were the
re that night, about the appointed time. They sat in the shadow waiting. It was 
a lonely place, and an hour made solemn by old traditions. Spirits whispered in 
the rustling leaves, ghosts lurked in the murky nooks, the deep baying of a houn
d floated up out of the distance, an owl answered with his sepulchral note. The 
boys were subdued by these solemnities, and talked little. By and by they judged
 that twelve had come; they marked where the shadow fell, and began to dig. Thei
r hopes commenced to rise. Their interest grew stronger, and their industry kept
 pace with it. The hole deepened and still deepened, but every time their hearts
 jumped to hear the pick strike upon something, they only suffered a new disappo
intment. It was only a stone or a chunk. At last Tom said:-234-"It ain't any use
, Huck, we're wrong again.""Well, but we can't be wrong. We spotted the shadder 
to a dot.""I know it, but then there's another thing.""What's that?"."Why, we on
ly guessed at the time. Like enough it was too late or too early."Huck dropped h
is shovel."That's it," said he. "That's the very trouble. We got to give this on
e up. We can't ever tell the right time, and besides this kind of thing's too aw
ful, here this time of night with witches and ghosts a-fluttering around so. I f
eel as if something's behind me all the time; and I'm afeard to turn around, bec
uz maybe there's others in front a-waiting for a chance. I been creeping all ove
r, ever since I got here.""Well, I've been pretty much so, too, Huck. They most 
always put in a dead man when they bury a treasure under a tree, to look out for
 it.""Lordy!""Yes, they do. I've always heard that.""Tom, I don't like to fool a
round much where there's dead people. A body's bound to get into trouble with 'e
m, sure.""I don't like to stir 'em up, either. S'pose this one here was to stick
 his skull out and say something!""Don't Tom! It's awful.""Well, it just is. Huc
k, I don't feel comfortable a bit."-235-"Say, Tom, let's give this place up, and
 try somewheres else.""All right, I reckon we better.""What'll it be?"Tom consid
ered awhile; and then said:"The ha'nted house. That's it!""Blame it, I don't lik
e ha'nted houses, Tom. Why, they're a dern sight worse'n dead people. Dead peopl
e might talk, maybe, but they don't come sliding around in a shroud, when you ai
n't noticing, and peep over your shoulder all of a sudden and grit their teeth, 
the way a ghost does. I couldn't stand such a thing as that, Tom -- nobody could
.""Yes, but, Huck, ghosts don't travel around only at night. They won't hender u
s from digging there in the daytime.""Well, that's so. But you know mighty well 
people don't go about that ha'nted house in the day nor the night.""Well, that's
 mostly because they don't like to go where a man's been murdered, anyway -- but
 nothing's ever been seen around that house except in the night -- just some blu
e lights slipping by the windows -- no regular ghosts.""Well, where you see one 
of them blue lights flickering around, Tom, you can bet there's a ghost mighty c
lose behind it. It stands to reason. Becuz you know that they don't anybody but 
ghosts use 'em."-236-"Yes, that's so. But anyway they don't come around in the d
aytime, so what's the use of our being afeard?""Well, all right. We'll tackle th
e ha'nted house if you say so -- but I reckon it's taking chances."They had star
ted down the hill by this time. There in the middle of the moonlit valley below 
them stood the "ha'nted" house, utterly isolated, its fences gone long ago, rank
 weeds smothering the very doorsteps, the chimney crumbled to ruin, the window-s
ashes vacant, a corner of the roof caved in. The boys gazed awhile, half expecti
ng to see a blue light flit past a window; then talking in a low tone, as befitt
ed the time and the circumstances, they struck far off to the right, to give the
 haunted house a wide berth, and took their way homeward through the woods that 
adorned the rearward side of Cardiff Hill.-237-Chapter XXVIABOUT noon the next d
ay the boys arrived at the dead tree; they had come for their tools. Tom was imp
atient to go to the haunted house; Huck was measurably so, also -- but suddenly 
said:"Lookyhere, Tom, do you know what day it is?"Tom mentally ran over the days
 of the week, and then quickly lifted his eyes with a startled look in them --"M
y! I never once thought of it, Huck!""Well, I didn't neither, but all at once it
 popped onto me that it was Friday.""Blame it, a body can't be too careful, Huck
. We might 'a' got into an awful scrape, tackling such a thing on a Friday.""Mig
ht ! Better say we would! There's some lucky days, maybe, but Friday ain't.""Any
 fool knows that. I don't reckon you was the first that found it out, Huck.""Wel
l, I never said I was, did I? And Friday ain't all, neither. I had a rotten bad 
dream last night -- dreampt about rats.""No! Sure sign of trouble. Did they figh
t?""No."-238-"Well, that's good, Huck. When they don't fight it's only a sign th
at there's trouble around, you know. All we got to do is to look mighty sharp an
d keep out of it. We'll drop this thing for to-day, and play. Do you know Robin 
Hood, Huck?""No. Who's Robin Hood?""Why, he was one of the greatest men that was
 ever in England -- and the best. He was a robber.""Cracky, I wisht I was. Who d
id he rob?""Only sheriffs and bishops and rich people and kings, and such like. 
But he never bothered the poor. He loved 'em. He always divided up with 'em perf
ectly square.""Well, he must 'a' been a brick.""I bet you he was, Huck. Oh, he w
as the noblest man that ever was. They ain't any such men now, I can tell you. H
e could lick any man in England, with one hand tied behind him; and he could tak
e his yew bow and plug a ten-cent piece every time, a mile and a half.""What's a
 yew bow?""I don't know. It's some kind of a bow, of course. And if he hit that 
dime only on the edge he would set down and cry -- and curse. But we'll play Rob
in Hood -- it's nobby fun. I'll learn you.""I'm agreed."So they played Robin Hoo
d all the afternoon, now and then casting a yearning eye down upon the haunted h
ouse and passing a remark about the-239-morrow's prospects and possibilities the
re. As the sun began to sink into the west they took their way homeward athwart 
the long shadows of the trees and soon were buried from sight in the forests of 
Cardiff Hill.On Saturday, shortly after noon, the boys were at the dead tree aga
in. They had a smoke and a chat in the shade, and then dug a little in their las
t hole, not with great hope, but merely because Tom said there were so many case
s where people had given up a treasure after getting down within six inches of i
t, and then somebody else had come along and turned it up with a single thrust o
f a shovel. The thing failed this time, however, so the boys shouldered their to
ols and went away feeling that they had not trifled with fortune, but had fulfil
led all the requirements that belong to the business of treasure-hunting.When th
ey reached the haunted house there was something so weird and grisly about the d
ead silence that reigned there under the baking sun, and something so depressing
 about the loneliness and desolation of the place, that they were afraid, for a 
moment, to venture in. Then they crept to the door and took a trembling peep. Th
ey saw a weed-grown, floorless room, unplastered, an ancient fireplace, vacant w
indows, a ruinous staircase; and here, there, and everywhere hung ragged and aba
ndoned cobwebs. They presently entered, softly, with quickened pulses, talking i
n whispers, ears alert-240-to catch the slightest sound, and muscles tense and r
eady for instant retreat.In a little while familiarity modified their fears and 
they gave the place a critical and interested examination, rather admiring their
 own boldness, and wondering at it, too. Next they wanted to look up-stairs. Thi
s was something like cutting off retreat, but they got to daring each other, and
 of course there could be but one result -- they threw their tools into a corner
 and made the ascent. Up there were the same signs of decay. In one corner they 
found a closet that promised mystery, but the promise was a fraud -- there was n
othing in it. Their courage was up now and well in hand. They were about to go d
own and begin work when --"Sh!" said Tom."What is it?" whispered Huck, blanching
 with fright."Sh! ... There! ... Hear it?""Yes! ... Oh, my! Let's run!""Keep sti
ll! Don't you budge! They're coming right toward the door."The boys stretched th
emselves upon the floor with their eyes to knot-holes in the planking, and lay w
aiting, in a misery of fear."They've stopped.... No -- coming.... Here they are.
 Don't whisper another word, Huck. My goodness, I wish I was out of this!"Two me
n entered. Each boy said to himself: "There's the old deaf and dumb Spaniard tha
t's-241-been about town once or twice lately -- never saw t'other man before.""T
'other" was a ragged, unkempt creature, with nothing very pleasant in his face. 
The Spaniard was wrapped in a serape; he had bushy white whiskers; long white ha
ir flowed from under his sombrero, and he wore green goggles. When they came in,
 "t'other" was talking in a low voice; they sat down on the ground, facing the d
oor, with their backs to the wall, and the speaker continued his remarks. His ma
nner became less guarded and his words more distinct as he proceeded:"No," said 
he, "I've thought it all over, and I don't like it. It's dangerous.""Dangerous!"
 grunted the "deaf and dumb" Spaniard -- to the vast surprise of the boys. "Milk
sop!"This voice made the boys gasp and quake. It was Injun Joe's! There was sile
nce for some time. Then Joe said:"What's any more dangerous than that job up yon
der -- but nothing's come of it.""That's different. Away up the river so, and no
t another house about. 'Twon't ever be known that we tried, anyway, long as we d
idn't succeed.""Well, what's more dangerous than coming here in the daytime! -- 
anybody would suspicion us that saw us.""I know that. But there warn't any other
 place as handy after that fool of a job. I want to quit-242-this shanty. I want
ed to yesterday, only it warn't any use trying to stir out of here, with those i
nfernal boys playing over there on the hill right in full view.""Those infernal 
boys" quaked again under the inspiration of this remark, and thought how lucky i
t was that they had remembered it was Friday and concluded to wait a day. They w
ished in their hearts they had waited a year.The two men got out some food and m
ade a luncheon. After a long and thoughtful silence, Injun Joe said:"Look here, 
lad -- you go back up the river where you belong. Wait there till you hear from 
me. I'll take the chances on dropping into this town just once more, for a look.
 We'll do that 'dangerous' job after I've spied around a little and think things
 look well for it. Then for Texas! We'll leg it together!"This was satisfactory.
 Both men presently fell to yawning, and Injun Joe said:"I'm dead for sleep! It'
s your turn to watch."He curled down in the weeds and soon began to snore. His c
omrade stirred him once or twice and he became quiet. Presently the watcher bega
n to nod; his head drooped lower and lower, both men began to snore now.The boys
 drew a long, grateful breath. Tom whispered:"Now's our chance -- come!"-243-Huc
k said:"I can't -- I'd die if they was to wake."Tom urged -- Huck held back. At 
last Tom rose slowly and softly, and started alone. But the first step he made w
rung such a hideous creak from the crazy floor that he sank down almost dead wit
h fright. He never made a second attempt. The boys lay there counting the draggi
ng moments till it seemed to them that time must be done and eternity growing gr
ay; and then they were grateful to note that at last the sun was setting.Now one
 snore ceased. Injun Joe sat up, stared around -- smiled grimly upon his comrade
, whose head was drooping upon his knees -- stirred him up with his foot and sai
d:"Here! You're a watchman, ain't you! All right, though -- nothing's happened."
"My! have I been asleep?""Oh, partly, partly. Nearly time for us to be moving, p
ard. What'll we do with what little swag we've got left?""I don't know -- leave 
it here as we've always done, I reckon. No use to take it away till we start sou
th. Six hundred and fifty in silver's something to carry.""Well -- all right -- 
it won't matter to come here once more.""No -- but I'd say come in the night as 
we used to do -- it's better.""Yes: but look here; it may be a good while-244-be
fore I get the right chance at that job; accidents might happen; 'tain't in such
 a very good place; we'll just regularly bury it -- and bury it deep.""Good idea
," said the comrade, who walked across the room, knelt down, raised one of the r
earward hearth-stones and took out a bag that jingled pleasantly. He subtracted 
from it twenty or thirty dollars for himself and as much for Injun Joe, and pass
ed the bag to the latter, who was on his knees in the corner, now, digging with 
his bowie-knife.The boys forgot all their fears, all their miseries in an instan
t. With gloating eyes they watched every movement. Luck! -- the splendor of it w
as beyond all imagination! Six hundred dollars was money enough to make half a d
ozen boys rich! Here was treasurehunting under the happiest auspices -- there wo
uld not be any bothersome uncertainty as to where to dig. They nudged each other
 every moment -- eloquent nudges and easily understood, for they simply meant --
 "Oh, but ain't you glad now we're here!"Joe's knife struck upon something."Hell
o!" said he."What is it?" said his comrade."Half-rotten plank -- no, it's a box,
 I believe. Here -- bear a hand and we'll see what it's here for. Never mind, I'
ve broke a hole."He reached his hand in and drew it out --"Man, it's money!"-245
-The two men examined the handful of coins. They were gold. The boys above were 
as excited as themselves, and as delighted.Joe's comrade said:"We'll make quick 
work of this. There's an old rusty pick over amongst the weeds in the corner the
 other side of the fireplace -- I saw it a minute ago."He ran and brought the bo
ys' pick and shovel. Injun Joe took the pick, looked it over critically, shook h
is head, muttered something to himself, and then began to use it. The box was so
on unearthed. It was not very large; it was iron bound and had been very strong 
before the slow years had injured it. The men contemplated the treasure awhile i
n blissful silence."Pard, there's thousands of dollars here," said Injun Joe."'T
was always said that Murrel's gang used to be around here one summer," the stran
ger observed."I know it," said Injun Joe; "and this looks like it, I should say.
""Now you won't need to do that job."The half-breed frowned. Said he:"You don't 
know me. Least you don't know all about that thing. 'Tain't robbery altogether -
- it's revenge!" and a wicked light flamed in his eyes. "I'll need your help in 
it. When it's finished -- then Texas. Go home to your Nance and your kids, and s
tand by till you hear from me."-246-"Well -- if you say so; what'll we do with t
his -- bury it again?""Yes. [Ravishing delight overhead.] No ! by the great Sach
em, no! [Profound distress overhead.] I'd nearly forgot. That pick had fresh ear
th on it! [The boys were sick with terror in a moment.] What business has a pick
 and a shovel here? What business with fresh earth on them? Who brought them her
e -- and where are they gone? Have you heard anybody? -- seen anybody? What! bur
y it again and leave them to come and see the ground disturbed? Not exactly -- n
ot exactly. We'll take it to my den.""Why, of course! Might have thought of that
 before. You mean Number One?""No -- Number Two -- under the cross. The other pl
ace is bad -- too common.""All right. It's nearly dark enough to start."Injun Jo
e got up and went about from window to window cautiously peeping out. Presently 
he said:"Who could have brought those tools here? Do you reckon they can be up-s
tairs?"The boys' breath forsook them. Injun Joe put his hand on his knife, halte
d a moment, undecided, and then turned toward the stairway. The boys thought of 
the closet, but their strength was gone. The steps came creaking up the stairs -
- the intolerable distress of the situation woke the stricken resolution of the 
lads -- they were about to spring for the closet, when there was a crash of rott
en timbers-247-and Injun Joe landed on the ground amid the debris of the ruined 
stairway. He gathered himself up cursing, and his comrade said:"Now what's the u
se of all that? If it's anybody, and they're up there, let them stay there -- wh
o cares? If they want to jump down, now, and get into trouble, who objects? It w
ill be dark in fifteen minutes -- and then let them follow us if they want to. I
'm willing. In my opinion, whoever hove those things in here caught a sight of u
s and took us for ghosts or devils or something. I'll bet they're running yet."J
oe grumbled awhile; then he agreed with his friend that what daylight was left o
ught to be economized in getting things ready for leaving. Shortly afterward the
y slipped out of the house in the deepening twilight, and moved toward the river
 with their precious box.Tom and Huck rose up, weak but vastly relieved, and sta
red after them through the chinks between the logs of the house. Follow? Not the
y. They were content to reach ground again without broken necks, and take the to
wnward track over the hill. They did not talk much. They were too much absorbed 
in hating themselves -- hating the ill luck that made them take the spade and th
e pick there. But for that, Injun Joe never would have suspected. He would have 
hidden the silver with the gold to wait there till his "revenge" was satisfied, 
and then he would have had the misfortune to find that money turn up missing. Bi
tter, bitter luck that the tools were ever brought there!They resolved to keep a
 lookout for that Spaniard when he should come to town spying out for chances to
 do his revengeful job, and follow him to "Number Two," wherever that might be. 
Then a ghastly thought occurred to Tom."Revenge? What if he means us, Huck!""Oh,
 don't!" said Huck, nearly fainting.They talked it all over, and as they entered
 town they agreed to believe that he might possibly mean somebody else -- at lea
st that he might at least mean nobody but Tom, since only Tom had testified.Very
, very small comfort it was to Tom to be alone in danger! Company would be a pal
pable improvement, he thought.-249-Chapter XXVIITHE adventure of the day mightil
y tormented Tom's dreams that night. Four times he had his hands on that rich tr
easure and four times it wasted to nothingness in his fingers as sleep forsook h
im and wakefulness brought back the hard reality of his misfortune. As he lay in
 the early morning recalling the incidents of his great adventure, he noticed th
at they seemed curiously subdued and far away -- somewhat as if they had happene
d in another world, or in a time long gone by. Then it occurred to him that the 
great adventure itself must be a dream! There was one very strong argument in fa
vor of this idea -- namely, that the quantity of coin he had seen was too vast t
o be real. He had never seen as much as fifty dollars in one mass before, and he
 was like all boys of his age and station in life, in that he imagined that all 
references to "hundreds" and "thousands" were mere fanciful forms of speech, and
 that no such sums really existed in the world. He never had supposed for a mome
nt that so large a sum as a hundred dollars was to be found in actual money in a
ny one's possession. If his notions of hidden treasure had been-250-analyzed, th
ey would have been found to consist of a handful of real dimes and a bushel of v
ague, splendid, ungraspable dollars.But the incidents of his adventure grew sens
ibly sharper and clearer under the attrition of thinking them over, and so he pr
esently found himself leaning to the impression that the thing might not have be
en a dream, after all. This uncertainty must be swept away. He would snatch a hu
rried breakfast and go and find Huck. Huck was sitting on the gunwale of a flatb
oat, listlessly dangling his feet in the water and looking very melancholy. Tom 
concluded to let Huck lead up to the subject. If he did not do it, then the adve
nture would be proved to have been only a dream."Hello, Huck!""Hello, yourself."
Silence, for a minute."Tom, if we'd 'a' left the blame tools at the dead tree, w
e'd 'a' got the money. Oh, ain't it awful!""'Tain't a dream, then, 'tain't a dre
am! Somehow I most wish it was. Dog'd if I don't, Huck.""What ain't a dream?""Oh
, that thing yesterday. I been half thinking it was.""Dream! If them stairs hadn
't broke down you'd 'a' seen how much dream it was! I've had dreams enough all n
ight -- with that patch-eyed Spanish devil going for me all through 'em -- rot h
im!"-251-"No, not rot him. Find him! Track the money!""Tom, we'll never find him
. A feller don't have only one chance for such a pile -- and that one's lost. I'
d feel mighty shaky if I was to see him, anyway.""Well, so'd I; but I'd like to 
see him, anyway -- and track him out -- to his Number Two.""Number Two -- yes, t
hat's it. I been thinking 'bout that. But I can't make nothing out of it. What d
o you reckon it is?""I dono. It's too deep. Say, Huck -- maybe it's the number o
f a house!""Goody! ... No, Tom, that ain't it. If it is, it ain't in this one-ho
rse town. They ain't no numbers here.""Well, that's so. Lemme think a minute. He
re -- it's the number of a room -- in a tavern, you know!""Oh, that's the trick!
 They ain't only two taverns. We can find out quick.""You stay here, Huck, till 
I come."Tom was off at once. He did not care to have Huck's company in public pl
aces. He was gone half an hour. He found that in the best tavern, No. 2 had long
 been occupied by a young lawyer, and was still so occupied. In the less ostenta
tious house, No. 2 was a mystery. The tavern-keeper's young son said it was kept
 locked all the time, and he never saw anybody go into it or come out of it-252-
except at night; he did not know any particular reason for this state of things;
 had had some little curiosity, but it was rather feeble; had made the most of t
he mystery by entertaining himself with the idea that that room was "ha'nted"; h
ad noticed that there was a light in there the night before."That's what I've fo
und out, Huck. I reckon that's the very No. 2 we're after.""I reckon it is, Tom.
 Now what you going to do?""Lemme think."Tom thought a long time. Then he said:"
I'll tell you. The back door of that No. 2 is the door that comes out into that 
little close alley between the tavern and the old rattle trap of a brick store. 
Now you get hold of all the door-keys you can find, and I'll nip all of auntie's
, and the first dark night we'll go there and try 'em. And mind you, keep a look
out for Injun Joe, because he said he was going to drop into town and spy around
 once more for a chance to get his revenge. If you see him, you just follow him;
 and if he don't go to that No. 2, that ain't the place.""Lordy, I don't want to
 foller him by myself!""Why, it'll be night, sure. He mightn't ever see you -- a
nd if he did, maybe he'd never think anything.""Well, if it's pretty dark I reck
on I'll track him. I dono -- I dono. I'll try.""You bet I'll follow him, if it's
 dark, Huck.-253-Why, he might 'a' found out he couldn't get his revenge, and be
 going right after that money.""It's so, Tom, it's so. I'll foller him; I will, 
by jingoes!""Now you're talking! Don't you ever weaken, Huck, and I won't."-254-
Chapter XXVIIITHAT night Tom and Huck were ready for their adventure. They hung 
about the neighborhood of the tavern until after nine, one watching the alley at
 a distance and the other the tavern door. Nobody entered the alley or left it; 
nobody resembling the Spaniard entered or left the tavern door. The night promis
ed to be a fair one; so Tom went home with the understanding that if a considera
ble degree of darkness came on, Huck was to come and "maow," whereupon he would 
slip out and try the keys. But the night remained clear, and Huck closed his wat
ch and retired to bed in an empty sugar hogshead about twelve.Tuesday the boys h
ad the same ill luck. Also Wednesday. But Thursday night promised better. Tom sl
ipped out in good season with his aunt's old tin lantern, and a large towel to b
lindfold it with. He hid the lantern in Huck's sugar hogshead and the watch bega
n. An hour before midnight the tavern closed up and its lights (the only ones th
ereabouts) were put out. No Spaniard had been seen. Nobody had entered or left t
he alley. Everything-255-was auspicious. The blackness of darkness reigned, the 
perfect stillness was interrupted only by occasional mutterings of distant thund
er.Tom got his lantern, lit it in the hogshead, wrapped it closely in the towel,
 and the two adventurers crept in the gloom toward the tavern. Huck stood sentry
 and Tom felt his way into the alley. Then there was a season of waiting anxiety
 that weighed upon Huck's spirits like a mountain. He began to wish he could see
 a flash from the lantern -- it would frighten him, but it would at least tell h
im that Tom was alive yet. It seemed hours since Tom had disappeared. Surely he 
must have fainted; maybe he was dead; maybe his heart had burst under terror and
 excitement. In his uneasiness Huck found himself drawing closer and closer to t
he alley; fearing all sorts of dreadful things, and momentarily expecting some c
atastrophe to happen that would take away his breath. There was not much to take
 away, for he seemed only able to inhale it by thimblefuls, and his heart would 
soon wear itself out, the way it was beating. Suddenly there was a flash of ligh
t and Tom came tearing by him: . "Run!" said he; "run, for your life!"He needn't
 have repeated it; once was enough; Huck was making thirty or forty miles an hou
r before the repetition was uttered. The boys never stopped till they reached th
e shed of a deserted slaughter-house at the lower end of the village. Just-256-a
s they got within its shelter the storm burst and the rain poured down. As soon 
as Tom got his breath he said:"Huck, it was awful! I tried two of the keys, just
 as soft as I could; but they seemed to make such a power of racket that I could
n't hardly get my breath I was so scared. They wouldn't turn in the lock, either
. Well, without noticing what I was doing, I took hold of the knob, and open com
es the door! It warn't locked! I hopped in, and shook off the towel, and, great 
Caesar's ghost!""What! -- what'd you see, Tom?""Huck, I most stepped onto Injun 
Joe's hand!""No!""Yes! He was lying there, sound asleep on the floor, with his o
ld patch on his eye and his arms spread out.""Lordy, what did you do? Did he wak
e up?""No, never budged. Drunk, I reckon. I just grabbed that towel and started!
""I'd never 'a' thought of the towel, I bet!""Well, I would. My aunt would make 
me mighty sick if I lost it.""Say, Tom, did you see that box?""Huck, I didn't wa
it to look around. I didn't see the box, I didn't see the cross. I didn't see an
ything but a bottle and a tin cup on the floor by Injun Joe; yes, I saw two barr
els and lots more bottles in the room. Don't you see, now, what's the matter wit
h that ha'nted room?"-257-"How?""Why, it's ha'nted with whiskey! Maybe all the T
emperance Taverns have got a ha'nted room, hey, Huck?""Well, I reckon maybe that
's so. Who'd 'a' thought such a thing? But say, Tom, now's a mighty good time to
 get that box, if Injun Joe's drunk.""It is, that! You try it!"Huck shuddered."W
ell, no -- I reckon not.""And I reckon not, Huck. Only one bottle along-side of 
Injun Joe ain't enough. If there'd been three, he'd be drunk enough and I'd do i
t."There was a long pause for reflection, and then Tom said:"Lookyhere, Huck, le
ss not try that thing any more till we know Injun Joe's not in there. It's too s
cary. Now, if we watch every night, we'll be dead sure to see him go out, some t
ime or other, and then we'll snatch that box quicker'n lightning.""Well, I'm agr
eed. I'll watch the whole night long, and I'll do it every night, too, if you'll
 do the other part of the job.""All right, I will. All you got to do is to trot 
up Hooper Street a block and maow -- and if I'm asleep, you throw some gravel at
 the window and that'll fetch me.""Agreed, and good as wheat!""Now, Huck, the st
orm's over, and I'll go-258-home. It'll begin to be daylight in a couple of hour
s. You go back and watch that long, will you?""I said I would, Tom, and I will. 
I'll ha'nt that tavern every night for a year! I'll sleep all day and I'll stand
 watch all night.""That's all right. Now, where you going to sleep?""In Ben Roge
rs' hayloft. He lets me, and so does his pap's nigger man, Uncle Jake. I tote wa
ter for Uncle Jake whenever he wants me to, and any time I ask him he gives me a
 little something to eat if he can spare it. That's a mighty good nigger, Tom. H
e likes me, becuz I don't ever act as if I was above him. Sometime I've set righ
t down and eat with him. But you needn't tell that. A body's got to do things wh
en he's awful hungry he wouldn't want to do as a steady thing.""Well, if I don't
 want you in the daytime, I'll let you sleep. I won't come bothering around. Any
 time you see something's up, in the night, just skip right around and maow."-25
9-Chapter XXIXTHE first thing Tom heard on Friday morning was a glad piece of ne
ws -- Judge Thatcher's family had come back to town the night before. Both Injun
 Joe and the treasure sunk into secondary importance for a moment, and Becky too
k the chief place in the boy's interest. He saw her and they had an exhausting g
ood time playing "hispy" and "gully-keeper" with a crowd of their school-mates. 
The day was completed and crowned in a peculiarly satisfactory way: Becky teased
 her mother to appoint the next day for the long-promised and long-delayed picni
c, and she consented. The child's delight was boundless; and Tom's not more mode
rate. The invitations were sent out before sunset, and straightway the young fol
ks of the village were thrown into a fever of preparation and pleasurable antici
pation. Tom's excitement enabled him to keep awake until a pretty late hour, and
 he had good hopes of hearing Huck's "maow," and of having his treasure to aston
ish Becky and the picnickers with, next day; but he was disappointed. No signal 
came that night.-260-Morning came, eventually, and by ten or eleven o'clock a gi
ddy and rollicking company were gathered at Judge Thatcher's, and everything was
 ready for a start. It was not the custom for elderly people to mar the picnics 
with their presence. The children were considered safe enough under the wings of
 a few young ladies of eighteen and a few young gentlemen of twenty-three or the
reabouts. The old steam ferry-boat was chartered for the occasion; presently the
 gay throng filed up the main street laden with provision-baskets. Sid was sick 
and had to miss the fun; Mary remained at home to entertain him. The last thing 
Mrs. Thatcher said to Becky, was:"You'll not get back till late. Perhaps you'd b
etter stay all night with some of the girls that live near the ferry-landing, ch
ild.""Then I'll stay with Susy Harper, mamma.""Very well. And mind and behave yo
urself and don't be any trouble."Presently, as they tripped along, Tom said to B
ecky:"Say -- I'll tell you what we'll do. 'Stead of going to Joe Harper's we'll 
climb right up the hill and stop at the Widow Douglas'. She'll have ice-cream! S
he has it most every day -- dead loads of it. And she'll be awful glad to have u
s.""Oh, that will be fun!"Then Becky reflected a moment and said:"But what will 
mamma say?"-261-"How'll she ever know?"The girl turned the idea over in her mind
, and said reluctantly:"I reckon it's wrong -- but -- ""But shucks! Your mother 
won't know, and so what's the harm? All she wants is that you'll be safe; and I 
bet you she'd 'a' said go there if she'd 'a' thought of it. I know she would!"Th
e Widow Douglas' splendid hospitality was a tempting bait. It and Tom's persuasi
ons presently carried the day. So it was decided to say nothing anybody about th
e night's programme. Presently it occurred to Tom that maybe Huck might come thi
s very night and give the signal. The thought took a deal of the spirit out of h
is anticipations. Still he could not bear to give up the fun at Widow Douglas'. 
And why should he give it up, he reasoned -- the signal did not come the night b
efore, so why should it be any more likely to come to-night? The sure fun of the
 evening outweighed the uncertain treasure; and, boy-like, he determined to yiel
d to the stronger inclination and not allow himself to think of the box of money
 another time that day.Three miles below town the ferryboat stopped at the mouth
 of a woody hollow and tied up. The crowd swarmed ashore and soon the forest dis
tances and craggy heights echoed far and near with shoutings and laughter. All t
he different ways of getting hot and tired were gone through with, and by and-26
2-by the rovers straggled back to camp fortified with responsible appetites, and
 then the destruction of the good things began. After the feast there was a refr
eshing season of rest and chat in the shade of spreading oaks. By-and-by somebod
y shouted:"Who's ready for the cave?"Everybody was. Bundles of candles were proc
ured, and straightway there was a general scamper up the hill. The mouth of the 
cave was up the hillside -- an opening shaped like a letter A. Its massive oaken
 door stood unbarred. Within was a small chamber, chilly as an ice-house, and wa
lled by Nature with solid limestone that was dewy with a cold sweat. It was roma
ntic and mysterious to stand here in the deep gloom and look out upon the green 
valley shining in the sun. But the impressiveness of the situation quickly wore 
off, and the romping began again. The moment a candle was lighted there was a ge
neral rush upon the owner of it; a struggle and a gallant defence followed, but 
the candle was soon knocked down or blown out, and then there was a glad clamor 
of laughter and a new chase. But all things have an end. By-and-by the processio
n went filing down the steep descent of the main avenue, the flickering rank of 
lights dimly revealing the lofty walls of rock almost to their point of junction
 sixty feet overhead. This main avenue was not more than eight or ten feet wide.
 Every few steps other lofty and still narrower crevices branched from it on eit
her hand -- for Mc--263-Dougal's cave was but a vast labyrinth of crooked aisles
 that ran into each other and out again and led nowhere. It was said that one mi
ght wander days and nights together through its intricate tangle of rifts and ch
asms, and never find the end of the cave; and that he might go down, and down, a
nd still down, into the earth, and it was just the same -- labyrinth under labyr
inth, and no end to any of them. No man "knew" the cave. That was an impossible 
thing. Most of the young men knew a portion of it, and it was not customary to v
enture much beyond this known portion. Tom Sawyer knew as much of the cave as an
y one.The procession moved along the main avenue some three-quarters of a mile, 
and then groups and couples began to slip aside into branch avenues, fly along t
he dismal corridors, and take each other by surprise at points where the corrido
rs joined again. Parties were able to elude each other for the space of half an 
hour without going beyond the "known" ground.By-and-by, one group after another 
came straggling back to the mouth of the cave, panting, hilarious, smeared from 
head to foot with tallow drippings, daubed with clay, and entirely delighted wit
h the success of the day. Then they were astonished to find that they had been t
aking no note of time and that night was about at hand. The clanging bell had be
en calling for half an hour. However, this sort of close to the day's adventures
 was-264-romantic and therefore satisfactory.When the ferryboat with her wild fr
eight pushed into the stream, nobody cared sixpence for the wasted time but the 
captain of the craft.Huck was already upon his watch when the ferry-boat's light
s went glinting past the wharf. He heard no noise on board, for the young people
 were as subdued and still as people usually are who are nearly tired to death. 
He wondered what boat it was, and why she did not stop at the wharf -- and then 
he dropped her out of his mind and put his attention upon his business. The nigh
t was growing cloudy and dark. Ten o'clock came, and the noise of vehicles cease
d, scattered lights began to wink out, all straggling foot-passengers disappeare
d, the village betook itself to its slumbers and left the small watcher alone wi
th the silence and the ghosts. Eleven o'clock came, and the tavern lights were p
ut out; darkness everywhere, now. Huck waited what seemed a weary long time, but
 nothing happened. His faith was weakening. Was there any use? Was there really 
any use? Why not give it up and turn in?A noise fell upon his ear. He was all at
tention in an instant. The alley door closed softly. He sprang to the corner of 
the brick store. The next moment two men brushed by him, and one seemed to have 
something under his arm. It must be that box! So they were going to remove the t
reasure. Why call Tom now? It would be absurd -- the-265-men would get away with
 the box and never be found again. No, he would stick to their wake and follow t
hem; he would trust to the darkness for security from discovery. So communing wi
th himself, Huck stepped out and glided along behind the men, cat-like, with bar
e feet, allowing them to keep just far enough ahead not to be invisible.They mov
ed up the river street three blocks, then turned to the left up a cross-street. 
They went straight ahead, then, until they came to the path that led up Cardiff 
Hill; this they took. They passed by the old Welshman's house, half-way up the h
ill, without hesitating, and still climbed upward. Good, thought Huck, they will
 bury it in the old quarry. But they never stopped at the quarry. They passed on
, up the summit. They plunged into the narrow path between the tall sumach bushe
s, and were at once hidden in the gloom. Huck closed up and shortened his distan
ce, now, for they would never be able to see him. He trotted along awhile; then 
slackened his pace, fearing he was gaining too fast; moved on a piece, then stop
ped altogether; listened; no sound; none, save that he seemed to hear the beatin
g of his own heart. The hooting of an owl came over the hill -- ominous sound! B
ut no footsteps. Heavens, was everything lost! He was about to spring with winge
d feet, when a man cleared his throat not four feet from him! Huck's heart shot 
into his throat, but he swallowed it again; and then he stood there-266-shaking 
as if a dozen agues had taken charge of him at once, and so weak that he thought
 he must surely fall to the ground. He knew where he was. He knew he was within 
five steps of the stile leading into Widow Douglas' grounds. Very well, he thoug
ht, let them bury it there; it won't be hard to find.Now there was a voice -- a 
very low voice -- Injun Joe's:"Damn her, maybe she's got company -- there's ligh
ts, late as it is.""I can't see any."This was that stranger's voice -- the stran
ger of the haunted house. A deadly chill went to Huck's heart -- this, then, was
 the "revenge" job! His thought was, to fly. Then he remembered that the Widow D
ouglas had been kind to him more than once, and maybe these men were going to mu
rder her. He wished he dared venture to warn her; but he knew he didn't dare -- 
they might come and catch him. He thought all this and more in the moment that e
lapsed between the stranger's remark and Injun Joe's next -- which was --"Becaus
e the bush is in your way. Now -- this way -- now you see, don't you?""Yes. Well
, there is company there, I reckon. Better give it up.""Give it up, and I just l
eaving this country forever! Give it up and maybe never have another chance. I t
ell you again, as I've told you before, I-267-don't care for her swag -- you may
 have it. But her husband was rough on me -- many times he was rough on me -- an
d mainly he was the justice of the peace that jugged me for a vagrant. And that 
ain't all. It ain't a millionth part of it! He had me horsewhipped! -- horsewhip
ped in front of the jail, like a nigger! -- with all the town looking on! HORSEW
HIPPED! -- do you understand? He took advantage of me and died. But I'll take it
 out of her.""Oh, don't kill her! Don't do that!""Kill? Who said anything about 
killing? I would kill him if he was here; but not her. When you want to get reve
nge on a woman you don't kill her -- bosh! you go for her looks. You slit her no
strils -- you notch her ears like a sow!""By God, that's -- ""Keep your opinion 
to yourself! It will be safest for you. I'll tie her to the bed. If she bleeds t
o death, is that my fault? I'll not cry, if she does. My friend, you'll help me 
in this thing -- for MY sake -- that's why you're here -- I mightn't be able alo
ne. If you flinch, I'll kill you. Do you understand that? And if I have to kill 
you, I'll kill her -- and then I reckon nobody'll ever know much about who done 
this business.""Well, if it's got to be done, let's get at it. The quicker the b
etter -- I'm all in a shiver.""Do it now? And company there? Look here -- I'll g
et suspicious of you, first thing you know.-268-No -- we'll wait till the lights
 are out -- there's no hurry."Huck felt that a silence was going to ensue -- a t
hing still more awful than any amount of murderous talk; so he held his breath a
nd stepped gingerly back; planted his foot carefully and firmly, after balancing
, one-legged, in a precarious way and almost toppling over, first on one side an
d then on the other. He took another step back, with the same elaboration and th
e same risks; then another and another, and -- a twig snapped under his foot! Hi
s breath stopped and he listened. There was no sound -- the stillness was perfec
t. His gratitude was measureless. Now he turned in his tracks, between the walls
 of sumach bushes -- turned himself as carefully as if he were a ship -- and the
n stepped quickly but cautiously along. When he emerged at the quarry he felt se
cure, and so he picked up his nimble heels and flew. Down, down he sped, till he
 reached the Welshman's. He banged at the door, and presently the heads of the o
ld man and his two stalwart sons were thrust from windows."What's the row there?
 Who's banging? What do you want?""Let me in -- quick! I'll tell everything.""Wh
y, who are you?""Huckleberry Finn -- quick, let me in!""Huckleberry Finn, indeed
! It ain't a name to open many doors, I judge! But let him in, lads, and let's s
ee what's the trouble."-269-"Please don't ever tell I told you," were Huck's fir
st words when he got in. "Please don't -- I'd be killed, sure -- but the widow's
 been good friends to me sometimes, and I want to tell -- I will tell if you'll 
promise you won't ever say it was me.""By George, he has got something to tell, 
or he wouldn't act so!" exclaimed the old man; "out with it and nobody here'll e
ver tell, lad."Three minutes later the old man and his sons, well armed, were up
 the hill, and just entering the sumach path on tiptoe, their weapons in their h
ands. Huck accompanied them no further. He hid behind a great bowlder and fell t
o listening. There was a lagging, anxious silence, and then all of a sudden ther
e was an explosion of firearms and a cry.Huck waited for no particulars. He spra
ng away and sped down the hill as fast as his legs could carry him.-270-Chapter 
XXXAS the earliest suspicion of dawn appeared on Sunday morning, Huck came gropi
ng up the hill and rapped gently at the old Welshman's door. The inmates were as
leep, but it was a sleep that was set on a hair-trigger, on account of the excit
ing episode of the night. A call came from a window:"Who's there!"Huck's scared 
voice answered in a low tone:"Please let me in! It's only Huck Finn!""It's a nam
e that can open this door night or day, lad! -- and welcome!"These were strange 
words to the vagabond boy's ears, and the pleasantest he had ever heard. He coul
d not recollect that the closing word had ever been applied in his case before. 
The door was quickly unlocked, and he entered. Huck was given a seat and the old
 man and his brace of tall sons speedily dressed themselves."Now, my boy, I hope
 you're good and hungry, because breakfast will be ready as soon as the sun's up
, and we'll have a piping hot one, too -- make yourself easy about that! I and t
he boys hoped you'd turn up and stop here last night."-271-"I was awful scared,"
 said Huck, "and I run. I took out when the pistols went off, and I didn't stop 
for three mile. I've come now becuz I wanted to know about it, you know; and I c
ome before daylight becuz I didn't want to run across them devils, even if they 
was dead.""Well, poor chap, you do look as if you'd had a hard night of it -- bu
t there's a bed here for you when you've had your breakfast. No, they ain't dead
, lad -- we are sorry enough for that. You see we knew right where to put our ha
nds on them, by your description; so we crept along on tiptoe till we got within
 fifteen feet of them -- dark as a cellar that sumach path was -- and just then 
I found I was going to sneeze. It was the meanest kind of luck! I tried to keep 
it back, but no use -- 'twas bound to come, and it did come! I was in the lead w
ith my pistol raised, and when the sneeze started those scoundrels a-rustling to
 get out of the path, I sung out, 'Fire boys!' and blazed away at the place wher
e the rustling was. So did the boys. But they were off in a jiffy, those villain
s, and we after them, down through the woods. I judge we never touched them. The
y fired a shot apiece as they started, but their bullets whizzed by and didn't d
o us any harm. As soon as we lost the sound of their feet we quit chasing, and w
ent down and stirred up the constables. They got a posse together, and went off 
to guard the river bank, and as soon as it is light the sheriff and a gang are g
oing to beat up the-272-woods. My boys will be with them presently. I wish we ha
d some sort of description of those rascals -- 'twould help a good deal. But you
 couldn't see what they were like, in the dark, lad, I suppose?""Oh yes; I saw t
hem down-town and follered them.""Splendid! Describe them -- describe them, my b
oy!""One's the old deaf and dumb Spaniard that's ben around here once or twice, 
and t'other's a mean-looking, ragged -- ""That's enough, lad, we know the men! H
appened on them in the woods back of the widow's one day, and they slunk away. O
ff with you, boys, and tell the sheriff -- get your breakfast to-morrow morning!
"The Welshman's sons departed at once. As they were leaving the room Huck sprang
 up and exclaimed:"Oh, please don't tell anybody it was me that blowed on them! 
Oh, please!""All right if you say it, Huck, but you ought to have the credit of 
what you did.""Oh no, no! Please don't tell!"When the young men were gone, the o
ld Welshman said:"They won't tell -- and I won't. But why don't you want it know
n?"Huck would not explain, further than to say that-273-he already knew too much
 about one of those men and would not have the man know that he knew anything ag
ainst him for the whole world -- he would be killed for knowing it, sure.The old
 man promised secrecy once more, and said:"How did you come to follow these fell
ows, lad? Were they looking suspicious?"Huck was silent while he framed a duly c
autious reply. Then he said:"Well, you see, I'm a kind of a hard lot, -- least e
verybody says so, and I don't see nothing agin it -- and sometimes I can't sleep
 much, on account of thinking about it and sort of trying to strike out a new wa
y of doing. That was the way of it last night. I couldn't sleep, and so I come a
long up-street 'bout midnight, a-turning it all over, and when I got to that old
 shackly brick store by the Temperance Tavern, I backed up agin the wall to have
 another think. Well, just then along comes these two chaps slipping along close
 by me, with something under their arm, and I reckoned they'd stole it. One was 
a-smoking, and t'other one wanted a light; so they stopped right before me and t
he cigars lit up their faces and I see that the big one was the deaf and dumb Sp
aniard, by his white whiskers and the patch on his eye, and t'other one was a ru
sty, ragged-looking devil.""Could you see the rags by the light of the cigars?"-
274-This staggered Huck for a moment. Then he said:"Well, I don't know -- but so
mehow it seems as if I did.""Then they went on, and you -- ""Follered 'em -- yes
. That was it. I wanted to see what was up -- they sneaked along so. I dogged 'e
m to the widder's stile, and stood in the dark and heard the ragged one beg for 
the widder, and the Spaniard swear he'd spile her looks just as I told you and y
our two -- ""What! The deaf and dumb man said all that!"Huck had made another te
rrible mistake! He was trying his best to keep the old man from getting the fain
test hint of who the Spaniard might be, and yet his tongue seemed determined to 
get him into trouble in spite of all he could do. He made several efforts to cre
ep out of his scrape, but the old man's eye was upon him and he made blunder aft
er blunder. Presently the Welshman said:"My boy, don't be afraid of me. I wouldn
't hurt a hair of your head for all the world. No -- I'd protect you -- I'd prot
ect you. This Spaniard is not deaf and dumb; you've let that slip without intend
ing it; you can't cover that up now. You know something about that Spaniard that
 you want to keep dark. Now trust me -- tell me what it is, and trust me -- I wo
n't betray you."Huck looked into the old man's honest eyes a moment, then bent o
ver and whispered in his ear:-275-"'Tain't a Spaniard -- it's Injun Joe!"The Wel
shman almost jumped out of his chair. In a moment he said:"It's all plain enough
, now. When you talked about notching ears and slitting noses I judged that that
 was your own embellishment, because white men don't take that sort of revenge. 
But an Injun! That's a different matter altogether."During breakfast the talk we
nt on, and in the course of it the old man said that the last thing which he and
 his sons had done, before going to bed, was to get a lantern and examine the st
ile and its vicinity for marks of blood. They found none, but captured a bulky b
undle of --"Of WHAT?"If the words had been lightning they could not have leaped 
with a more stunning suddenness from Huck's blanched lips. His eyes were staring
 wide, now, and his breath suspended -- waiting for the answer. The Welshman sta
rted -- stared in return -- three seconds -- five seconds -- ten -- then replied
:"Of burglar's tools. Why, what's the matter with you?"Huck sank back, panting g
ently, but deeply, unutterably grateful. The Welshman eyed him gravely, curiousl
y -- and presently said:"Yes, burglar's tools. That appears to relieve you a goo
d deal. But what did give you that turn? What were you expecting we'd found?"-27
6-Huck was in a close place -- the inquiring eye was upon him -- he would have g
iven anything for material for a plausible answer -- nothing suggested itself --
 the inquiring eye was boring deeper and deeper -- a senseless reply offered -- 
there was no time to weigh it, so at a venture he uttered it -- feebly:"Sunday-s
chool books, maybe."Poor Huck was too distressed to smile, but the old man laugh
ed loud and joyously, shook up the details of his anatomy from head to foot, and
 ended by saying that such a laugh was money in a-man's pocket, because it cut d
own the doctor's bill like everything. Then he added:"Poor old chap, you're whit
e and jaded -- you ain't well a bit -- no wonder you're a little flighty and off
 your balance. But you'll come out of it. Rest and sleep will fetch you out all 
right, I hope."Huck was irritated to think he had been such a goose and betrayed
 such a suspicious excitement, for he had dropped the idea that the parcel broug
ht from the tavern was the treasure, as soon as he had heard the talk at the wid
ow's stile. He had only thought it was not the treasure, however -- he had not k
nown that it wasn't -- and so the suggestion of a captured bundle was too much f
or his self-possession. But on the whole he felt glad the little episode had hap
pened, for now he knew beyond all question that that bundle was not the bundle, 
and so his mind was at rest and exceedingly comfortable.-277-In fact, everything
 seemed to be drifting just in the right direction, now; the treasure must be st
ill in No. 2, the men would be captured and jailed that day, and he and Tom coul
d seize the gold that night without any trouble or any fear of interruption.Just
 as breakfast was completed there was a knock at the door. Huck jumped for a hid
ing-place, for he had no mind to be connected even remotely with the late event.
 The Welshman admitted several ladies and gentlemen, among them the Widow Dougla
s, and noticed that groups of citizens were climbing up the hill -- to stare at 
the stile. So the news had spread. The Welshman had to tell the story of the nig
ht to the visitors. The widow's gratitude for her preservation was outspoken."Do
n't say a word about it, madam. There's another that you're more beholden to tha
n you are to me and my boys, maybe, but he don't allow me to tell his name. We w
ouldn't have been there but for him."Of course this excited a curiosity so vast 
that it almost belittled the main matter -- but the Welshman allowed it to eat i
nto the vitals of his visitors, and through them be transmitted to the whole tow
n, for he refused to part with his secret. When all else had been learned, the w
idow said:"I went to sleep reading in bed and slept straight through all that no
ise. Why didn't you come and wake me?"-278-"We judged it warn't worth while. Tho
se fellows warn't likely to come again -- they hadn't any tools left to work wit
h, and what was the use of waking you up and scaring you to death? My three negr
o men stood guard at your house all the rest of the night. They've just come bac
k."More visitors came, and the story had to be told and retold for a couple of h
ours more.There was no Sabbath-school during day-school vacation, but everybody 
was early at church. The stirring event was well canvassed. News came that not a
 sign of the two villains had been yet discovered. When the sermon was finished,
 Judge Thatcher's wife dropped alongside of Mrs. Harper as she moved down the ai
sle with the crowd and said:"Is my Becky going to sleep all day? I just expected
 she would be tired to death.""Your Becky?""Yes," with a startled look -- "didn'
t she stay with you last night?""Why, no."Mrs. Thatcher turned pale, and sank in
to a pew, just as Aunt Polly, talking briskly with a friend, passed by. Aunt Pol
ly said:"Good-morning, Mrs. Thatcher. Good-morning, Mrs. Harper. I've got a boy 
that's turned up missing. I reckon my Tom stayed at your house last night -- one
 of you. And now he's afraid to come to church. I've got to settle with him."-27
9-Mrs. Thatcher shook her head feebly and turned paler than ever."He didn't stay
 with us," said Mrs. Harper, beginning to look uneasy. A marked anxiety came int
o Aunt Polly's face."Joe Harper, have you seen my Tom this morning?""No'm.""When
 did you see him last?"Joe tried to remember, but was not sure he could say. The
 people had stopped moving out of church. Whispers passed along, and a boding un
easiness took possession of every countenance. Children were anxiously questione
d, and young teachers. They all said they had not noticed whether Tom and Becky 
were on board the ferryboat on the homeward trip; it was dark; no one thought of
 inquiring if any one was missing. One young man finally blurted out his fear th
at they were still in the cave! Mrs. Thatcher swooned away. Aunt Polly fell to c
rying and wringing her hands.The alarm swept from lip to lip, from group to grou
p, from street to street, and within five minutes the bells were wildly clanging
 and the whole town was up! The Cardiff Hill episode sank into instant insignifi
cance, the burglars were forgotten, horses were saddled, skiffs were manned, the
 ferryboat ordered out, and before the horror was half an hour old, two hundred 
men were pouring down highroad and river toward the cave.-280-All the long after
noon the village seemed empty and dead. Many women visited Aunt Polly and Mrs. T
hatcher and tried to comfort them. They cried with them, too, and that was still
 better than words. All the tedious night the town waited for news; but when the
 morning dawned at last, all the word that came was, "Send more candles -- and s
end food." Mrs. Thatcher was almost crazed; and Aunt Polly, also. Judge Thatcher
 sent messages of hope and encouragement from the cave, but they conveyed no rea
l cheer.The old Welshman came home toward daylight, spattered with candle-grease
, smeared with clay, and almost worn out. He found Huck still in the bed that ha
d been provided for him, and delirious with fever. The physicians were all at th
e cave, so the Widow Douglas came and took charge of the patient. She said she w
ould do her best by him, because, whether he was good, bad, or indifferent, he w
as the Lord's, and nothing that was the Lord's was a thing to be neglected. The 
Welshman said Huck had good spots in him, and the widow said:"You can depend on 
it. That's the Lord's mark. He don't leave it off. He never does. Puts it somewh
ere on every creature that comes from his hands."Early in the forenoon parties o
f jaded men began to straggle into the village, but the strongest of the citizen
s continued searching. All the news that could be gained was that remotenesses o
f the cavern-281-were being ransacked that had never been visited before; that e
very corner and crevice was going to be thoroughly searched; that wherever one w
andered through the maze of passages, lights were to be seen flitting hither and
 thither in the distance, and shoutings and pistol-shots sent their hollow rever
berations to the ear down the sombre aisles. In one place, far from the section 
usually traversed by tourists, the names "BECKY & TOM" had been found traced upo
n the rocky wall with candle-smoke, and near at hand a grease-soiled bit of ribb
on. Mrs. Thatcher recognized the ribbon and cried over it. She said it was the l
ast relic she should ever have of her child; and that no other memorial of her c
ould ever be so precious, because this one parted latest from the living body be
fore the awful death came. Some said that now and then, in the cave, a far-away 
speck of light would glimmer, and then a glorious shout would burst forth and a 
score of men go trooping down the echoing aisle -- and then a sickening disappoi
ntment always followed; the children were not there; it was only a searcher's li
ght.Three dreadful days and nights dragged their tedious hours along, and the vi
llage sank into a hopeless stupor. No one had heart for anything. The accidental
 discovery, just made, that the proprietor of the Temperance Tavern kept liquor 
on his premises, scarcely fluttered the public pulse, tremendous as the fact was
. In a lucid interval, Huck feebly led up to the subject of taverns, and finally
-282-asked -- dimly dreading the worst -- if anything had been discovered at the
 Temperance Tavern since he had been ill."Yes," said the widow.Huck started up i
n bed, wild-eyed:"What? What was it?""Liquor! -- and the place has been shut up.
 Lie down, child -- what a turn you did give me!""Only tell me just one thing --
 only just one -- please! Was it Tom Sawyer that found it?"The widow burst into 
tears. "Hush, hush, child, hush! I've told you before, you must not talk. You ar
e very, very sick!"Then nothing but liquor had been found; there would have been
 a great powwow if it had been the gold. So the treasure was gone forever -- gon
e forever! But what could she be crying about? Curious that she should cry.These
 thoughts worked their dim way through Huck's mind, and under the weariness they
 gave him he fell asleep. The widow said to herself:"There -- he's asleep, poor 
wreck. Tom Sawyer find it! Pity but somebody could find Tom Sawyer! Ah, there ai
n't many left, now, that's got hope enough, or strength enough, either, to go on
 searching."-283-Chapter XXXINOW to return to Tom and Becky's share in the picni
c. They tripped along the murky aisles with the rest of the company, visiting th
e familiar wonders of the cave -- wonders dubbed with rather over-descriptive na
mes, such as "The Drawing-Room," "The Cathedral," "Aladdin's Palace," and so on.
 Presently the hide-and-seek frolicking began, and Tom and Becky engaged in it w
ith zeal until the exertion began to grow a trifle wearisome; then they wandered
 down a sinuous avenue holding their candles aloft and reading the tangled web-w
ork of names, dates, post-office addresses, and mottoes with which the rocky wal
ls had been frescoed (in candle-smoke). Still drifting along and talking, they s
carcely noticed that they were now in a part of the cave whose walls were not fr
escoed. They smoked their own names under an overhanging shelf and moved on. Pre
sently they came to a place where a little stream of water, trickling over a led
ge and carrying a limestone sediment with it, had, in the slow-dragging ages, fo
rmed a laced and ruffled Niagara in gleaming and imperishable stone. Tom squeeze
d his small body behind it in order toillumi--284-nate it for Becky's gratificat
ion. He found that it curtained a sort of steep natural stairway which was enclo
sed between narrow walls, and at once the ambition to be a discoverer seized him
. Becky responded to his call, and they made a smoke-mark for future guidance, a
nd started upon their quest. They wound this way and that, far down into the sec
ret depths of the cave, made another mark, and branched off in search of novelti
es to tell the upper world about. In one place they found a spacious cavern, fro
m whose ceiling depended a multitude of shining stalactites of the length and ci
rcumference of a man's leg; they walked all about it, wondering and admiring, an
d presently left it by one of the numerous passages that opened into it. This sh
ortly brought them to a bewitching spring, whose basin was incrusted with a fros
twork of glittering crystals; it was in the midst of a cavern whose walls were s
upported by many fantastic pillars which had been formed by the joining of great
 stalactites and stalagmites together, the result of the ceaseless water-drip of
 centuries. Under the roof vast knots of bats had packed themselves together, th
ousands in a bunch; the lights disturbed the creatures and they came flocking do
wn by hundreds, squeaking and darting furiously at the candles. Tom knew their w
ays and the danger of this sort of conduct. He seized Becky's hand and hurried h
er into the first corridor that offered; and none too soon, for a bat struck Bec
ky's light out with its wing while she was passing-285-out of the cavern. The ba
ts chased the children a good distance; but the fugitives plunged into every new
 passage that offered, and at last got rid of the perilous things. Tom found a s
ubterranean lake, shortly, which stretched its dim length away until its shape w
as lost in the shadows. He wanted to explore its borders, but concluded that it 
would be best to sit down and rest awhile, first. Now, for the first time, the d
eep stillness of the place laid a clammy hand upon the spirits of the children. 
Becky said:"Why, I didn't notice, but it seems ever so long since I heard any of
 the others.""Come to think, Becky, we are away down below them -- and I don't k
now how far away north, or south, or east, or whichever it is. We couldn't hear 
them here."Becky grew apprehensive."I wonder how long we've been down here, Tom?
 We better start back.""Yes, I reckon we better. P'raps we better.""Can you find
 the way, Tom? It's all a mixed-up crookedness to me.""I reckon I could find it 
-- but then the bats. If they put our candles out it will be an awful fix. Let's
 try some other way, so as not to go through there.""Well. But I hope we won't g
et lost. It would be so awful!" and the girl shuddered at the thought of the dre
adful possibilities.-286-They started through a corridor, and traversed it in si
lence a long way, glancing at each new opening, to see if there was anything fam
iliar about the look of it; but they were all strange. Every time Tom made an ex
amination, Becky would watch his face for an encouraging sign, and he would say 
cheerily:"Oh, it's all right. This ain't the one, but we'll come to it right awa
y!"But he felt less and less hopeful with each failure, and presently began to t
urn off into diverging avenues at sheer random, in desperate hope of finding the
 one that was wanted. He still said it was "all right," but there was such a lea
den dread at his heart that the words had lost their ring and sounded just as if
 he had said, "All is lost!" Becky clung to his side in an anguish of fear, and 
tried hard to keep back the tears, but they would come. At last she said:"Oh, To
m, never mind the bats, let's go back that way! We seem to get worse and worse o
ff all the time.""Listen!" said he.Profound silence; silence so deep that even t
heir breathings were conspicuous in the hush. Tom shouted. The call went echoing
 down the empty aisles and died out in the distance in a faint sound that resemb
led a ripple of mocking laughter."Oh, don't do it again, Tom, it is too horrid,"
 said Becky.-287-"It is horrid, but I better, Becky; they might hear us, you kno
w," and he shouted again.The "might" was even a chillier horror than the ghostly
 laughter, it so confessed a perishing hope. The children stood still and listen
ed; but there was no result. Tom turned upon the back track at once, and hurried
 his steps. It was but a little while before a certain indecision in his manner 
revealed another fearful fact to Becky -- he could not find his way back!"Oh, To
m, you didn't make any marks!""Becky, I was such a fool! Such a fool! I never th
ought we might want to come back! No -- I can't find the way. It's all mixed up.
""Tom, Tom, we're lost! we're lost! We never can get out of this awful place! Oh
, why did we ever leave the others!"She sank to the ground and burst into such a
 frenzy of crying that Tom was appalled with the idea that she might die, or los
e her reason. He sat down by her and put his arms around her; she buried her fac
e in his bosom, she clung to him, she poured out her terrors, her unavailing reg
rets, and the far echoes turned them all to jeering laughter. Tom begged her to 
pluck up hope again, and she said she could not. He fell to blaming and abusing 
himself for getting her into this miserable situation; this had a better effect.
 She said she would try to hope again, she would get up and follow wherever he m
ight lead if only he would not talk like that any-288-more. For he was no more t
o blame than she, she said.So they moved on again -- aimlessly -- simply at rand
om -- all they could do was to move, keep moving. For a little while, hope made 
a show of reviving -- not with any reason to back it, but only because it is its
 nature to revive when the spring has not been taken out of it by age and famili
arity with failure.By-and-by Tom took Becky's candle and blew it out. This econo
my meant so much! Words were not needed. Becky understood, and her hope died aga
in. She knew that Tom had a whole candle and three or four pieces in his pockets
 -- yet he must economize.By-and-by, fatigue began to assert its claims; the chi
ldren tried to pay attention, for it was dreadful to think of sitting down when 
time was grown to be so precious, moving, in some direction, in any direction, w
as at least progress and might bear fruit; but to sit down was to invite death a
nd shorten its pursuit.At last Becky's frail limbs refused to carry her farther.
 She sat down. Tom rested with her, and they talked of home, and the friends the
re, and the comfortable beds and, above all, the light! Becky cried, and Tom tri
ed to think of some way of comforting her, but all his encouragements were grown
 threadbare with use, and sounded like sarcasms. Fatigue bore so heavily upon Be
cky that she drowsed-289-off to sleep. Tom was grateful. He sat looking into her
 drawn face and saw it grow smooth and natural under the influence of pleasant d
reams; and by-and-by a smile dawned and rested there. The peaceful face reflecte
d somewhat of peace and healing into his own spirit, and his thoughts wandered a
way to bygone times and dreamy memories. While he was deep in his musings, Becky
 woke up with a breezy little laugh -- but it was stricken dead upon her lips, a
nd a groan followed it."Oh, how could I sleep! I wish I never, never had waked! 
No! No, I don't, Tom! Don't look so! I won't say it again.""I'm glad you've slep
t, Becky; you'll feel rested, now, and we'll find the way out.""We can try, Tom;
 but I've seen such a beautiful country in my dream. I reckon we are going there
.""Maybe not, maybe not. Cheer up, Becky, and let's go on trying."They rose up a
nd wandered along, hand in hand and hopeless. They tried to estimate how long th
ey had been in the cave, but all they knew was that it seemed days and weeks, an
d yet it was plain that this could not be, for their candles were not gone yet. 
A long time after this -- they could not tell how long -- Tom said they must go 
softly and listen for dripping water -- they must find a spring. They found one 
presently, and Tom said it was time to rest again. Both were cruelly tired, yet 
Becky said-290-she thought she could go a little farther. She was surprised to h
ear Tom dissent. She could not understand it. They sat down, and Tom fastened hi
s candle to the wall in front of them with some clay. Thought was soon busy; not
hing was said for some time. Then Becky broke the silence:"Tom, I am so hungry!"
Tom took something out of his pocket."Do you remember this?" said he.Becky almos
t smiled."It's our wedding-cake, Tom.""Yes -- I wish it was as big as a barrel, 
for it's all we've got.""I saved it from the picnic for us to dream on, Tom, the
 way grown-up people do with wedding-cake -- but it'll be our -- "She dropped th
e sentence where it was. Tom divided the cake and Becky ate with good appetite, 
while Tom nibbled at his moiety. There was abundance of cold water to finish the
 feast with. By-and-by Becky suggested that they move on again. Tom was silent a
 moment. Then he said:"Becky, can you bear it if I tell you something?"Becky's f
ace paled, but she thought she could."Well, then, Becky, we must stay here, wher
e there's water to drink. That little piece is our last candle!"Becky gave loose
 to tears and wailings. Tom did what he could to comfort her, but with little ef
fect. At length Becky said:-291-"Tom!""Well, Becky?""They'll miss us and hunt fo
r us!""Yes, they will! Certainly they will!""Maybe they're hunting for us now, T
om.""Why, I reckon maybe they are. I hope they are.""When would they miss us, To
m?""When they get back to the boat, I reckon.""Tom, it might be dark then -- wou
ld they notice we hadn't come?""I don't know. But anyway, your mother would miss
 you as soon as they got home."A frightened look in Becky's face brought Tom to 
his senses and he saw that he had made a blunder. Becky was not to have gone hom
e that night! The children became silent and thoughtful. In a moment a new burst
 of grief from Becky showed Tom that the thing in his mind had struck hers also 
-- that the Sabbath morning might be half spent before Mrs. Thatcher discovered 
that Becky was not at Mrs. Harper's.The children fastened their eyes upon their 
bit of candle and watched it melt slowly and pitilessly away; saw the half inch 
of wick stand alone at last; saw the feeble flame rise and fall, climb the thin 
column of smoke, linger at its top a moment, and then -- the horror of utter dar
kness reigned!How long afterward it was that Becky came to a slow consciousness 
that she was crying in Tom's-292-arms, neither could tell. All that they knew wa
s, that after what seemed a mighty stretch of time, both awoke out of a dead stu
por of sleep and resumed their miseries once more. Tom said it might be Sunday, 
now -- maybe Monday. He tried to get Becky to talk, but her sorrows were too opp
ressive, all her hopes were gone. Tom said that they must have been missed long 
ago, and no doubt the search was going on. He would shout and maybe some one wou
ld come. He tried it; but in the darkness the distant echoes sounded so hideousl
y that he tried it no more.The hours wasted away, and hunger came to torment the
 captives again. A portion of Tom's half of the cake was left; they divided and 
ate it. But they seemed hungrier than before. The poor morsel of food only whett
ed desire.By-and-by Tom said:" Sh! Did you hear that?"Both held their breath and
 listened. There was a sound like the faintest, far-off shout. Instantly Tom ans
wered it, and leading Becky by the hand, started groping down the corridor in it
s direction. Presently he listened again; again the sound was heard, and apparen
tly a little nearer."It's them!" said Tom; "they're coming! Come along, Becky --
 we're all right now!"The joy of the prisoners was almost overwhelming. Their sp
eed was slow, however, because pitfalls were somewhat common, and had to be guar
ded-293-against. They shortly came to one and had to stop. It might be three fee
t deep, it might be a hundred -- there was no passing it at any rate. Tom got do
wn on his breast and reached as far down as he could. No bottom. They must stay 
there and wait until the searchers came. They listened; evidently the distant sh
outings were growing more distant! a moment or two more and they had gone altoge
ther. The heart-sinking misery of it! Tom whooped until he was hoarse, but it wa
s of no use. He talked hopefully to Becky; but an age of anxious waiting passed 
and no sounds came again.The children groped their way back to the spring. The w
eary time dragged on; they slept again, and awoke famished and woe-stricken. Tom
 believed it must be Tuesday by this time.Now an idea struck him. There were som
e side passages near at hand. It would be better to explore some of these than b
ear the weight of the heavy time in idleness. He took a kite-line from his pocke
t, tied it to a projection, and he and Becky started, Tom in the lead, unwinding
 the line as he groped along. At the end of twenty steps the corridor ended in a
 "jumping-off place." Tom got down on his knees and felt below, and then as far 
around the corner as he could reach with his hands conveniently; he made an effo
rt to stretch yet a little farther to the right, and at that moment, not twenty 
yards away, a human hand, holding a candle, appeared from behind a rock! Tom lif
ted up a-294-glorious shout, and instantly that hand was followed by the body it
 belonged to -- Injun Joe's! Tom was paralyzed; he could not move. He was vastly
 gratified the next moment, to see the "Spaniard" take to his heels and get hims
elf out of sight. Tom wondered that Joe had not recognized his voice and come ov
er and killed him for testifying in court. But the echoes must have disguised th
e voice. Without doubt, that was it, he reasoned. Tom's fright weakened every mu
scle in his body. He said to himself that if he had strength enough to get back 
to the spring he would stay there, and nothing should tempt him to run the risk 
of meeting Injun Joe again. He was careful to keep from Becky what it was he had
 seen. He told her he had only shouted "for luck."But hunger and wretchedness ri
se superior to fears in the long run. Another tedious wait at the spring and ano
ther long sleep brought changes. The children awoke tortured with a raging hunge
r. Tom believed that it must be Wednesday or Thursday or even Friday or Saturday
, now, and that the search had been given over. He proposed to explore another p
assage. He felt willing to risk Injun Joe and all other terrors. But Becky was v
ery weak. She had sunk into a dreary apathy and would not be roused. She said sh
e would wait, now, where she was, and die -- it would not be long. She told Tom 
to go with the kite-line and explore if he chose; but she implored him to come b
ack every-295-little while and speak to her; and she made him promise that when 
the awful time came, he would stay by her and hold her hand until all was over.T
om kissed her, with a choking sensation in his throat, and made a show of being 
confident of finding the searchers or an escape from the cave; then he took the 
kite-line in his hand and went groping down one of the passages on his hands and
 knees, distressed with hunger and sick with bodings of coming doom.-296-Chapter
 XXXIITUESDAY afternoon came, and waned to the twilight. The village of St. Pete
rsburg still mourned. The lost children had not been found. Public prayers had b
een offered up for them, and many and many a private prayer that had the petitio
ner's whole heart in it; but still no good news came from the cave. The majority
 of the searchers had given up the quest and gone back to their daily avocations
, saying that it was plain the children could never be found. Mrs. Thatcher was 
very ill, and a great part of the time delirious. People said it was heartbreaki
ng to hear her call her child, and raise her head and listen a whole minute at a
 time, then lay it wearily down again with a moan. Aunt Polly had drooped into a
 settled melancholy, and her gray hair had grown almost white. The village went 
to its rest on Tuesday night, sad and forlorn.Away in the middle of the night a 
wild peal burst from the village bells, and in a moment the streets were swarmin
g with frantic half-clad people, who shouted, "Turn out! turn out! they're found
! they're found!" Tin pans and horns were added-297-to the din, the population m
assed itself and moved toward the river, met the children coming in an open carr
iage drawn by shouting citizens, thronged around it, joined its homeward march, 
and swept magnificently up the main street roaring huzzah after huzzah!The villa
ge was illuminated; nobody went to bed again; it was the greatest night the litt
le town had ever seen. During the first half-hour a procession of villagers file
d through Judge Thatcher's house, seized the saved ones and kissed them, squeeze
d Mrs. Thatcher's hand, tried to speak but couldn't -- and drifted out raining t
ears all over the place.Aunt Polly's happiness was complete, and Mrs. Thatcher's
 nearly so. It would be complete, however, as soon as the messenger dispatched w
ith the great news to the cave should get the word to her husband. Tom lay upon 
a sofa with an eager auditory about him and told the history of the wonderful ad
venture, putting in many striking additions to adorn it withal; and closed with 
a description of how he left Becky and went on an exploring expedition; how he f
ollowed two avenues as far as his kite-line would reach; how he followed a third
 to the fullest stretch of the kite-line, and was about to turn back when he gli
mpsed a far-off speck that looked like daylight; dropped the line and groped tow
ard it, pushed his head and shoulders through a small hole, and saw the broad Mi
ssissippi rolling by! And if it had only happened to be-298-night he would not h
ave seen that speck of daylight and would not have explored that passage any mor
e! He told how he went back for Becky and broke the good news and she told him n
ot to fret her with such stuff, for she was tired, and knew she was going to die
, and wanted to. He described how he labored with her and convinced her; and how
 she almost died for joy when she had groped to where she actually saw the blue 
speck of daylight; how he pushed his way out at the hole and then helped her out
; how they sat there and cried for gladness; how some men came along in a skiff 
and Tom hailed them and told them their situation and their famished condition; 
how the men didn't believe the wild tale at first, "because," said they, "you ar
e five miles down the river below the valley the cave is in" -- then took them a
board, rowed to a house, gave them supper, made them rest till two or three hour
s after dark and then brought them home.Before day-dawn, Judge Thatcher and the 
handful of searchers with him were tracked out, in the cave, by the twine clews 
they had strung behind them, and informed of the great news.Three days and night
s of toil and hunger in the cave were not to be shaken off at once, as Tom and B
ecky soon discovered. They were bedridden all of Wednesday and Thursday, and see
med to grow more and more tired and worn, all the time. Tom got about, a little,
 on Thursday, was down-town Friday,-299-and nearly as whole as ever Saturday; bu
t Becky did not leave her room until Sunday, and then she looked as if she had p
assed through a wasting illness.Tom learned of Huck's sickness and went to see h
im on Friday, but could not be admitted to the bedroom; neither could he on Satu
rday or Sunday. He was admitted daily after that, but was warned to keep still a
bout his adventure and introduce no exciting topic. The Widow Douglas stayed by 
to see that he obeyed. At home Tom learned of the Cardiff Hill event; also that 
the "ragged man's" body had eventually been found in the river near the ferry-la
nding; he had been drowned while trying to escape, perhaps.About a fortnight aft
er Tom's rescue from the cave, he started off to visit Huck, who had grown plent
y strong enough, now, to hear exciting talk, and Tom had some that would interes
t him, he thought. Judge Thatcher's house was on Tom's way, and he stopped to se
e Becky. The Judge and some friends set Tom to talking, and some one asked him i
ronically if he wouldn't like to go to the cave again. Tom said he thought he wo
uldn't mind it. The Judge said:"Well, there are others just like you, Tom, I've 
not the least doubt. But we have taken care of that. Nobody will get lost in tha
t cave any more.""Why?""Because I had its big door sheathed with boiler-300-iron
 two weeks ago, and triple-locked -- and I've got the keys."Tom turned as white 
as a sheet."What's the matter, boy! Here, run, somebody! Fetch a glass of water!
"The water was brought and thrown into Tom's face."Ah, now you're all right. Wha
t was the matter with you, Tom?""Oh, Judge, Injun Joe's in the cave!"-301-Chapte
r XXXIIIWITHIN a few minutes the news had spread, and a dozen skiff-loads of men
 were on their way to McDougal's cave, and the ferryboat, well filled with passe
ngers, soon followed. Tom Sawyer was in the skiff that bore Judge Thatcher.When 
the cave door was unlocked, a sorrowful sight presented itself in the dim twilig
ht of the place. Injun Joe lay stretched upon the ground, dead, with his face cl
ose to the crack of the door, as if his longing eyes had been fixed, to the late
st moment, upon the light and the cheer of the free world outside. Tom was touch
ed, for he knew by his own experience how this wretch had suffered. His pity was
 moved, but nevertheless he felt an abounding sense of relief and security, now,
 which revealed to him in a degree which he had not fully appreciated before how
 vast a weight of dread had been lying upon him since the day he lifted his voic
e against this bloody-minded outcast.Injun Joe's bowie-knife lay close by, its b
lade broken in two. The great foundation-beam of the door had been chipped and h
acked through, with-302-tedious labor; useless labor, too, it was, for the nativ
e rock formed a sill outside it, and upon that stubborn material the knife had w
rought no effect; the only damage done was to the knife itself. But if there had
 been no stony obstruction there the labor would have been useless still, for if
 the beam had been wholly cut away Injun Joe could not have squeezed his body un
der the door, and he knew it. So he had only hacked that place in order to be do
ing something -- in order to pass the weary time -- in order to employ his tortu
red faculties. Ordinarily one could find half a dozen bits of candle stuck aroun
d in the crevices of this vestibule, left there by tourists; but there were none
 now. The prisoner had searched them out and eaten them. He had also contrived t
o catch a few bats, and these, also, he had eaten, leaving only their claws. The
 poor unfortunate had starved to death. In one place, near at hand, a stalagmite
 had been slowly growing up from the ground for ages, builded by the water-drip 
from a stalactite overhead. The captive had broken off the stalagmite, and upon 
the stump had placed a stone, wherein he had scooped a shallow hollow to catch t
he precious drop that fell once in every three minutes with the dreary regularit
y of a clock-tick -- a dessertspoonful once in four and twenty hours. That drop 
was falling when the Pyramids were new; when Troy fell; when the foundations of 
Rome were laid when Christ was crucified; when the Conqueror created-303-the Bri
tish empire; when Columbus sailed; when the massacre at Lexington was "news." It
 is falling now; it will still be falling when all these things shall have sunk 
down the afternoon of history, and the twilight of tradition, and been swallowed
 up in the thick night of oblivion. Has everything a purpose and a mission? Did 
this drop fall patiently during five thousand years to be ready for this flittin
g human insect's need? and has it another important object to accomplish ten tho
usand years to come? No matter. It is many and many a year since the hapless hal
f-breed scooped out the stone to catch the priceless drops, but to this day the 
tourist stares longest at that pathetic stone and that slow-dropping water when 
he comes to see the wonders of McDougal's cave. Injun Joe's cup stands first in 
the list of the cavern's marvels; even "Aladdin's Palace" cannot rival it.Injun 
Joe was buried near the mouth of the cave; and people flocked there in boats and
 wagons from the towns and from all the farms and hamlets for seven miles around
; they brought their children, and all sorts of provisions, and confessed that t
hey had had almost as satisfactory a time at the funeral as they could have had 
at the hanging.This funeral stopped the further growth of one thing -- the petit
ion to the governor for Injun Joe's pardon. The petition had been largely signed
; many tearful and eloquent meetings had been held, and a committee of sappy wom
en been appointed to-304-go in deep mourning and wail around the governor, and i
mplore him to be a merciful ass and trample his duty under foot. Injun Joe was b
elieved to have killed five citizens of the village, but what of that? If he had
 been Satan himself there would have been plenty of weaklings ready to scribble 
their names to a pardon-petition, and drip a tear on it from their permanently i
mpaired and leaky water-works.The morning after the funeral Tom took Huck to a p
rivate place to have an important talk. Huck had learned all about Tom's adventu
re from the Welshman and the Widow Douglas, by this time, but Tom said he reckon
ed there was one thing they had not told him; that thing was what he wanted to t
alk about now. Huck's face saddened. He said:"I know what it is. You got into No
. 2 and never found anything but whiskey. Nobody told me it was you; but I just 
knowed it must 'a' ben you, soon as I heard 'bout that whiskey business; and I k
nowed you hadn't got the money becuz you'd 'a' got at me some way or other and t
old me even if you was mum to everybody else. Tom, something's always told me we
'd never get holt of that swag.""Why, Huck, I never told on that tavern-keeper. 
You know his tavern was all right the Saturday I went to the picnic. Don't you r
emember you was to watch there that night?""Oh yes! Why, it seems 'bout a year a
go. It-305-was that very night that I follered Injun Joe to the widder's.""You f
ollowed him?""Yes -- but you keep mum. I reckon Injun Joe's left friends behind 
him, and I don't want 'em souring on me and doing me mean tricks. If it hadn't b
en for me he'd be down in Texas now, all right."Then Huck told his entire advent
ure in confidence to Tom, who had only heard of the Welshman's part of it before
."Well," said Huck, presently, coming back to the main question, "whoever nipped
 the whiskey in No. 2, nipped the money, too, I reckon -- anyways it's a goner f
or us, Tom.""Huck, that money wasn't ever in No. 2!""What!" Huck searched his co
mrade's face keenly. "Tom, have you got on the track of that money again?""Huck,
 it's in the cave!"Huck's eyes blazed."Say it again, Tom.""The money's in the ca
ve!""Tom -- honest injun, now -- is it fun, or earnest?""Earnest, Huck -- just a
s earnest as ever I was in my life. Will you go in there with me and help get it
 out?""I bet I will! I will if it's where we can blaze our way to it and not get
 lost."-306-"Huck, we can do that without the least little bit of trouble in the
 world.""Good as wheat! What makes you think the money's -- ""Huck, you just wai
t till we get in there. If we don't find it I'll agree to give you my drum and e
very thing I've got in the world. I will, by jings.""All right -- it's a whiz. W
hen do you say?""Right now, if you say it. Are you strong enough?""Is it far in 
the cave? I ben on my pins a little, three or four days, now, but I can't walk m
ore'n a mile, Tom -- least I don't think I could.""It's about five mile into the
re the way anybody but me would go, Huck, but there's a mighty short cut that th
ey don't anybody but me know about. Huck, I'll take you right to it in a skiff. 
I'll float the skiff down there, and I'll pull it back again all by myself. You 
needn't ever turn your hand over.""Less start right off, Tom.""All right. We wan
t some bread and meat, and our pipes, and a little bag or two, and two or three 
kite-strings, and some of these new-fangled things they call lucifer matches. I 
tell you, many's the time I wished I had some when I was in there before."A trif
le after noon the boys borrowed a small skiff from a citizen who was absent, and
 got under way at once. When they were several miles below "Cave Hollow," Tom sa
id:-307-"Now you see this bluff here looks all alike all the way down from the c
ave hollow -- no houses, no wood-yards, bushes all alike. But do you see that wh
ite place up yonder where there's been a landslide? Well, that's one of my marks
. We'll get ashore, now."They landed."Now, Huck, where we're a-standing you coul
d touch that hole I got out of with a fishing-pole. See if you can find it."Huck
 searched all the place about, and found nothing. Tom proudly marched into a thi
ck clump of sumach bushes and said:"Here you are! Look at it, Huck; it's the snu
ggest hole in this country. You just keep mum about it. All along I've been want
ing to be a robber, but I knew I'd got to have a thing like this, and where to r
un across it was the bother. We've got it now, and we'll keep it quiet, only we'
ll let Joe Harper and Ben Rogers in -- because of course there's got to be a Gan
g, or else there wouldn't be any style about it. Tom Sawyer's Gang -- it sounds 
splendid, don't it, Huck?""Well, it just does, Tom. And who'll we rob?""Oh, most
 anybody. Waylay people -- that's mostly the way.""And kill them?""No, not alway
s. Hive them in the cave till they raise a ransom.""What's a ransom?"-308-"Money
. You make them raise all they can, off'n their friends; and after you've kept t
hem a year, if it ain't raised then you kill them. That's the general way. Only 
you don't kill the women. You shut up the women, but you don't kill them. They'r
e always beautiful and rich, and awfully scared. You take their watches and thin
gs, but you always take your hat off and talk polite. They ain't anybody as poli
te as robbers -- you'll see that in any book. Well, the women get to loving you,
 and after they've been in the cave a week or two weeks they stop crying and aft
er that you couldn't get them to leave. If you drove them out they'd turn right 
around and come back. It's so in all the books.""Why, it's real bully, Tom. I be
lieve it's better'n to be a pirate.""Yes, it's better in some ways, because it's
 close to home and circuses and all that."By this time everything was ready and 
the boys entered the hole, Tom in the lead. They toiled their way to the farther
 end of the tunnel, then made their spliced kite-strings fast and moved on. A fe
w steps brought them to the spring, and Tom felt a shudder quiver all through hi
m. He showed Huck the fragment of candle-wick perched on a lump of clay against 
the wall, and described how he and Becky had watched the flame struggle and expi
re.The boys began to quiet down to whispers, now, for the stillness and gloom of
 the place oppressed-309-their spirits. They went on, and presently entered and 
followed Tom's other corridor until they reached the "jumping-off place." The ca
ndles revealed the fact that it was not really a precipice, but only a steep cla
y hill twenty or thirty feet high. Tom whispered:"Now I'll show you something, H
uck."He held his candle aloft and said:"Look as far around the corner as you can
. Do you see that? There -- on the big rock over yonder -- done with candle-smok
e.""Tom, it's a cross!""NOW where's your Number Two? 'Under the cross,' hey? Rig
ht yonder'swhere I saw Injun Joe poke up his candle, Huck!"Huck stared at the my
stic sign awhile, and then said with a shaky voice:"Tom, less git out of here!""
What! and leave the treasure?""Yes -- leave it. Injun Joe's ghost is round about
 there, certain.""No it ain't, Huck, no it ain't. It would ha'nt the place where
 he died -- away out at the mouth of the cave -- five mile from here.""No, Tom, 
it wouldn't. It would hang round the money. I know the ways of ghosts, and so do
 you."Tom began to fear that Huck was right. Misgivings gathered in his mind. Bu
t presently an idea occurred to him ---310-"Lookyhere, Huck, what fools we're ma
king of ourselves! Injun Joe's ghost ain't a going to come around where there's 
a cross!"The point was well taken. It had its effect."Tom, I didn't think of tha
t. But that's so. It's luck for us, that cross is. I reckon we'll climb down the
re and have a hunt for that box."Tom went first, cutting rude steps in the clay 
hill as he descended. Huck followed. Four avenues opened out of the small cavern
 which the great rock stood in. The boys examined three of them with no result. 
They found a small recess in the one nearest the base of the rock, with a pallet
 of blankets spread down in it; also an old suspender, some bacon rind, and the 
well-gnawed bones of two or three fowls. But there was no money-box. The lads se
arched and researched this place, but in vain. Tom said:"He said under the cross
. Well, this comes nearest to being under the cross. It can't be under the rock 
itself, because that sets solid on the ground."They searched everywhere once mor
e, and then sat down discouraged. Huck could suggest nothing. By-and-by Tom said
:"Lookyhere, Huck, there's footprints and some candle-grease on the clay about o
ne side of this rock, but not on the other sides. Now, what's that for? I bet yo
u the money is under the rock. I'm going to dig in the clay."-311-"That ain't no
 bad notion, Tom!" said Huck with animation.Tom's "real Barlow" was out at once,
 and he had not dug four inches before he struck wood."Hey, Huck! -- you hear th
at?"Huck began to dig and scratch now. Some boards were soon uncovered and remov
ed. They had concealed a natural chasm which led under the rock. Tom got into th
is and held his candle as far under the rock as he could, but said he could not 
see to the end of the rift. He proposed to explore. He stooped and passed under;
 the narrow way descended gradually. He followed its winding course, first to th
e right, then to the left, Huck at his heels. Tom turned a short curve, by-and-b
y, and exclaimed:"My goodness, Huck, lookyhere!"It was the treasure-box, sure en
ough, occupying a snug little cavern, along with an empty powder-keg, a couple o
f guns in leather cases, two or three pairs of old moccasins, a leather belt, an
d some other rubbish well soaked with the water-drip."Got it at last!" said Huck
, ploughing among the tarnished coins with his hand. "My, but we're rich, Tom!""
Huck, I always reckoned we'd get it. It's just too good to believe, but we have 
got it, sure! Say -- let's not fool around here. Let's snake it out. Lemme see i
f I can lift the box."It weighed about fifty pounds. Tom could lift-312-it, afte
r an awkward fashion, but could not carry it conveniently."I thought so," he sai
d; "they carried it like it was heavy, that day at the ha'nted house. I noticed 
that. I reckon I was right to think of fetching the little bags along."The money
 was soon in the bags and the boys took it up to the cross rock."Now less fetch 
the guns and things," said Huck."No, Huck -- leave them there. They're just the 
tricks to have when we go to robbing. We'll keep them there all the time, and we
'll hold our orgies there, too. It's an awful snug place for orgies.""What orgie
s?""I dono. But robbers always have orgies, and of course we've got to have them
, too. Come along, Huck, we've been in here a long time. It's getting late, I re
ckon. I'm hungry, too. We'll eat and smoke when we get to the skiff."They presen
tly emerged into the clump of sumach bushes, looked warily out, found the coast 
clear, and were soon lunching and smoking in the skiff. As the sun dipped toward
 the horizon they pushed out and got under way. Tom skimmed up the shore through
 the long twilight, chatting cheerily with Huck, and landed shortly after dark."
Now, Huck," said Tom, "we'll hide the money in the loft of the widow's woodshed,
 and I'll come-313-up in the morning and we'll count it and divide, and then we'
ll hunt up a place out in the woods for it where it will be safe. Just you lay q
uiet here and watch the stuff till I run and hook Benny Taylor's little wagon; I
 won't be gone a minute."He disappeared, and presently returned with the wagon, 
put the two small sacks into it, threw some old rags on top of them, and started
 off, dragging his cargo behind him. When the boys reached the Welshman's house,
 they stopped to rest. Just as they were about to move on, the Welshman stepped 
out and said:"Hallo, who's that?""Huck and Tom Sawyer.""Good! Come along with me
, boys, you are keeping everybody waiting. Here -- hurry up, trot ahead -- I'll 
haul the wagon for you. Why, it's not as light as it might be. Got bricks in it?
 -- or old metal?""Old metal," said Tom."I judged so; the boys in this town will
 take more trouble and fool away more time hunting up six bits' worth of old iro
n to sell to the foundry than they would to make twice the money at regular work
. But that's human nature -- hurry along, hurry along!"The boys wanted to know w
hat the hurry was about."Never mind; you'll see, when we get to the Widow Dougla
s'."-314-Huck said with some apprehension -- for he was long used to being false
ly accused:"Mr. Jones, we haven't been doing nothing."The Welshman laughed."Well
, I don't know, Huck, my boy. I don't know about that. Ain't you and the widow g
ood friends?""Yes. Well, she's ben good friends to me, anyway.""All right, then.
 What do you want to be afraid for?"This question was not entirely answered in H
uck's slow mind before he found himself pushed, along with Tom, into Mrs. Dougla
s' drawing-room. Mr. Jones left the wagon near the door and followed.The place w
as grandly lighted, and everybody that was of any consequence in the village was
 there. The Thatchers were there, the Harpers, the Rogerses, Aunt Polly, Sid, Ma
ry, the minister, the editor, and a great many more, and all dressed in their be
st. The widow received the boys as heartily as any one could well receive two su
ch looking beings. They were covered with clay and candle-grease. Aunt Polly blu
shed crimson with humiliation, and frowned and shook her head at Tom. Nobody suf
fered half as much as the two boys did, however. Mr. Jones said:"Tom wasn't at h
ome, yet, so I gave him up; but I stumbled on him and Huck right at my door, and
 so I just brought them along in a hurry."-315-"And you did just right," said th
e widow. "Come with me, boys."She took them to a bedchamber and said:"Now wash a
nd dress yourselves. Here are two new suits of clothes -- shirts, socks, everyth
ing complete. They're Huck's -- no, no thanks, Huck -- Mr. Jones bought one and 
I the other. But they'll fit both of you. Get into them. We'll wait -- come down
 when you are slicked up enough."Then she left.-316-Chapter XXXIVHUCK said: "Tom
, we can slope, if we can find a rope. The window ain't high from the ground.""S
hucks! what do you want to slope for?""Well, I ain't used to that kind of a crow
d. I can't stand it. I ain't going down there, Tom.""Oh, bother! It ain't anythi
ng. I don't mind it a bit. I'll take care of you."Sid appeared."Tom," said he, "
auntie has been waiting for you all the afternoon. Mary got your Sunday clothes 
ready, and everybody's been fretting about you. Say -- ain't this grease and cla
y, on your clothes?""Now, Mr. Siddy, you jist 'tend to your own business. What's
 all this blow-out about, anyway?""It's one of the widow's parties that she's al
ways having. This time it's for the Welshman and his sons, on account of that sc
rape they helped her out of the other night. And say -- I can tell you something
, if you want to know.""Well, what?"-317-"Why, old Mr. Jones is going to try to 
spring something on the people here to-night, but I overheard him tell auntie to
-day about it, as a secret, but I reckon it's not much of a secret now. Everybod
y knows -- the widow, too, for all she tries to let on she don't. Mr. Jones was 
bound Huck should be here -- couldn't get along with his grand secret without Hu
ck, you know!""Secret about what, Sid?""About Huck tracking the robbers to the w
idow's. I reckon Mr. Jones was going to make a grand time over his surprise, but
 I bet you it will drop pretty flat."Sid chuckled in a very contented and satisf
ied way."Sid, was it you that told?""Oh, never mind who it was. Somebody told --
 that's enough.""Sid, there's only one person in this town mean enough to do tha
t, and that's you. If you had been in Huck's place you'd 'a' sneaked down the hi
ll and never told anybody on the robbers. You can't do any but mean things, and 
you can't bear to see anybody praised for doing good ones. There -- no thanks, a
s the widow says" -- and Tom cuffed Sid's ears and helped him to the door with s
everal kicks. "Now go and tell auntie if you dare -- and to-morrow you'll catch 
it!"Some minutes later the widow's guests were at the supper-table, and a dozen 
children were propped up-318-at little side-tables in the same room, after the f
ashion of that country and that day. At the proper time Mr. Jones made his littl
e speech, in which he thanked the widow for the honor she was doing himself and 
his sons, but said that there was another person whose modesty --And so forth an
d so on. He sprung his secret about Huck's share in the adventure in the finest 
dramatic manner he was master of, but the surprise it occasioned was largely cou
nterfeit and not as clamorous and effusive as it might have been under happier c
ircumstances. However, the widow made a pretty fair show of astonishment, and he
aped so many compliments and so much gratitude upon Huck that he almost forgot t
he nearly intolerable discomfort of his new clothes in the entirely intolerable 
discomfort of being set up as a target for everybody's gaze and everybody's laud
ations.The widow said she meant to give Huck a home under her roof and have him 
educated; and that when she could spare the money she would start him in busines
s in a modest way. Tom's chance was come. He said:"Huck don't need it. Huck's ri
ch."Nothing but a heavy strain upon the good manners of the company kept back th
e due and proper complimentary laugh at this pleasant joke. But the silence was 
a little awkward. Tom broke it:"Huck's got money. Maybe you don't believe it, bu
t he's got lots of it. Oh, you needn't smile-319--- I reckon I can show you. You
 just wait a minute."Tom ran out of doors. The company looked at each other with
 a perplexed interest -- and inquiringly at Huck, who was tongue-tied."Sid, what
 ails Tom?" said Aunt Polly. "He -- well, there ain't ever any making of that bo
y out. I never -- "Tom entered, struggling with the weight of his sacks, and Aun
t Polly did not finish her sentence. Tom poured the mass of yellow coin upon the
 table and said:"There -- what did I tell you? Half of it's Huck's and half of i
t's mine!"The spectacle took the general breath away. All gazed, nobody spoke fo
r a moment. Then there was a unanimous call for an explanation. Tom said he coul
d furnish it, and he did. The tale was long, but brimful of interest. There was 
scarcely an interruption from any one to break the charm of its flow. When he ha
d finished, Mr. Jones said:"I thought I had fixed up a little surprise for this 
occasion, but it don't amount to anything now. This one makes it sing mighty sma
ll, I'm willing to allow."The money was counted. The sum amounted to a little ov
er twelve thousand dollars. It was more than any one present had ever seen at on
e time before, though several persons were there who were worth considerably mor
e than that in property.-320-Chapter XXXVTHE reader may rest satisfied that Tom'
s and Huck's windfall made a mighty stir in the poor little village of St. Peter
sburg. So vast a sum, all in actual cash, seemed next to incredible. It was talk
ed about, gloated over, glorified, until the reason of many of the citizens tott
ered under the strain of the unhealthy excitement. Every "haunted" house in St. 
Petersburg and the neighboring villages was dissected, plank by plank, and its f
oundations dug up and ransacked for hidden treasure -- and not by boys, but men 
-- pretty grave, unromantic men, too, some of them. Wherever Tom and Huck appear
ed they were courted, admired, stared at. The boys were not able to remember tha
t their remarks had possessed weight before; but now their sayings were treasure
d and repeated; everything they did seemed somehow to be regarded as remarkable;
 they had evidently lost the power of doing and saying commonplace things; moreo
ver, their past history was raked up and discovered to bear marks of conspicuous
 originality. The village paper published biographical sketches of the boys.-321
-The Widow Douglas put Huck's money out at six per cent., and Judge Thatcher did
 the same with Tom's at Aunt Polly's request. Each lad had an income, now, that 
was simply prodigious -- a dollar for every week-day in the year and half of the
 Sundays. It was just what the minister got -- no, it was what he was promised -
- he generally couldn't collect it. A dollar and a quarter a week would board, l
odge, and school a boy in those old simple days -- and clothe him and wash him, 
too, for that matter.Judge Thatcher had conceived a great opinion of Tom. He sai
d that no commonplace boy would ever have got his daughter out of the cave. When
 Becky told her father, in strict confidence, how Tom had taken her whipping at 
school, the Judge was visibly moved; and when she pleaded grace for the mighty l
ie which Tom had told in order to shift that whipping from her shoulders to his 
own, the Judge said with a fine outburst that it was a noble, a generous, a magn
animous lie -- a lie that was worthy to hold up its head and march down through 
history breast to breast with George Washington's lauded Truth about the hatchet
! Becky thought her father had never looked so tall and so superb as when he wal
ked the floor and stamped his foot and said that. She went straight off and told
 Tom about it.Judge Thatcher hoped to see Tom a great lawyer or a great soldier 
some day. He said he meant to look to it that Tom should be admitted to the-322-
National Military Academy and afterward trained in the best law school in the co
untry, in order that he might be ready for either career or both.Huck Finn's wea
lth and the fact that he was now under the Widow Douglas' protection introduced 
him into society -- no, dragged him into it, hurled him into it -- and his suffe
rings were almost more than he could bear. The widow's servants kept him clean a
nd neat, combed and brushed, and they bedded him nightly in unsympathetic sheets
 that had not one little spot or stain which he could press to his heart and kno
w for a friend. He had to eat with a knife and fork; he had to use napkin, cup, 
and plate; he had to learn his book, he had to go to church; he had to talk so p
roperly that speech was become insipid in his mouth; whithersoever he turned, th
e bars and shackles of civilization shut him in and bound him hand and foot.He b
ravely bore his miseries three weeks, and then one day turned up missing. For fo
rty-eight hours the widow hunted for him everywhere in great distress. The publi
c were profoundly concerned; they searched high and low, they dragged the river 
for his body. Early the third morning Tom Sawyer wisely went poking among some o
ld empty hogsheads down behind the abandoned slaughter-house, and in one of them
 he found the refugee. Huck had slept there; he had just breakfasted upon some s
tolen odds and ends of food, and was lying off, now, in comfort, with his pipe. 
He was unkempt,-323-uncombed, and clad in the same old ruin of rags that had mad
e him picturesque in the days when he was free and happy. Tom routed him out, to
ld him the trouble he had been causing, and urged him to go home. Huck's face lo
st its tranquil content, and took a melancholy cast. He said:"Don't talk about i
t, Tom. I've tried it, and it don't work; it don't work, Tom. It ain't for me; I
 ain't used to it. The widder's good to me, and friendly; but I can't stand them
 ways. She makes me get up just at the same time every morning; she makes me was
h, they comb me all to thunder; she won't let me sleep in the woodshed; I got to
 wear them blamed clothes that just smothers me, Tom; they don't seem to any air
 git through 'em, somehow; and they're so rotten nice that I can't set down, nor
 lay down, nor roll around anywher's; I hain't slid on a cellar-door for -- well
, it 'pears to be years; I got to go to church and sweat and sweat -- I hate the
m ornery sermons! I can't ketch a fly in there, I can't chaw. I got to wear shoe
s all Sunday. The widder eats by a bell; she goes to bed by a bell; she gits up 
by a bell -- everything's so awful reg'lar a body can't stand it.""Well, everybo
dy does that way, Huck.""Tom, it don't make no difference. I ain't everybody, an
d I can't stand it. It's awful to be tied up so. And grub comes too easy -- I do
n't take no interest in vittles, that way. I got to ask to go a-fishing; I got t
o ask to go in a-swimming ---324-dern'd if I hain't got to ask to do everything.
 Well, I'd got to talk so nice it wasn't no comfort -- I'd got to go up in the a
ttic and rip out awhile, every day, to git a taste in my mouth, or I'd a died, T
om. The widder wouldn't let me smoke; she wouldn't let me yell, she wouldn't let
 me gape, nor stretch, nor scratch, before folks -- " [Then with a spasm of spec
ial irritation and injury] -- "And dad fetch it, she prayed all the time! I neve
r see such a woman! I had to shove, Tom -- I just had to. And besides, that scho
ol's going to open, and I'd a had to go to it -- well, I wouldn't stand that, To
m. Looky-here, Tom, being rich ain't what it's cracked up to be. It's just worry
 and worry, and sweat and sweat, and a-wishing you was dead all the time. Now th
ese clothes suits me, and this bar'l suits me, and I ain't ever going to shake '
em any more. Tom, I wouldn't ever got into all this trouble if it hadn't 'a' ben
 for that money; now you just take my sheer of it along with your'n, and gimme a
 ten-center sometimes -- not many times, becuz I don't give a dern for a thing '
thout it's tollable hard to git -- and you go and beg off for me with the widder
.""Oh, Huck, you know I can't do that. 'Tain't fair; and besides if you'll try t
his thing just a while longer you'll come to like it.""Like it! Yes -- the way I
'd like a hot stove if I was to set on it long enough. No, Tom, I won't be rich,
 and I won't live in them cussed smothery houses-325-. I like the woods, and the
 river, and hogsheads, and I'll stick to 'em, too. Blame it all! just as we'd go
t guns, and a cave, and all just fixed to rob, here this dern foolishness has go
t to come up and spile it all!"Tom saw his opportunity --"Lookyhere, Huck, being
 rich ain't going to keep me back from turning robber.""No! Oh, good-licks; are 
you in real dead-wood earnest, Tom?""Just as dead earnest as I'm sitting here. B
ut Huck, we can't let you into the gang if you ain't respectable, you know."Huck
's joy was quenched."Can't let me in, Tom? Didn't you let me go for a pirate?""Y
es, but that's different. A robber is more high-toned than what a pirate is -- a
s a general thing. In most countries they're awful high up in the nobility -- du
kes and such.""Now, Tom, hain't you always ben friendly to me? You wouldn't shet
 me out, would you, Tom? You wouldn't do that, now, would you, Tom?""Huck, I wou
ldn't want to, and I don't want to -- but what would people say? Why, they'd say
, 'Mph! Tom Sawyer's Gang! pretty low characters in it!' They'd mean you, Huck. 
You wouldn't like that, and I wouldn't."Huck was silent for some time, engaged i
n a mental struggle. Finally he said:-326-"Well, I'll go back to the widder for 
a month and tackle it and see if I can come to stand it, if you'll let me b'long
 to the gang, Tom.""All right, Huck, it's a whiz! Come along, old chap, and I'll
 ask the widow to let up on you a little, Huck.""Will you, Tom -- now will you? 
That's good. If she'll let up on some of the roughest things, I'll smoke private
 and cuss private, and crowd through or bust. When you going to start the gang a
nd turn robbers?""Oh, right off. We'll get the boys together and have the initia
tion to-night, maybe.""Have the which?""Have the initiation.""What's that?""It's
 to swear to stand by one another, and never tell the gang's secrets, even if yo
u're chopped all to flinders, and kill anybody and all his family that hurts one
 of the gang.""That's gay -- that's mighty gay, Tom, I tell you.""Well, I bet it
 is. And all that swearing's got to be done at midnight, in the lonesomest, awfu
lest place you can find -- a ha'nted house is the best, but they're all ripped u
p now.""Well, midnight's good, anyway, Tom.""Yes, so it is. And you've got to sw
ear on a coffin, and sign it with blood.""Now, that's something like! Why, it's 
a-327-million times bullier than pirating. I'll stick to the widder till I rot, 
Tom; and if I git to be a reg'lar ripper of a robber, and everybody talking 'bou
t it, I reckon she'll be proud she snaked me in out of the wet."-328-CONCLUSIONS
O endeth this chronicle. It being strictly a history of a boy, it must stop here
; the story could not go much further without becoming the history of a man. Whe
n one writes a novel about grown people, he knows exactly where to stop -- that 
is, with a marriage; but when he writes of juveniles, he must stop where he best
 can.Most of the characters that perform in this book still live, and are prospe
rous and happy. Some day it may seem worth while to take up the story of the you
nger ones again and see what sort of men and women they turned out to be; theref
ore it will be wisest not to reveal any of that part of their lives at present.C
HAPTER I. Down the Rabbit-HoleAlice was beginning to get very tired of sitting b
y her sister on the bank, and of having nothing to do: once or twice she had pee
ped into the book her sister was reading, but it had no pictures or conversation
s in it, 'and what is the use of a book,' thought Alice 'without pictures or con
versations?'So she was considering in her own mind (as well as she could, for th
e hot day made her feel very sleepy and stupid), whether the pleasure of making 
a daisy-chain would be worth the trouble of getting up and picking the daisies, 
when suddenly a White Rabbit with pink eyes ran close by her.There was nothing s
o VERY remarkable in that; nor did Alice think it so VERY much out of the way to
 hear the Rabbit say to itself, 'Oh dear! Oh dear! I shall be late!' (when she t
hought it over afterwards, it occurred to her that she ought to have wondered at
 this, but at the time it all seemed quite natural); but when the Rabbit actuall
y TOOK A WATCH OUT OF ITS WAISTCOAT-POCKET, and looked at it, and then hurried o
n, Alice started to her feet, for it flashed across her mind that she had never 
before seen a rabbit with either a waistcoat-pocket, or a watch to take out of i
t, and burning with curiosity, she ran across the field after it, and fortunatel
y was just in time to see it pop down a large rabbit-hole under the hedge.In ano
ther moment down went Alice after it, never once considering how in the world sh
e was to get out again.The rabbit-hole went straight on like a tunnel for some w
ay, and then dipped suddenly down, so suddenly that Alice had not a moment to th
ink about stopping herself before she found herself falling down a very deep wel
l.Either the well was very deep, or she fell very slowly, for she had plenty of 
time as she went down to look about her and to wonder what was going to happen n
ext. First, she tried to look down and make out what she was coming to, but it w
as too dark to see anything; then she looked at the sides of the well, and notic
ed that they were filled with cupboards and book-shelves; here and there she saw
 maps and pictures hung upon pegs. She took down a jar from one of the shelves a
s she passed; it was labelled 'ORANGE MARMALADE', but to her great disappointmen
t it was empty: she did not like to drop the jar for fear of killing somebody, s
o managed to put it into one of the cupboards as she fell past it.'Well!' though
t Alice to herself, 'after such a fall as this, I shall think nothing of tumblin
g down stairs! How brave they'll all think me at home! Why, I wouldn't say anyth
ing about it, even if I fell off the top of the house!' (Which was very likely t
rue.)Down, down, down. Would the fall NEVER come to an end! 'I wonder how many m
iles I've fallen by this time?' she said aloud. 'I must be getting somewhere nea
r the centre of the earth. Let me see: that would be four thousand miles down, I
 think' (for, you see, Alice had learnt several things of this sort in her less
ons in the schoolroom, and though this was not a VERY good opportunity for showi
ng off her knowledge, as there was no one to listen to her, still it was good pr
actice to say it over) 'yes, that's about the right distancebut then I wonder 
what Latitude or Longitude I've got to?' (Alice had no idea what Latitude was, o
r Longitude either, but thought they were nice grand words to say.)Presently she
 began again. 'I wonder if I shall fall right THROUGH the earth! How funny it'll
 seem to come out among the people that walk with their heads downward! The Anti
pathies, I think' (she was rather glad there WAS no one listening, this time, a
s it didn't sound at all the right word) 'but I shall have to ask them what the
 name of the country is, you know. Please, Ma'am, is this New Zealand or Austral
ia?' (and she tried to curtsey as she spokefancy CURTSEYING as you're falling t
hrough the air! Do you think you could manage it?) 'And what an ignorant little 
girl she'll think me for asking! No, it'll never do to ask: perhaps I shall see 
it written up somewhere.'Down, down, down. There was nothing else to do, so Alic
e soon began talking again. 'Dinah'll miss me very much to-night, I should think
!' (Dinah was the cat.) 'I hope they'll remember her saucer of milk at tea-time.
 Dinah my dear! I wish you were down here with me! There are no mice in the air,
 I'm afraid, but you might catch a bat, and that's very like a mouse, you know. 
But do cats eat bats, I wonder?' And here Alice began to get rather sleepy, and 
went on saying to herself, in a dreamy sort of way, 'Do cats eat bats? Do cats e
at bats?' and sometimes, 'Do bats eat cats?' for, you see, as she couldn't answe
r either question, it didn't much matter which way she put it. She felt that she
 was dozing off, and had just begun to dream that she was walking hand in hand w
ith Dinah, and saying to her very earnestly, 'Now, Dinah, tell me the truth: did
 you ever eat a bat?' when suddenly, thump! thump! down she came upon a heap of 
sticks and dry leaves, and the fall was over.Alice was not a bit hurt, and she j
umped up on to her feet in a moment: she looked up, but it was all dark overhead
; before her was another long passage, and the White Rabbit was still in sight, 
hurrying down it. There was not a moment to be lost: away went Alice like the wi
nd, and was just in time to hear it say, as it turned a corner, 'Oh my ears and 
whiskers, how late it's getting!' She was close behind it when she turned the co
rner, but the Rabbit was no longer to be seen: she found herself in a long, low 
hall, which was lit up by a row of lamps hanging from the roof.There were doors 
all round the hall, but they were all locked; and when Alice had been all the wa
y down one side and up the other, trying every door, she walked sadly down the m
iddle, wondering how she was ever to get out again.Suddenly she came upon a litt
le three-legged table, all made of solid glass; there was nothing on it except a
 tiny golden key, and Alice's first thought was that it might belong to one of t
he doors of the hall; but, alas! either the locks were too large, or the key was
 too small, but at any rate it would not open any of them. However, on the secon
d time round, she came upon a low curtain she had not noticed before, and behind
 it was a little door about fifteen inches high: she tried the little golden key
 in the lock, and to her great delight it fitted!Alice opened the door and found
 that it led into a small passage, not much larger than a rat-hole: she knelt do
wn and looked along the passage into the loveliest garden you ever saw. How she 
longed to get out of that dark hall, and wander about among those beds of bright
 flowers and those cool fountains, but she could not even get her head through t
he doorway; 'and even if my head would go through,' thought poor Alice, 'it woul
d be of very little use without my shoulders. Oh, how I wish I could shut up lik
e a telescope! I think I could, if I only knew how to begin.' For, you see, so m
any out-of-the-way things had happened lately, that Alice had begun to think tha
t very few things indeed were really impossible.There seemed to be no use in wai
ting by the little door, so she went back to the table, half hoping she might fi
nd another key on it, or at any rate a book of rules for shutting people up like
 telescopes: this time she found a little bottle on it, ('which certainly was no
t here before,' said Alice,) and round the neck of the bottle was a paper label,
 with the words 'DRINK ME' beautifully printed on it in large letters.It was all
 very well to say 'Drink me,' but the wise little Alice was not going to do THAT
 in a hurry. 'No, I'll look first,' she said, 'and see whether it's marked "pois
on" or not'; for she had read several nice little histories about children who h
ad got burnt, and eaten up by wild beasts and other unpleasant things, all becau
se they WOULD not remember the simple rules their friends had taught them: such 
as, that a red-hot poker will burn you if you hold it too long; and that if you 
cut your finger VERY deeply with a knife, it usually bleeds; and she had never f
orgotten that, if you drink much from a bottle marked 'poison,' it is almost cer
tain to disagree with you, sooner or later.However, this bottle was NOT marked '
poison,' so Alice ventured to taste it, and finding it very nice, (it had, in fa
ct, a sort of mixed flavour of cherry-tart, custard, pine-apple, roast turkey, t
offee, and hot buttered toast,) she very soon finished it off.*    *    *    *  
  *    *    **    *    *    *    *    **    *    *    *    *    *    *'What a cu
rious feeling!' said Alice; 'I must be shutting up like a telescope.'And so it w
as indeed: she was now only ten inches high, and her face brightened up at the t
hought that she was now the right size for going through the little door into th
at lovely garden. First, however, she waited for a few minutes to see if she was
 going to shrink any further: she felt a little nervous about this; 'for it migh
t end, you know,' said Alice to herself, 'in my going out altogether, like a can
dle. I wonder what I should be like then?' And she tried to fancy what the flame
 of a candle is like after the candle is blown out, for she could not remember e
ver having seen such a thing.After a while, finding that nothing more happened, 
she decided on going into the garden at once; but, alas for poor Alice! when she
 got to the door, she found she had forgotten the little golden key, and when sh
e went back to the table for it, she found she could not possibly reach it: she 
could see it quite plainly through the glass, and she tried her best to climb up
 one of the legs of the table, but it was too slippery; and when she had tired h
erself out with trying, the poor little thing sat down and cried.'Come, there's 
no use in crying like that!' said Alice to herself, rather sharply; 'I advise yo
u to leave off this minute!' She generally gave herself very good advice, (thoug
h she very seldom followed it), and sometimes she scolded herself so severely as
 to bring tears into her eyes; and once she remembered trying to box her own ear
s for having cheated herself in a game of croquet she was playing against hersel
f, for this curious child was very fond of pretending to be two people. 'But it'
s no use now,' thought poor Alice, 'to pretend to be two people! Why, there's ha
rdly enough of me left to make ONE respectable person!'Soon her eye fell on a li
ttle glass box that was lying under the table: she opened it, and found in it a 
very small cake, on which the words 'EAT ME' were beautifully marked in currants
. 'Well, I'll eat it,' said Alice, 'and if it makes me grow larger, I can reach 
the key; and if it makes me grow smaller, I can creep under the door; so either 
way I'll get into the garden, and I don't care which happens!'She ate a little b
it, and said anxiously to herself, 'Which way? Which way?', holding her hand on 
the top of her head to feel which way it was growing, and she was quite surprise
d to find that she remained the same size: to be sure, this generally happens wh
en one eats cake, but Alice had got so much into the way of expecting nothing bu
t out-of-the-way things to happen, that it seemed quite dull and stupid for life
 to go on in the common way.So she set to work, and very soon finished off the c
ake.*    *    *    *    *    *    **    *    *    *    *    **    *    *    *   
 *    *    *CHAPTER II. The Pool of Tears'Curiouser and curiouser!' cried Alice 
(she was so much surprised, that for the moment she quite forgot how to speak go
od English); 'now I'm opening out like the largest telescope that ever was! Good
-bye, feet!' (for when she looked down at her feet, they seemed to be almost out
 of sight, they were getting so far off). 'Oh, my poor little feet, I wonder who
 will put on your shoes and stockings for you now, dears? I'm sure I shan't be a
ble! I shall be a great deal too far off to trouble myself about you: you must m
anage the best way you can;but I must be kind to them,' thought Alice, 'or perh
aps they won't walk the way I want to go! Let me see: I'll give them a new pair 
of boots every Christmas.'And she went on planning to herself how she would mana
ge it. 'They must go by the carrier,' she thought; 'and how funny it'll seem, se
nding presents to one's own feet! And how odd the directions will look!ALICE'S R
IGHT FOOT, ESQ.HEARTHRUG,NEAR THE FENDER,(WITH ALICE'S LOVE).Oh dear, what nonse
nse I'm talking!'Just then her head struck against the roof of the hall: in fact
 she was now more than nine feet high, and she at once took up the little golden
 key and hurried off to the garden door.Poor Alice! It was as much as she could 
do, lying down on one side, to look through into the garden with one eye; but to
 get through was more hopeless than ever: she sat down and began to cry again.'Y
ou ought to be ashamed of yourself,' said Alice, 'a great girl like you,' (she m
ight well say this), 'to go on crying in this way! Stop this moment, I tell you!
' But she went on all the same, shedding gallons of tears, until there was a lar
ge pool all round her, about four inches deep and reaching half down the hall.Af
ter a time she heard a little pattering of feet in the distance, and she hastily
 dried her eyes to see what was coming. It was the White Rabbit returning, splen
didly dressed, with a pair of white kid gloves in one hand and a large fan in th
e other: he came trotting along in a great hurry, muttering to himself as he cam
e, 'Oh! the Duchess, the Duchess! Oh! won't she be savage if I've kept her waiti
ng!' Alice felt so desperate that she was ready to ask help of any one; so, when
 the Rabbit came near her, she began, in a low, timid voice, 'If you please, sir
' The Rabbit started violently, dropped the white kid gloves and the fan, and s
kurried away into the darkness as hard as he could go.Alice took up the fan and 
gloves, and, as the hall was very hot, she kept fanning herself all the time she
 went on talking: 'Dear, dear! How queer everything is to-day! And yesterday thi
ngs went on just as usual. I wonder if I've been changed in the night? Let me th
ink: was I the same when I got up this morning? I almost think I can remember fe
eling a little different. But if I'm not the same, the next question is, Who in 
the world am I? Ah, THAT'S the great puzzle!' And she began thinking over all th
e children she knew that were of the same age as herself, to see if she could ha
ve been changed for any of them.'I'm sure I'm not Ada,' she said, 'for her hair 
goes in such long ringlets, and mine doesn't go in ringlets at all; and I'm sure
 I can't be Mabel, for I know all sorts of things, and she, oh! she knows such a
 very little! Besides, SHE'S she, and I'm I, andoh dear, how puzzling it all is
! I'll try if I know all the things I used to know. Let me see: four times five 
is twelve, and four times six is thirteen, and four times seven isoh dear! I sh
all never get to twenty at that rate! However, the Multiplication Table doesn't 
signify: let's try Geography. London is the capital of Paris, and Paris is the c
apital of Rome, and Romeno, THAT'S all wrong, I'm certain! I must have been cha
nged for Mabel! I'll try and say "How doth the little"' and she crossed her han
ds on her lap as if she were saying lessons, and began to repeat it, but her voi
ce sounded hoarse and strange, and the words did not come the same as they used 
to do:'How doth the little crocodileImprove his shining tail,And pour the water
s of the NileOn every golden scale!'How cheerfully he seems to grin,How neatly s
pread his claws,And welcome little fishes inWith gently smiling jaws!''I'm sure 
those are not the right words,' said poor Alice, and her eyes filled with tears 
again as she went on, 'I must be Mabel after all, and I shall have to go and liv
e in that poky little house, and have next to no toys to play with, and oh! ever
 so many lessons to learn! No, I've made up my mind about it; if I'm Mabel, I'll
 stay down here! It'll be no use their putting their heads down and saying "Come
 up again, dear!" I shall only look up and say "Who am I then? Tell me that firs
t, and then, if I like being that person, I'll come up: if not, I'll stay down h
ere till I'm somebody else"but, oh dear!' cried Alice, with a sudden burst of t
ears, 'I do wish they WOULD put their heads down! I am so VERY tired of being al
l alone here!'As she said this she looked down at her hands, and was surprised t
o see that she had put on one of the Rabbit's little white kid gloves while she 
was talking. 'How CAN I have done that?' she thought. 'I must be growing small a
gain.' She got up and went to the table to measure herself by it, and found that
, as nearly as she could guess, she was now about two feet high, and was going o
n shrinking rapidly: she soon found out that the cause of this was the fan she w
as holding, and she dropped it hastily, just in time to avoid shrinking away alt
ogether.'That WAS a narrow escape!' said Alice, a good deal frightened at the su
dden change, but very glad to find herself still in existence; 'and now for the 
garden!' and she ran with all speed back to the little door: but, alas! the litt
le door was shut again, and the little golden key was lying on the glass table a
s before, 'and things are worse than ever,' thought the poor child, 'for I never
 was so small as this before, never! And I declare it's too bad, that it is!'As 
she said these words her foot slipped, and in another moment, splash! she was up
 to her chin in salt water. Her first idea was that she had somehow fallen into 
the sea, 'and in that case I can go back by railway,' she said to herself. (Alic
e had been to the seaside once in her life, and had come to the general conclusi
on, that wherever you go to on the English coast you find a number of bathing ma
chines in the sea, some children digging in the sand with wooden spades, then a 
row of lodging houses, and behind them a railway station.) However, she soon mad
e out that she was in the pool of tears which she had wept when she was nine fee
t high.'I wish I hadn't cried so much!' said Alice, as she swam about, trying to
 find her way out. 'I shall be punished for it now, I suppose, by being drowned 
in my own tears! That WILL be a queer thing, to be sure! However, everything is 
queer to-day.'Just then she heard something splashing about in the pool a little
 way off, and she swam nearer to make out what it was: at first she thought it m
ust be a walrus or hippopotamus, but then she remembered how small she was now, 
and she soon made out that it was only a mouse that had slipped in like herself.
'Would it be of any use, now,' thought Alice, 'to speak to this mouse? Everythin
g is so out-of-the-way down here, that I should think very likely it can talk: a
t any rate, there's no harm in trying.' So she began: 'O Mouse, do you know the 
way out of this pool? I am very tired of swimming about here, O Mouse!' (Alice t
hought this must be the right way of speaking to a mouse: she had never done suc
h a thing before, but she remembered having seen in her brother's Latin Grammar,
 'A mouseof a mouseto a mousea mouseO mouse!') The Mouse looked at her rathe
r inquisitively, and seemed to her to wink with one of its little eyes, but it s
aid nothing.'Perhaps it doesn't understand English,' thought Alice; 'I daresay i
t's a French mouse, come over with William the Conqueror.' (For, with all her kn
owledge of history, Alice had no very clear notion how long ago anything had hap
pened.) So she began again: 'Ou est ma chatte?' which was the first sentence in 
her French lesson-book. The Mouse gave a sudden leap out of the water, and seeme
d to quiver all over with fright. 'Oh, I beg your pardon!' cried Alice hastily, 
afraid that she had hurt the poor animal's feelings. 'I quite forgot you didn't 
like cats.''Not like cats!' cried the Mouse, in a shrill, passionate voice. 'Wou
ld YOU like cats if you were me?''Well, perhaps not,' said Alice in a soothing t
one: 'don't be angry about it. And yet I wish I could show you our cat Dinah: I 
think you'd take a fancy to cats if you could only see her. She is such a dear q
uiet thing,' Alice went on, half to herself, as she swam lazily about in the poo
l, 'and she sits purring so nicely by the fire, licking her paws and washing her
 faceand she is such a nice soft thing to nurseand she's such a capital one fo
r catching miceoh, I beg your pardon!' cried Alice again, for this time the Mou
se was bristling all over, and she felt certain it must be really offended. 'We 
won't talk about her any more if you'd rather not.''We indeed!' cried the Mouse,
 who was trembling down to the end of his tail. 'As if I would talk on such a su
bject! Our family always HATED cats: nasty, low, vulgar things! Don't let me hea
r the name again!''I won't indeed!' said Alice, in a great hurry to change the s
ubject of conversation. 'Are youare you fondofof dogs?' The Mouse did not ans
wer, so Alice went on eagerly: 'There is such a nice little dog near our house I
 should like to show you! A little bright-eyed terrier, you know, with oh, such 
long curly brown hair! And it'll fetch things when you throw them, and it'll sit
 up and beg for its dinner, and all sorts of thingsI can't remember half of the
mand it belongs to a farmer, you know, and he says it's so useful, it's worth a
 hundred pounds! He says it kills all the rats andoh dear!' cried Alice in a so
rrowful tone, 'I'm afraid I've offended it again!' For the Mouse was swimming aw
ay from her as hard as it could go, and making quite a commotion in the pool as 
it went.So she called softly after it, 'Mouse dear! Do come back again, and we w
on't talk about cats or dogs either, if you don't like them!' When the Mouse hea
rd this, it turned round and swam slowly back to her: its face was quite pale (w
ith passion, Alice thought), and it said in a low trembling voice, 'Let us get t
o the shore, and then I'll tell you my history, and you'll understand why it is 
I hate cats and dogs.'It was high time to go, for the pool was getting quite cro
wded with the birds and animals that had fallen into it: there were a Duck and a
 Dodo, a Lory and an Eaglet, and several other curious creatures. Alice led the 
way, and the whole party swam to the shore.CHAPTER III. A Caucus-Race and a Long
 TaleThey were indeed a queer-looking party that assembled on the bankthe birds
 with draggled feathers, the animals with their fur clinging close to them, and 
all dripping wet, cross, and uncomfortable.The first question of course was, how
 to get dry again: they had a consultation about this, and after a few minutes i
t seemed quite natural to Alice to find herself talking familiarly with them, as
 if she had known them all her life. Indeed, she had quite a long argument with 
the Lory, who at last turned sulky, and would only say, 'I am older than you, an
d must know better'; and this Alice would not allow without knowing how old it w
as, and, as the Lory positively refused to tell its age, there was no more to be
 said.At last the Mouse, who seemed to be a person of authority among them, call
ed out, 'Sit down, all of you, and listen to me! I'LL soon make you dry enough!'
 They all sat down at once, in a large ring, with the Mouse in the middle. Alice
 kept her eyes anxiously fixed on it, for she felt sure she would catch a bad co
ld if she did not get dry very soon.'Ahem!' said the Mouse with an important air
, 'are you all ready? This is the driest thing I know. Silence all round, if you
 please! "William the Conqueror, whose cause was favoured by the pope, was soon 
submitted to by the English, who wanted leaders, and had been of late much accus
tomed to usurpation and conquest. Edwin and Morcar, the earls of Mercia and Nort
humbria"''Ugh!' said the Lory, with a shiver.'I beg your pardon!' said the Mous
e, frowning, but very politely: 'Did you speak?''Not I!' said the Lory hastily.'
I thought you did,' said the Mouse. 'I proceed. "Edwin and Morcar, the earls of
 Mercia and Northumbria, declared for him: and even Stigand, the patriotic archb
ishop of Canterbury, found it advisable"''Found WHAT?' said the Duck.'Found IT,
' the Mouse replied rather crossly: 'of course you know what "it" means.''I know
 what "it" means well enough, when I find a thing,' said the Duck: 'it's general
ly a frog or a worm. The question is, what did the archbishop find?'The Mouse di
d not notice this question, but hurriedly went on, '"found it advisable to go w
ith Edgar Atheling to meet William and offer him the crown. William's conduct at
 first was moderate. But the insolence of his Normans" How are you getting on n
ow, my dear?' it continued, turning to Alice as it spoke.'As wet as ever,' said 
Alice in a melancholy tone: 'it doesn't seem to dry me at all.''In that case,' s
aid the Dodo solemnly, rising to its feet, 'I move that the meeting adjourn, for
 the immediate adoption of more energetic remedies''Speak English!' said the Ea
glet. 'I don't know the meaning of half those long words, and, what's more, I do
n't believe you do either!' And the Eaglet bent down its head to hide a smile: s
ome of the other birds tittered audibly.'What I was going to say,' said the Dodo
 in an offended tone, 'was, that the best thing to get us dry would be a Caucus-
race.''What IS a Caucus-race?' said Alice; not that she wanted much to know, but
 the Dodo had paused as if it thought that SOMEBODY ought to speak, and no one e
lse seemed inclined to say anything.'Why,' said the Dodo, 'the best way to expla
in it is to do it.' (And, as you might like to try the thing yourself, some wint
er day, I will tell you how the Dodo managed it.)First it marked out a race-cour
se, in a sort of circle, ('the exact shape doesn't matter,' it said,) and then a
ll the party were placed along the course, here and there. There was no 'One, tw
o, three, and away,' but they began running when they liked, and left off when t
hey liked, so that it was not easy to know when the race was over. However, when
 they had been running half an hour or so, and were quite dry again, the Dodo su
ddenly called out 'The race is over!' and they all crowded round it, panting, an
d asking, 'But who has won?'This question the Dodo could not answer without a gr
eat deal of thought, and it sat for a long time with one finger pressed upon its
 forehead (the position in which you usually see Shakespeare, in the pictures of
 him), while the rest waited in silence. At last the Dodo said, 'EVERYBODY has w
on, and all must have prizes.''But who is to give the prizes?' quite a chorus of
 voices asked.'Why, SHE, of course,' said the Dodo, pointing to Alice with one f
inger; and the whole party at once crowded round her, calling out in a confused 
way, 'Prizes! Prizes!'Alice had no idea what to do, and in despair she put her h
and in her pocket, and pulled out a box of comfits, (luckily the salt water had 
not got into it), and handed them round as prizes. There was exactly one a-piece
 all round.'But she must have a prize herself, you know,' said the Mouse.'Of cou
rse,' the Dodo replied very gravely. 'What else have you got in your pocket?' he
 went on, turning to Alice.'Only a thimble,' said Alice sadly.'Hand it over here
,' said the Dodo.Then they all crowded round her once more, while the Dodo solem
nly presented the thimble, saying 'We beg your acceptance of this elegant thimbl
e'; and, when it had finished this short speech, they all cheered.Alice thought 
the whole thing very absurd, but they all looked so grave that she did not dare 
to laugh; and, as she could not think of anything to say, she simply bowed, and 
took the thimble, looking as solemn as she could.The next thing was to eat the c
omfits: this caused some noise and confusion, as the large birds complained that
 they could not taste theirs, and the small ones choked and had to be patted on 
the back. However, it was over at last, and they sat down again in a ring, and b
egged the Mouse to tell them something more.'You promised to tell me your histor
y, you know,' said Alice, 'and why it is you hateC and D,' she added in a whisp
er, half afraid that it would be offended again.'Mine is a long and a sad tale!'
 said the Mouse, turning to Alice, and sighing.'It IS a long tail, certainly,' s
aid Alice, looking down with wonder at the Mouse's tail; 'but why do you call it
 sad?' And she kept on puzzling about it while the Mouse was speaking, so that h
er idea of the tale was something like this:'Fury said to amouse, That hemet in
 thehouse,"Let usboth go tolaw: I willprosecuteYOU.Come,I'll take nodenial; Wem
ust have atrial: Forreally thismorning I'venothingto do."Said themouse to thecur
, "Sucha trial,dear Sir,Withno juryor judge,would bewastingourbreath.""I'll beju
dge, I'llbe jury,"Saidcunningold Fury:"I'lltry thewholecause,andcondemnyoutodeat
h."''You are not attending!' said the Mouse to Alice severely. 'What are you thi
nking of?''I beg your pardon,' said Alice very humbly: 'you had got to the fifth
 bend, I think?''I had NOT!' cried the Mouse, sharply and very angrily.'A knot!'
 said Alice, always ready to make herself useful, and looking anxiously about he
r. 'Oh, do let me help to undo it!''I shall do nothing of the sort,' said the Mo
use, getting up and walking away. 'You insult me by talking such nonsense!''I di
dn't mean it!' pleaded poor Alice. 'But you're so easily offended, you know!'The
 Mouse only growled in reply.'Please come back and finish your story!' Alice cal
led after it; and the others all joined in chorus, 'Yes, please do!' but the Mou
se only shook its head impatiently, and walked a little quicker.'What a pity it 
wouldn't stay!' sighed the Lory, as soon as it was quite out of sight; and an ol
d Crab took the opportunity of saying to her daughter 'Ah, my dear! Let this be 
a lesson to you never to lose YOUR temper!' 'Hold your tongue, Ma!' said the you
ng Crab, a little snappishly. 'You're enough to try the patience of an oyster!''
I wish I had our Dinah here, I know I do!' said Alice aloud, addressing nobody i
n particular. 'She'd soon fetch it back!''And who is Dinah, if I might venture t
o ask the question?' said the Lory.Alice replied eagerly, for she was always rea
dy to talk about her pet: 'Dinah's our cat. And she's such a capital one for cat
ching mice you can't think! And oh, I wish you could see her after the birds! Wh
y, she'll eat a little bird as soon as look at it!'This speech caused a remarkab
le sensation among the party. Some of the birds hurried off at once: one old Mag
pie began wrapping itself up very carefully, remarking, 'I really must be gettin
g home; the night-air doesn't suit my throat!' and a Canary called out in a trem
bling voice to its children, 'Come away, my dears! It's high time you were all i
n bed!' On various pretexts they all moved off, and Alice was soon left alone.'I
 wish I hadn't mentioned Dinah!' she said to herself in a melancholy tone. 'Nobo
dy seems to like her, down here, and I'm sure she's the best cat in the world! O
h, my dear Dinah! I wonder if I shall ever see you any more!' And here poor Alic
e began to cry again, for she felt very lonely and low-spirited. In a little whi
le, however, she again heard a little pattering of footsteps in the distance, an
d she looked up eagerly, half hoping that the Mouse had changed his mind, and wa
s coming back to finish his story.CHAPTER IV. The Rabbit Sends in a Little BillI
t was the White Rabbit, trotting slowly back again, and looking anxiously about 
as it went, as if it had lost something; and she heard it muttering to itself 'T
he Duchess! The Duchess! Oh my dear paws! Oh my fur and whiskers! She'll get me 
executed, as sure as ferrets are ferrets! Where CAN I have dropped them, I wonde
r?' Alice guessed in a moment that it was looking for the fan and the pair of wh
ite kid gloves, and she very good-naturedly began hunting about for them, but th
ey were nowhere to be seeneverything seemed to have changed since her swim in t
he pool, and the great hall, with the glass table and the little door, had vanis
hed completely.Very soon the Rabbit noticed Alice, as she went hunting about, an
d called out to her in an angry tone, 'Why, Mary Ann, what ARE you doing out her
e? Run home this moment, and fetch me a pair of gloves and a fan! Quick, now!' A
nd Alice was so much frightened that she ran off at once in the direction it poi
nted to, without trying to explain the mistake it had made.'He took me for his h
ousemaid,' she said to herself as she ran. 'How surprised he'll be when he finds
 out who I am! But I'd better take him his fan and glovesthat is, if I can find
 them.' As she said this, she came upon a neat little house, on the door of whic
h was a bright brass plate with the name 'W. RABBIT' engraved upon it. She went 
in without knocking, and hurried upstairs, in great fear lest she should meet th
e real Mary Ann, and be turned out of the house before she had found the fan and
 gloves.'How queer it seems,' Alice said to herself, 'to be going messages for a
 rabbit! I suppose Dinah'll be sending me on messages next!' And she began fancy
ing the sort of thing that would happen: '"Miss Alice! Come here directly, and g
et ready for your walk!" "Coming in a minute, nurse! But I've got to see that th
e mouse doesn't get out." Only I don't think,' Alice went on, 'that they'd let D
inah stop in the house if it began ordering people about like that!'By this time
 she had found her way into a tidy little room with a table in the window, and o
n it (as she had hoped) a fan and two or three pairs of tiny white kid gloves: s
he took up the fan and a pair of the gloves, and was just going to leave the roo
m, when her eye fell upon a little bottle that stood near the looking-glass. The
re was no label this time with the words 'DRINK ME,' but nevertheless she uncork
ed it and put it to her lips. 'I know SOMETHING interesting is sure to happen,' 
she said to herself, 'whenever I eat or drink anything; so I'll just see what th
is bottle does. I do hope it'll make me grow large again, for really I'm quite t
ired of being such a tiny little thing!'It did so indeed, and much sooner than s
he had expected: before she had drunk half the bottle, she found her head pressi
ng against the ceiling, and had to stoop to save her neck from being broken. She
 hastily put down the bottle, saying to herself 'That's quite enoughI hope I sh
an't grow any moreAs it is, I can't get out at the doorI do wish I hadn't drun
k quite so much!'Alas! it was too late to wish that! She went on growing, and gr
owing, and very soon had to kneel down on the floor: in another minute there was
 not even room for this, and she tried the effect of lying down with one elbow a
gainst the door, and the other arm curled round her head. Still she went on grow
ing, and, as a last resource, she put one arm out of the window, and one foot up
 the chimney, and said to herself 'Now I can do no more, whatever happens. What 
WILL become of me?'Luckily for Alice, the little magic bottle had now had its fu
ll effect, and she grew no larger: still it was very uncomfortable, and, as ther
e seemed to be no sort of chance of her ever getting out of the room again, no w
onder she felt unhappy.'It was much pleasanter at home,' thought poor Alice, 'wh
en one wasn't always growing larger and smaller, and being ordered about by mice
 and rabbits. I almost wish I hadn't gone down that rabbit-holeand yetand yet
it's rather curious, you know, this sort of life! I do wonder what CAN have happ
ened to me! When I used to read fairy-tales, I fancied that kind of thing never 
happened, and now here I am in the middle of one! There ought to be a book writt
en about me, that there ought! And when I grow up, I'll write onebut I'm grown 
up now,' she added in a sorrowful tone; 'at least there's no room to grow up any
 more HERE.''But then,' thought Alice, 'shall I NEVER get any older than I am no
w? That'll be a comfort, one waynever to be an old womanbut thenalways to hav
e lessons to learn! Oh, I shouldn't like THAT!''Oh, you foolish Alice!' she answ
ered herself. 'How can you learn lessons in here? Why, there's hardly room for Y
OU, and no room at all for any lesson-books!'And so she went on, taking first on
e side and then the other, and making quite a conversation of it altogether; but
 after a few minutes she heard a voice outside, and stopped to listen.'Mary Ann!
 Mary Ann!' said the voice. 'Fetch me my gloves this moment!' Then came a little
 pattering of feet on the stairs. Alice knew it was the Rabbit coming to look fo
r her, and she trembled till she shook the house, quite forgetting that she was 
now about a thousand times as large as the Rabbit, and had no reason to be afrai
d of it.Presently the Rabbit came up to the door, and tried to open it; but, as 
the door opened inwards, and Alice's elbow was pressed hard against it, that att
empt proved a failure. Alice heard it say to itself 'Then I'll go round and get 
in at the window.''THAT you won't' thought Alice, and, after waiting till she fa
ncied she heard the Rabbit just under the window, she suddenly spread out her ha
nd, and made a snatch in the air. She did not get hold of anything, but she hear
d a little shriek and a fall, and a crash of broken glass, from which she conclu
ded that it was just possible it had fallen into a cucumber-frame, or something 
of the sort.Next came an angry voicethe Rabbit's'Pat! Pat! Where are you?' And
 then a voice she had never heard before, 'Sure then I'm here! Digging for apple
s, yer honour!''Digging for apples, indeed!' said the Rabbit angrily. 'Here! Com
e and help me out of THIS!' (Sounds of more broken glass.)'Now tell me, Pat, wha
t's that in the window?''Sure, it's an arm, yer honour!' (He pronounced it 'arru
m.')'An arm, you goose! Who ever saw one that size? Why, it fills the whole wind
ow!''Sure, it does, yer honour: but it's an arm for all that.''Well, it's got no
 business there, at any rate: go and take it away!'There was a long silence afte
r this, and Alice could only hear whispers now and then; such as, 'Sure, I don't
 like it, yer honour, at all, at all!' 'Do as I tell you, you coward!' and at la
st she spread out her hand again, and made another snatch in the air. This time 
there were TWO little shrieks, and more sounds of broken glass. 'What a number o
f cucumber-frames there must be!' thought Alice. 'I wonder what they'll do next!
 As for pulling me out of the window, I only wish they COULD! I'm sure I don't w
ant to stay in here any longer!'She waited for some time without hearing anythin
g more: at last came a rumbling of little cartwheels, and the sound of a good ma
ny voices all talking together: she made out the words: 'Where's the other ladde
r?Why, I hadn't to bring but one; Bill's got the otherBill! fetch it here, lad
!Here, put 'em up at this cornerNo, tie 'em together firstthey don't reach ha
lf high enough yetOh! they'll do well enough; don't be particularHere, Bill! c
atch hold of this ropeWill the roof bear?Mind that loose slateOh, it's coming
 down! Heads below!' (a loud crash)'Now, who did that?It was Bill, I fancyWho
's to go down the chimney?Nay, I shan't! YOU do it!That I won't, then!Bill's 
to go downHere, Bill! the master says you're to go down the chimney!''Oh! So Bi
ll's got to come down the chimney, has he?' said Alice to herself. 'Shy, they se
em to put everything upon Bill! I wouldn't be in Bill's place for a good deal: t
his fireplace is narrow, to be sure; but I THINK I can kick a little!'She drew h
er foot as far down the chimney as she could, and waited till she heard a little
 animal (she couldn't guess of what sort it was) scratching and scrambling about
 in the chimney close above her: then, saying to herself 'This is Bill,' she gav
e one sharp kick, and waited to see what would happen next.The first thing she h
eard was a general chorus of 'There goes Bill!' then the Rabbit's voice along'C
atch him, you by the hedge!' then silence, and then another confusion of voices
'Hold up his headBrandy nowDon't choke himHow was it, old fellow? What happen
ed to you? Tell us all about it!'Last came a little feeble, squeaking voice, ('T
hat's Bill,' thought Alice,) 'Well, I hardly knowNo more, thank ye; I'm better 
nowbut I'm a deal too flustered to tell youall I know is, something comes at m
e like a Jack-in-the-box, and up I goes like a sky-rocket!''So you did, old fell
ow!' said the others.'We must burn the house down!' said the Rabbit's voice; and
 Alice called out as loud as she could, 'If you do. I'll set Dinah at you!'There
 was a dead silence instantly, and Alice thought to herself, 'I wonder what they
 WILL do next! If they had any sense, they'd take the roof off.' After a minute 
or two, they began moving about again, and Alice heard the Rabbit say, 'A barrow
ful will do, to begin with.''A barrowful of WHAT?' thought Alice; but she had no
t long to doubt, for the next moment a shower of little pebbles came rattling in
 at the window, and some of them hit her in the face. 'I'll put a stop to this,'
 she said to herself, and shouted out, 'You'd better not do that again!' which p
roduced another dead silence.Alice noticed with some surprise that the pebbles w
ere all turning into little cakes as they lay on the floor, and a bright idea ca
me into her head. 'If I eat one of these cakes,' she thought, 'it's sure to make
 SOME change in my size; and as it can't possibly make me larger, it must make m
e smaller, I suppose.'So she swallowed one of the cakes, and was delighted to fi
nd that she began shrinking directly. As soon as she was small enough to get thr
ough the door, she ran out of the house, and found quite a crowd of little anima
ls and birds waiting outside. The poor little Lizard, Bill, was in the middle, b
eing held up by two guinea-pigs, who were giving it something out of a bottle. T
hey all made a rush at Alice the moment she appeared; but she ran off as hard as
 she could, and soon found herself safe in a thick wood.'The first thing I've go
t to do,' said Alice to herself, as she wandered about in the wood, 'is to grow 
to my right size again; and the second thing is to find my way into that lovely 
garden. I think that will be the best plan.'It sounded an excellent plan, no dou
bt, and very neatly and simply arranged; the only difficulty was, that she had n
ot the smallest idea how to set about it; and while she was peering about anxiou
sly among the trees, a little sharp bark just over her head made her look up in 
a great hurry.An enormous puppy was looking down at her with large round eyes, a
nd feebly stretching out one paw, trying to touch her. 'Poor little thing!' said
 Alice, in a coaxing tone, and she tried hard to whistle to it; but she was terr
ibly frightened all the time at the thought that it might be hungry, in which ca
se it would be very likely to eat her up in spite of all her coaxing.Hardly know
ing what she did, she picked up a little bit of stick, and held it out to the pu
ppy; whereupon the puppy jumped into the air off all its feet at once, with a ye
lp of delight, and rushed at the stick, and made believe to worry it; then Alice
 dodged behind a great thistle, to keep herself from being run over; and the mom
ent she appeared on the other side, the puppy made another rush at the stick, an
d tumbled head over heels in its hurry to get hold of it; then Alice, thinking i
t was very like having a game of play with a cart-horse, and expecting every mom
ent to be trampled under its feet, ran round the thistle again; then the puppy b
egan a series of short charges at the stick, running a very little way forwards 
each time and a long way back, and barking hoarsely all the while, till at last 
it sat down a good way off, panting, with its tongue hanging out of its mouth, a
nd its great eyes half shut.This seemed to Alice a good opportunity for making h
er escape; so she set off at once, and ran till she was quite tired and out of b
reath, and till the puppy's bark sounded quite faint in the distance.'And yet wh
at a dear little puppy it was!' said Alice, as she leant against a buttercup to 
rest herself, and fanned herself with one of the leaves: 'I should have liked te
aching it tricks very much, ifif I'd only been the right size to do it! Oh dear
! I'd nearly forgotten that I've got to grow up again! Let me seehow IS it to b
e managed? I suppose I ought to eat or drink something or other; but the great q
uestion is, what?'The great question certainly was, what? Alice looked all round
 her at the flowers and the blades of grass, but she did not see anything that l
ooked like the right thing to eat or drink under the circumstances. There was a 
large mushroom growing near her, about the same height as herself; and when she 
had looked under it, and on both sides of it, and behind it, it occurred to her 
that she might as well look and see what was on the top of it.She stretched hers
elf up on tiptoe, and peeped over the edge of the mushroom, and her eyes immedia
tely met those of a large caterpillar, that was sitting on the top with its arms
 folded, quietly smoking a long hookah, and taking not the smallest notice of he
r or of anything else.CHAPTER V. Advice from a CaterpillarThe Caterpillar and Al
ice looked at each other for some time in silence: at last the Caterpillar took 
the hookah out of its mouth, and addressed her in a languid, sleepy voice.'Who a
re YOU?' said the Caterpillar.This was not an encouraging opening for a conversa
tion. Alice replied, rather shyly, 'II hardly know, sir, just at presentat lea
st I know who I WAS when I got up this morning, but I think I must have been cha
nged several times since then.''What do you mean by that?' said the Caterpillar 
sternly. 'Explain yourself!''I can't explain MYSELF, I'm afraid, sir' said Alice
, 'because I'm not myself, you see.''I don't see,' said the Caterpillar.'I'm afr
aid I can't put it more clearly,' Alice replied very politely, 'for I can't unde
rstand it myself to begin with; and being so many different sizes in a day is ve
ry confusing.''It isn't,' said the Caterpillar.'Well, perhaps you haven't found 
it so yet,' said Alice; 'but when you have to turn into a chrysalisyou will som
e day, you knowand then after that into a butterfly, I should think you'll feel
 it a little queer, won't you?''Not a bit,' said the Caterpillar.'Well, perhaps 
your feelings may be different,' said Alice; 'all I know is, it would feel very 
queer to ME.''You!' said the Caterpillar contemptuously. 'Who are YOU?'Which bro
ught them back again to the beginning of the conversation. Alice felt a little i
rritated at the Caterpillar's making such VERY short remarks, and she drew herse
lf up and said, very gravely, 'I think, you ought to tell me who YOU are, first.
''Why?' said the Caterpillar.Here was another puzzling question; and as Alice co
uld not think of any good reason, and as the Caterpillar seemed to be in a VERY 
unpleasant state of mind, she turned away.'Come back!' the Caterpillar called af
ter her. 'I've something important to say!'This sounded promising, certainly: Al
ice turned and came back again.'Keep your temper,' said the Caterpillar.'Is that
 all?' said Alice, swallowing down her anger as well as she could.'No,' said the
 Caterpillar.Alice thought she might as well wait, as she had nothing else to do
, and perhaps after all it might tell her something worth hearing. For some minu
tes it puffed away without speaking, but at last it unfolded its arms, took the 
hookah out of its mouth again, and said, 'So you think you're changed, do you?''
I'm afraid I am, sir,' said Alice; 'I can't remember things as I usedand I don'
t keep the same size for ten minutes together!''Can't remember WHAT things?' sai
d the Caterpillar.'Well, I've tried to say "HOW DOTH THE LITTLE BUSY BEE," but i
t all came different!' Alice replied in a very melancholy voice.'Repeat, "YOU AR
E OLD, FATHER WILLIAM,"' said the Caterpillar.Alice folded her hands, and began:
'You are old, Father William,' the young man said,'And your hair has become ver
y white;And yet you incessantly stand on your headDo you think, at your age, it
 is right?''In my youth,' Father William replied to his son,'I feared it might i
njure the brain;But, now that I'm perfectly sure I have none,Why, I do it again 
and again.''You are old,' said the youth, 'as I mentioned before,And have grown 
most uncommonly fat;Yet you turned a back-somersault in at the doorPray, what i
s the reason of that?''In my youth,' said the sage, as he shook his grey locks,'
I kept all my limbs very suppleBy the use of this ointmentone shilling the box
Allow me to sell you a couple?''You are old,' said the youth, 'and your jaws are
 too weakFor anything tougher than suet;Yet you finished the goose, with the bon
es and the beakPray how did you manage to do it?''In my youth,' said his father
, 'I took to the law,And argued each case with my wife;And the muscular strength
, which it gave to my jaw,Has lasted the rest of my life.''You are old,' said th
e youth, 'one would hardly supposeThat your eye was as steady as ever;Yet you ba
lanced an eel on the end of your noseWhat made you so awfully clever?''I have a
nswered three questions, and that is enough,'Said his father; 'don't give yourse
lf airs!Do you think I can listen all day to such stuff?Be off, or I'll kick you
 down stairs!''That is not said right,' said the Caterpillar.'Not QUITE right, I
'm afraid,' said Alice, timidly; 'some of the words have got altered.''It is wro
ng from beginning to end,' said the Caterpillar decidedly, and there was silence
 for some minutes.The Caterpillar was the first to speak.'What size do you want 
to be?' it asked.'Oh, I'm not particular as to size,' Alice hastily replied; 'on
ly one doesn't like changing so often, you know.''I DON'T know,' said the Caterp
illar.Alice said nothing: she had never been so much contradicted in her life be
fore, and she felt that she was losing her temper.'Are you content now?' said th
e Caterpillar.'Well, I should like to be a LITTLE larger, sir, if you wouldn't m
ind,' said Alice: 'three inches is such a wretched height to be.''It is a very g
ood height indeed!' said the Caterpillar angrily, rearing itself upright as it s
poke (it was exactly three inches high).'But I'm not used to it!' pleaded poor A
lice in a piteous tone. And she thought of herself, 'I wish the creatures wouldn
't be so easily offended!''You'll get used to it in time,' said the Caterpillar;
 and it put the hookah into its mouth and began smoking again.This time Alice wa
ited patiently until it chose to speak again. In a minute or two the Caterpillar
 took the hookah out of its mouth and yawned once or twice, and shook itself. Th
en it got down off the mushroom, and crawled away in the grass, merely remarking
 as it went, 'One side will make you grow taller, and the other side will make y
ou grow shorter.''One side of WHAT? The other side of WHAT?' thought Alice to he
rself.'Of the mushroom,' said the Caterpillar, just as if she had asked it aloud
; and in another moment it was out of sight.Alice remained looking thoughtfully 
at the mushroom for a minute, trying to make out which were the two sides of it;
 and as it was perfectly round, she found this a very difficult question. Howeve
r, at last she stretched her arms round it as far as they would go, and broke of
f a bit of the edge with each hand.'And now which is which?' she said to herself
, and nibbled a little of the right-hand bit to try the effect: the next moment 
she felt a violent blow underneath her chin: it had struck her foot!She was a go
od deal frightened by this very sudden change, but she felt that there was no ti
me to be lost, as she was shrinking rapidly; so she set to work at once to eat s
ome of the other bit. Her chin was pressed so closely against her foot, that the
re was hardly room to open her mouth; but she did it at last, and managed to swa
llow a morsel of the lefthand bit.*    *    *    *    *    *    **    *    *    
*    *    **    *    *    *    *    *    *'Come, my head's free at last!' said A
lice in a tone of delight, which changed into alarm in another moment, when she 
found that her shoulders were nowhere to be found: all she could see, when she l
ooked down, was an immense length of neck, which seemed to rise like a stalk out
 of a sea of green leaves that lay far below her.'What CAN all that green stuff 
be?' said Alice. 'And where HAVE my shoulders got to? And oh, my poor hands, how
 is it I can't see you?' She was moving them about as she spoke, but no result s
eemed to follow, except a little shaking among the distant green leaves.As there
 seemed to be no chance of getting her hands up to her head, she tried to get he
r head down to them, and was delighted to find that her neck would bend about ea
sily in any direction, like a serpent. She had just succeeded in curving it down
 into a graceful zigzag, and was going to dive in among the leaves, which she fo
und to be nothing but the tops of the trees under which she had been wandering, 
when a sharp hiss made her draw back in a hurry: a large pigeon had flown into h
er face, and was beating her violently with its wings.'Serpent!' screamed the Pi
geon.'I'm NOT a serpent!' said Alice indignantly. 'Let me alone!''Serpent, I say
 again!' repeated the Pigeon, but in a more subdued tone, and added with a kind 
of sob, 'I've tried every way, and nothing seems to suit them!''I haven't the le
ast idea what you're talking about,' said Alice.'I've tried the roots of trees, 
and I've tried banks, and I've tried hedges,' the Pigeon went on, without attend
ing to her; 'but those serpents! There's no pleasing them!'Alice was more and mo
re puzzled, but she thought there was no use in saying anything more till the Pi
geon had finished.'As if it wasn't trouble enough hatching the eggs,' said the P
igeon; 'but I must be on the look-out for serpents night and day! Why, I haven't
 had a wink of sleep these three weeks!''I'm very sorry you've been annoyed,' sa
id Alice, who was beginning to see its meaning.'And just as I'd taken the highes
t tree in the wood,' continued the Pigeon, raising its voice to a shriek, 'and j
ust as I was thinking I should be free of them at last, they must needs come wri
ggling down from the sky! Ugh, Serpent!''But I'm NOT a serpent, I tell you!' sai
d Alice. 'I'm aI'm a''Well! WHAT are you?' said the Pigeon. 'I can see you're 
trying to invent something!''II'm a little girl,' said Alice, rather doubtfully
, as she remembered the number of changes she had gone through that day.'A likel
y story indeed!' said the Pigeon in a tone of the deepest contempt. 'I've seen a
 good many little girls in my time, but never ONE with such a neck as that! No, 
no! You're a serpent; and there's no use denying it. I suppose you'll be telling
 me next that you never tasted an egg!''I HAVE tasted eggs, certainly,' said Ali
ce, who was a very truthful child; 'but little girls eat eggs quite as much as s
erpents do, you know.''I don't believe it,' said the Pigeon; 'but if they do, wh
y then they're a kind of serpent, that's all I can say.'This was such a new idea
 to Alice, that she was quite silent for a minute or two, which gave the Pigeon 
the opportunity of adding, 'You're looking for eggs, I know THAT well enough; an
d what does it matter to me whether you're a little girl or a serpent?''It matte
rs a good deal to ME,' said Alice hastily; 'but I'm not looking for eggs, as it 
happens; and if I was, I shouldn't want YOURS: I don't like them raw.''Well, be 
off, then!' said the Pigeon in a sulky tone, as it settled down again into its n
est. Alice crouched down among the trees as well as she could, for her neck kept
 getting entangled among the branches, and every now and then she had to stop an
d untwist it. After a while she remembered that she still held the pieces of mus
hroom in her hands, and she set to work very carefully, nibbling first at one an
d then at the other, and growing sometimes taller and sometimes shorter, until s
he had succeeded in bringing herself down to her usual height.It was so long sin
ce she had been anything near the right size, that it felt quite strange at firs
t; but she got used to it in a few minutes, and began talking to herself, as usu
al. 'Come, there's half my plan done now! How puzzling all these changes are! I'
m never sure what I'm going to be, from one minute to another! However, I've got
 back to my right size: the next thing is, to get into that beautiful gardenhow
 IS that to be done, I wonder?' As she said this, she came suddenly upon an open
 place, with a little house in it about four feet high. 'Whoever lives there,' t
hought Alice, 'it'll never do to come upon them THIS size: why, I should frighte
n them out of their wits!' So she began nibbling at the righthand bit again, and
 did not venture to go near the house till she had brought herself down to nine 
inches high.CHAPTER VI. Pig and PepperFor a minute or two she stood looking at t
he house, and wondering what to do next, when suddenly a footman in livery came 
running out of the wood(she considered him to be a footman because he was in li
very: otherwise, judging by his face only, she would have called him a fish)and
 rapped loudly at the door with his knuckles. It was opened by another footman i
n livery, with a round face, and large eyes like a frog; and both footmen, Alice
 noticed, had powdered hair that curled all over their heads. She felt very curi
ous to know what it was all about, and crept a little way out of the wood to lis
ten.The Fish-Footman began by producing from under his arm a great letter, nearl
y as large as himself, and this he handed over to the other, saying, in a solemn
 tone, 'For the Duchess. An invitation from the Queen to play croquet.' The Frog
-Footman repeated, in the same solemn tone, only changing the order of the words
 a little, 'From the Queen. An invitation for the Duchess to play croquet.'Then 
they both bowed low, and their curls got entangled together.Alice laughed so muc
h at this, that she had to run back into the wood for fear of their hearing her;
 and when she next peeped out the Fish-Footman was gone, and the other was sitti
ng on the ground near the door, staring stupidly up into the sky.Alice went timi
dly up to the door, and knocked.'There's no sort of use in knocking,' said the F
ootman, 'and that for two reasons. First, because I'm on the same side of the do
or as you are; secondly, because they're making such a noise inside, no one coul
d possibly hear you.' And certainly there was a most extraordinary noise going o
n withina constant howling and sneezing, and every now and then a great crash, 
as if a dish or kettle had been broken to pieces.'Please, then,' said Alice, 'ho
w am I to get in?''There might be some sense in your knocking,' the Footman went
 on without attending to her, 'if we had the door between us. For instance, if y
ou were INSIDE, you might knock, and I could let you out, you know.' He was look
ing up into the sky all the time he was speaking, and this Alice thought decided
ly uncivil. 'But perhaps he can't help it,' she said to herself; 'his eyes are s
o VERY nearly at the top of his head. But at any rate he might answer questions.
How am I to get in?' she repeated, aloud.'I shall sit here,' the Footman remark
ed, 'till tomorrow'At this moment the door of the house opened, and a large pla
te came skimming out, straight at the Footman's head: it just grazed his nose, a
nd broke to pieces against one of the trees behind him.'or next day, maybe,' th
e Footman continued in the same tone, exactly as if nothing had happened.'How am
 I to get in?' asked Alice again, in a louder tone.'ARE you to get in at all?' s
aid the Footman. 'That's the first question, you know.'It was, no doubt: only Al
ice did not like to be told so. 'It's really dreadful,' she muttered to herself,
 'the way all the creatures argue. It's enough to drive one crazy!'The Footman s
eemed to think this a good opportunity for repeating his remark, with variations
. 'I shall sit here,' he said, 'on and off, for days and days.''But what am I to
 do?' said Alice.'Anything you like,' said the Footman, and began whistling.'Oh,
 there's no use in talking to him,' said Alice desperately: 'he's perfectly idio
tic!' And she opened the door and went in.The door led right into a large kitche
n, which was full of smoke from one end to the other: the Duchess was sitting on
 a three-legged stool in the middle, nursing a baby; the cook was leaning over t
he fire, stirring a large cauldron which seemed to be full of soup.'There's cert
ainly too much pepper in that soup!' Alice said to herself, as well as she could
 for sneezing.There was certainly too much of it in the air. Even the Duchess sn
eezed occasionally; and as for the baby, it was sneezing and howling alternately
 without a moment's pause. The only things in the kitchen that did not sneeze, w
ere the cook, and a large cat which was sitting on the hearth and grinning from 
ear to ear.'Please would you tell me,' said Alice, a little timidly, for she was
 not quite sure whether it was good manners for her to speak first, 'why your ca
t grins like that?''It's a Cheshire cat,' said the Duchess, 'and that's why. Pig
!'She said the last word with such sudden violence that Alice quite jumped; but 
she saw in another moment that it was addressed to the baby, and not to her, so 
she took courage, and went on again:'I didn't know that Cheshire cats always gr
inned; in fact, I didn't know that cats COULD grin.''They all can,' said the Duc
hess; 'and most of 'em do.''I don't know of any that do,' Alice said very polite
ly, feeling quite pleased to have got into a conversation.'You don't know much,'
 said the Duchess; 'and that's a fact.'Alice did not at all like the tone of thi
s remark, and thought it would be as well to introduce some other subject of con
versation. While she was trying to fix on one, the cook took the cauldron of sou
p off the fire, and at once set to work throwing everything within her reach at 
the Duchess and the babythe fire-irons came first; then followed a shower of sa
ucepans, plates, and dishes. The Duchess took no notice of them even when they h
it her; and the baby was howling so much already, that it was quite impossible t
o say whether the blows hurt it or not.'Oh, PLEASE mind what you're doing!' crie
d Alice, jumping up and down in an agony of terror. 'Oh, there goes his PRECIOUS
 nose'; as an unusually large saucepan flew close by it, and very nearly carried
 it off.'If everybody minded their own business,' the Duchess said in a hoarse g
rowl, 'the world would go round a deal faster than it does.''Which would NOT be 
an advantage,' said Alice, who felt very glad to get an opportunity of showing o
ff a little of her knowledge. 'Just think of what work it would make with the da
y and night! You see the earth takes twenty-four hours to turn round on its axis
''Talking of axes,' said the Duchess, 'chop off her head!'Alice glanced rather 
anxiously at the cook, to see if she meant to take the hint; but the cook was bu
sily stirring the soup, and seemed not to be listening, so she went on again: 'T
wenty-four hours, I THINK; or is it twelve? I''Oh, don't bother ME,' said the D
uchess; 'I never could abide figures!' And with that she began nursing her child
 again, singing a sort of lullaby to it as she did so, and giving it a violent s
hake at the end of every line:'Speak roughly to your little boy,And beat him whe
n he sneezes:He only does it to annoy,Because he knows it teases.'CHORUS.(In whi
ch the cook and the baby joined):'Wow! wow! wow!'While the Duchess sang the sec
ond verse of the song, she kept tossing the baby violently up and down, and the 
poor little thing howled so, that Alice could hardly hear the words:'I speak se
verely to my boy,I beat him when he sneezes;For he can thoroughly enjoyThe peppe
r when he pleases!'CHORUS.'Wow! wow! wow!''Here! you may nurse it a bit, if you 
like!' the Duchess said to Alice, flinging the baby at her as she spoke. 'I must
 go and get ready to play croquet with the Queen,' and she hurried out of the ro
om. The cook threw a frying-pan after her as she went out, but it just missed he
r.Alice caught the baby with some difficulty, as it was a queer-shaped little cr
eature, and held out its arms and legs in all directions, 'just like a star-fish
,' thought Alice. The poor little thing was snorting like a steam-engine when sh
e caught it, and kept doubling itself up and straightening itself out again, so 
that altogether, for the first minute or two, it was as much as she could do to 
hold it.As soon as she had made out the proper way of nursing it, (which was to 
twist it up into a sort of knot, and then keep tight hold of its right ear and l
eft foot, so as to prevent its undoing itself,) she carried it out into the open
 air. 'IF I don't take this child away with me,' thought Alice, 'they're sure to
 kill it in a day or two: wouldn't it be murder to leave it behind?' She said th
e last words out loud, and the little thing grunted in reply (it had left off sn
eezing by this time). 'Don't grunt,' said Alice; 'that's not at all a proper way
 of expressing yourself.'The baby grunted again, and Alice looked very anxiously
 into its face to see what was the matter with it. There could be no doubt that 
it had a VERY turn-up nose, much more like a snout than a real nose; also its ey
es were getting extremely small for a baby: altogether Alice did not like the lo
ok of the thing at all. 'But perhaps it was only sobbing,' she thought, and look
ed into its eyes again, to see if there were any tears.No, there were no tears. 
'If you're going to turn into a pig, my dear,' said Alice, seriously, 'I'll have
 nothing more to do with you. Mind now!' The poor little thing sobbed again (or 
grunted, it was impossible to say which), and they went on for some while in sil
ence.Alice was just beginning to think to herself, 'Now, what am I to do with th
is creature when I get it home?' when it grunted again, so violently, that she l
ooked down into its face in some alarm. This time there could be NO mistake abou
t it: it was neither more nor less than a pig, and she felt that it would be qui
te absurd for her to carry it further.So she set the little creature down, and f
elt quite relieved to see it trot away quietly into the wood. 'If it had grown u
p,' she said to herself, 'it would have made a dreadfully ugly child: but it mak
es rather a handsome pig, I think.' And she began thinking over other children s
he knew, who might do very well as pigs, and was just saying to herself, 'if one
 only knew the right way to change them' when she was a little startled by seei
ng the Cheshire Cat sitting on a bough of a tree a few yards off.The Cat only gr
inned when it saw Alice. It looked good-natured, she thought: still it had VERY 
long claws and a great many teeth, so she felt that it ought to be treated with 
respect.'Cheshire Puss,' she began, rather timidly, as she did not at all know w
hether it would like the name: however, it only grinned a little wider. 'Come, i
t's pleased so far,' thought Alice, and she went on. 'Would you tell me, please,
 which way I ought to go from here?''That depends a good deal on where you want 
to get to,' said the Cat.'I don't much care where' said Alice.'Then it doesn't 
matter which way you go,' said the Cat.'so long as I get SOMEWHERE,' Alice adde
d as an explanation.'Oh, you're sure to do that,' said the Cat, 'if you only wal
k long enough.'Alice felt that this could not be denied, so she tried another qu
estion. 'What sort of people live about here?''In THAT direction,' the Cat said,
 waving its right paw round, 'lives a Hatter: and in THAT direction,' waving the
 other paw, 'lives a March Hare. Visit either you like: they're both mad.''But I
 don't want to go among mad people,' Alice remarked.'Oh, you can't help that,' s
aid the Cat: 'we're all mad here. I'm mad. You're mad.''How do you know I'm mad?
' said Alice.'You must be,' said the Cat, 'or you wouldn't have come here.'Alice
 didn't think that proved it at all; however, she went on 'And how do you know t
hat you're mad?''To begin with,' said the Cat, 'a dog's not mad. You grant that?
''I suppose so,' said Alice.'Well, then,' the Cat went on, 'you see, a dog growl
s when it's angry, and wags its tail when it's pleased. Now I growl when I'm ple
ased, and wag my tail when I'm angry. Therefore I'm mad.''I call it purring, not
 growling,' said Alice.'Call it what you like,' said the Cat. 'Do you play croqu
et with the Queen to-day?''I should like it very much,' said Alice, 'but I haven
't been invited yet.''You'll see me there,' said the Cat, and vanished.Alice was
 not much surprised at this, she was getting so used to queer things happening. 
While she was looking at the place where it had been, it suddenly appeared again
.'By-the-bye, what became of the baby?' said the Cat. 'I'd nearly forgotten to a
sk.''It turned into a pig,' Alice quietly said, just as if it had come back in a
 natural way.'I thought it would,' said the Cat, and vanished again.Alice waited
 a little, half expecting to see it again, but it did not appear, and after a mi
nute or two she walked on in the direction in which the March Hare was said to l
ive. 'I've seen hatters before,' she said to herself; 'the March Hare will be mu
ch the most interesting, and perhaps as this is May it won't be raving madat le
ast not so mad as it was in March.' As she said this, she looked up, and there w
as the Cat again, sitting on a branch of a tree.'Did you say pig, or fig?' said 
the Cat.'I said pig,' replied Alice; 'and I wish you wouldn't keep appearing and
 vanishing so suddenly: you make one quite giddy.''All right,' said the Cat; and
 this time it vanished quite slowly, beginning with the end of the tail, and end
ing with the grin, which remained some time after the rest of it had gone.'Well!
 I've often seen a cat without a grin,' thought Alice; 'but a grin without a cat
! It's the most curious thing I ever saw in my life!'She had not gone much farth
er before she came in sight of the house of the March Hare: she thought it must 
be the right house, because the chimneys were shaped like ears and the roof was 
thatched with fur. It was so large a house, that she did not like to go nearer t
ill she had nibbled some more of the lefthand bit of mushroom, and raised hersel
f to about two feet high: even then she walked up towards it rather timidly, say
ing to herself 'Suppose it should be raving mad after all! I almost wish I'd gon
e to see the Hatter instead!'CHAPTER VII. A Mad Tea-PartyThere was a table set o
ut under a tree in front of the house, and the March Hare and the Hatter were ha
ving tea at it: a Dormouse was sitting between them, fast asleep, and the other 
two were using it as a cushion, resting their elbows on it, and talking over its
 head. 'Very uncomfortable for the Dormouse,' thought Alice; 'only, as it's asle
ep, I suppose it doesn't mind.'The table was a large one, but the three were all
 crowded together at one corner of it: 'No room! No room!' they cried out when t
hey saw Alice coming. 'There's PLENTY of room!' said Alice indignantly, and she 
sat down in a large arm-chair at one end of the table.'Have some wine,' the Marc
h Hare said in an encouraging tone.Alice looked all round the table, but there w
as nothing on it but tea. 'I don't see any wine,' she remarked.'There isn't any,
' said the March Hare.'Then it wasn't very civil of you to offer it,' said Alice
 angrily.'It wasn't very civil of you to sit down without being invited,' said t
he March Hare.'I didn't know it was YOUR table,' said Alice; 'it's laid for a gr
eat many more than three.''Your hair wants cutting,' said the Hatter. He had bee
n looking at Alice for some time with great curiosity, and this was his first sp
eech.'You should learn not to make personal remarks,' Alice said with some sever
ity; 'it's very rude.'The Hatter opened his eyes very wide on hearing this; but 
all he SAID was, 'Why is a raven like a writing-desk?''Come, we shall have some 
fun now!' thought Alice. 'I'm glad they've begun asking riddles.I believe I can
 guess that,' she added aloud.'Do you mean that you think you can find out the a
nswer to it?' said the March Hare.'Exactly so,' said Alice.'Then you should say 
what you mean,' the March Hare went on.'I do,' Alice hastily replied; 'at least
at least I mean what I saythat's the same thing, you know.''Not the same thing 
a bit!' said the Hatter. 'You might just as well say that "I see what I eat" is 
the same thing as "I eat what I see"!''You might just as well say,' added the Ma
rch Hare, 'that "I like what I get" is the same thing as "I get what I like"!''Y
ou might just as well say,' added the Dormouse, who seemed to be talking in his 
sleep, 'that "I breathe when I sleep" is the same thing as "I sleep when I breat
he"!''It IS the same thing with you,' said the Hatter, and here the conversation
 dropped, and the party sat silent for a minute, while Alice thought over all sh
e could remember about ravens and writing-desks, which wasn't much.The Hatter wa
s the first to break the silence. 'What day of the month is it?' he said, turnin
g to Alice: he had taken his watch out of his pocket, and was looking at it unea
sily, shaking it every now and then, and holding it to his ear.Alice considered 
a little, and then said 'The fourth.''Two days wrong!' sighed the Hatter. 'I tol
d you butter wouldn't suit the works!' he added looking angrily at the March Har
e.'It was the BEST butter,' the March Hare meekly replied.'Yes, but some crumbs 
must have got in as well,' the Hatter grumbled: 'you shouldn't have put it in wi
th the bread-knife.'The March Hare took the watch and looked at it gloomily: the
n he dipped it into his cup of tea, and looked at it again: but he could think o
f nothing better to say than his first remark, 'It was the BEST butter, you know
.'Alice had been looking over his shoulder with some curiosity. 'What a funny wa
tch!' she remarked. 'It tells the day of the month, and doesn't tell what o'cloc
k it is!''Why should it?' muttered the Hatter. 'Does YOUR watch tell you what ye
ar it is?''Of course not,' Alice replied very readily: 'but that's because it st
ays the same year for such a long time together.''Which is just the case with MI
NE,' said the Hatter.Alice felt dreadfully puzzled. The Hatter's remark seemed t
o have no sort of meaning in it, and yet it was certainly English. 'I don't quit
e understand you,' she said, as politely as she could.'The Dormouse is asleep ag
ain,' said the Hatter, and he poured a little hot tea upon its nose.The Dormouse
 shook its head impatiently, and said, without opening its eyes, 'Of course, of 
course; just what I was going to remark myself.''Have you guessed the riddle yet
?' the Hatter said, turning to Alice again.'No, I give it up,' Alice replied: 'w
hat's the answer?''I haven't the slightest idea,' said the Hatter.'Nor I,' said 
the March Hare.Alice sighed wearily. 'I think you might do something better with
 the time,' she said, 'than waste it in asking riddles that have no answers.''If
 you knew Time as well as I do,' said the Hatter, 'you wouldn't talk about wasti
ng IT. It's HIM.''I don't know what you mean,' said Alice.'Of course you don't!'
 the Hatter said, tossing his head contemptuously. 'I dare say you never even sp
oke to Time!''Perhaps not,' Alice cautiously replied: 'but I know I have to beat
 time when I learn music.''Ah! that accounts for it,' said the Hatter. 'He won't
 stand beating. Now, if you only kept on good terms with him, he'd do almost any
thing you liked with the clock. For instance, suppose it were nine o'clock in th
e morning, just time to begin lessons: you'd only have to whisper a hint to Time
, and round goes the clock in a twinkling! Half-past one, time for dinner!'('I o
nly wish it was,' the March Hare said to itself in a whisper.)'That would be gra
nd, certainly,' said Alice thoughtfully: 'but thenI shouldn't be hungry for it,
 you know.''Not at first, perhaps,' said the Hatter: 'but you could keep it to h
alf-past one as long as you liked.''Is that the way YOU manage?' Alice asked.The
 Hatter shook his head mournfully. 'Not I!' he replied. 'We quarrelled last Marc
hjust before HE went mad, you know' (pointing with his tea spoon at the March 
Hare,) 'it was at the great concert given by the Queen of Hearts, and I had to 
sing"Twinkle, twinkle, little bat!How I wonder what you're at!"You know the song
, perhaps?''I've heard something like it,' said Alice.'It goes on, you know,' th
e Hatter continued, 'in this way:"Up above the world you fly,Like a tea-tray in
 the sky.Twinkle, twinkle"'Here the Dormouse shook itself, and began singing in
 its sleep 'Twinkle, twinkle, twinkle, twinkle' and went on so long that they h
ad to pinch it to make it stop.'Well, I'd hardly finished the first verse,' said
 the Hatter, 'when the Queen jumped up and bawled out, "He's murdering the time!
 Off with his head!"''How dreadfully savage!' exclaimed Alice.'And ever since th
at,' the Hatter went on in a mournful tone, 'he won't do a thing I ask! It's alw
ays six o'clock now.'A bright idea came into Alice's head. 'Is that the reason s
o many tea-things are put out here?' she asked.'Yes, that's it,' said the Hatter
 with a sigh: 'it's always tea-time, and we've no time to wash the things betwee
n whiles.''Then you keep moving round, I suppose?' said Alice.'Exactly so,' said
 the Hatter: 'as the things get used up.''But what happens when you come to the 
beginning again?' Alice ventured to ask.'Suppose we change the subject,' the Mar
ch Hare interrupted, yawning. 'I'm getting tired of this. I vote the young lady 
tells us a story.''I'm afraid I don't know one,' said Alice, rather alarmed at t
he proposal.'Then the Dormouse shall!' they both cried. 'Wake up, Dormouse!' And
 they pinched it on both sides at once.The Dormouse slowly opened his eyes. 'I w
asn't asleep,' he said in a hoarse, feeble voice: 'I heard every word you fellow
s were saying.''Tell us a story!' said the March Hare.'Yes, please do!' pleaded 
Alice.'And be quick about it,' added the Hatter, 'or you'll be asleep again befo
re it's done.''Once upon a time there were three little sisters,' the Dormouse b
egan in a great hurry; 'and their names were Elsie, Lacie, and Tillie; and they 
lived at the bottom of a well''What did they live on?' said Alice, who always t
ook a great interest in questions of eating and drinking.'They lived on treacle,
' said the Dormouse, after thinking a minute or two.'They couldn't have done tha
t, you know,' Alice gently remarked; 'they'd have been ill.''So they were,' said
 the Dormouse; 'VERY ill.'Alice tried to fancy to herself what such an extraordi
nary ways of living would be like, but it puzzled her too much, so she went on: 
'But why did they live at the bottom of a well?''Take some more tea,' the March 
Hare said to Alice, very earnestly.'I've had nothing yet,' Alice replied in an o
ffended tone, 'so I can't take more.''You mean you can't take LESS,' said the Ha
tter: 'it's very easy to take MORE than nothing.''Nobody asked YOUR opinion,' sa
id Alice.'Who's making personal remarks now?' the Hatter asked triumphantly.Alic
e did not quite know what to say to this: so she helped herself to some tea and 
bread-and-butter, and then turned to the Dormouse, and repeated her question. 'W
hy did they live at the bottom of a well?'The Dormouse again took a minute or tw
o to think about it, and then said, 'It was a treacle-well.''There's no such thi
ng!' Alice was beginning very angrily, but the Hatter and the March Hare went 'S
h! sh!' and the Dormouse sulkily remarked, 'If you can't be civil, you'd better 
finish the story for yourself.''No, please go on!' Alice said very humbly; 'I wo
n't interrupt again. I dare say there may be ONE.''One, indeed!' said the Dormou
se indignantly. However, he consented to go on. 'And so these three little siste
rsthey were learning to draw, you know''What did they draw?' said Alice, quite
 forgetting her promise.'Treacle,' said the Dormouse, without considering at all
 this time.'I want a clean cup,' interrupted the Hatter: 'let's all move one pla
ce on.'He moved on as he spoke, and the Dormouse followed him: the March Hare mo
ved into the Dormouse's place, and Alice rather unwillingly took the place of th
e March Hare. The Hatter was the only one who got any advantage from the change:
 and Alice was a good deal worse off than before, as the March Hare had just ups
et the milk-jug into his plate.Alice did not wish to offend the Dormouse again, 
so she began very cautiously: 'But I don't understand. Where did they draw the t
reacle from?''You can draw water out of a water-well,' said the Hatter; 'so I sh
ould think you could draw treacle out of a treacle-welleh, stupid?''But they we
re IN the well,' Alice said to the Dormouse, not choosing to notice this last re
mark.'Of course they were', said the Dormouse; 'well in.'This answer so confuse
d poor Alice, that she let the Dormouse go on for some time without interrupting
 it.'They were learning to draw,' the Dormouse went on, yawning and rubbing its 
eyes, for it was getting very sleepy; 'and they drew all manner of thingseveryt
hing that begins with an M''Why with an M?' said Alice.'Why not?' said the Marc
h Hare.Alice was silent.The Dormouse had closed its eyes by this time, and was g
oing off into a doze; but, on being pinched by the Hatter, it woke up again with
 a little shriek, and went on: 'that begins with an M, such as mouse-traps, and
 the moon, and memory, and muchnessyou know you say things are "much of a muchn
ess"did you ever see such a thing as a drawing of a muchness?''Really, now you 
ask me,' said Alice, very much confused, 'I don't think''Then you shouldn't tal
k,' said the Hatter.This piece of rudeness was more than Alice could bear: she g
ot up in great disgust, and walked off; the Dormouse fell asleep instantly, and 
neither of the others took the least notice of her going, though she looked back
 once or twice, half hoping that they would call after her: the last time she sa
w them, they were trying to put the Dormouse into the teapot.'At any rate I'll n
ever go THERE again!' said Alice as she picked her way through the wood. 'It's t
he stupidest tea-party I ever was at in all my life!'Just as she said this, she 
noticed that one of the trees had a door leading right into it. 'That's very cur
ious!' she thought. 'But everything's curious today. I think I may as well go in
 at once.' And in she went.Once more she found herself in the long hall, and clo
se to the little glass table. 'Now, I'll manage better this time,' she said to h
erself, and began by taking the little golden key, and unlocking the door that l
ed into the garden. Then she went to work nibbling at the mushroom (she had kept
 a piece of it in her pocket) till she was about a foot high: then she walked do
wn the little passage: and THENshe found herself at last in the beautiful garde
n, among the bright flower-beds and the cool fountains.CHAPTER VIII. The Queen's
 Croquet-GroundA large rose-tree stood near the entrance of the garden: the rose
s growing on it were white, but there were three gardeners at it, busily paintin
g them red. Alice thought this a very curious thing, and she went nearer to watc
h them, and just as she came up to them she heard one of them say, 'Look out now
, Five! Don't go splashing paint over me like that!''I couldn't help it,' said F
ive, in a sulky tone; 'Seven jogged my elbow.'On which Seven looked up and said,
 'That's right, Five! Always lay the blame on others!''YOU'D better not talk!' s
aid Five. 'I heard the Queen say only yesterday you deserved to be beheaded!''Wh
at for?' said the one who had spoken first.'That's none of YOUR business, Two!' 
said Seven.'Yes, it IS his business!' said Five, 'and I'll tell himit was for b
ringing the cook tulip-roots instead of onions.'Seven flung down his brush, and 
had just begun 'Well, of all the unjust things' when his eye chanced to fall up
on Alice, as she stood watching them, and he checked himself suddenly: the other
s looked round also, and all of them bowed low.'Would you tell me,' said Alice, 
a little timidly, 'why you are painting those roses?'Five and Seven said nothing
, but looked at Two. Two began in a low voice, 'Why the fact is, you see, Miss, 
this here ought to have been a RED rose-tree, and we put a white one in by mista
ke; and if the Queen was to find it out, we should all have our heads cut off, y
ou know. So you see, Miss, we're doing our best, afore she comes, to' At this m
oment Five, who had been anxiously looking across the garden, called out 'The Qu
een! The Queen!' and the three gardeners instantly threw themselves flat upon th
eir faces. There was a sound of many footsteps, and Alice looked round, eager to
 see the Queen.First came ten soldiers carrying clubs; these were all shaped lik
e the three gardeners, oblong and flat, with their hands and feet at the corners
: next the ten courtiers; these were ornamented all over with diamonds, and walk
ed two and two, as the soldiers did. After these came the royal children; there 
were ten of them, and the little dears came jumping merrily along hand in hand, 
in couples: they were all ornamented with hearts. Next came the guests, mostly K
ings and Queens, and among them Alice recognised the White Rabbit: it was talkin
g in a hurried nervous manner, smiling at everything that was said, and went by 
without noticing her. Then followed the Knave of Hearts, carrying the King's cro
wn on a crimson velvet cushion; and, last of all this grand procession, came THE
 KING AND QUEEN OF HEARTS.Alice was rather doubtful whether she ought not to lie
 down on her face like the three gardeners, but she could not remember ever havi
ng heard of such a rule at processions; 'and besides, what would be the use of a
 procession,' thought she, 'if people had all to lie down upon their faces, so t
hat they couldn't see it?' So she stood still where she was, and waited.When the
 procession came opposite to Alice, they all stopped and looked at her, and the 
Queen said severely 'Who is this?' She said it to the Knave of Hearts, who only 
bowed and smiled in reply.'Idiot!' said the Queen, tossing her head impatiently;
 and, turning to Alice, she went on, 'What's your name, child?''My name is Alice
, so please your Majesty,' said Alice very politely; but she added, to herself, 
'Why, they're only a pack of cards, after all. I needn't be afraid of them!''And
 who are THESE?' said the Queen, pointing to the three gardeners who were lying 
round the rosetree; for, you see, as they were lying on their faces, and the pat
tern on their backs was the same as the rest of the pack, she could not tell whe
ther they were gardeners, or soldiers, or courtiers, or three of her own childre
n.'How should I know?' said Alice, surprised at her own courage. 'It's no busine
ss of MINE.'The Queen turned crimson with fury, and, after glaring at her for a 
moment like a wild beast, screamed 'Off with her head! Off''Nonsense!' said Ali
ce, very loudly and decidedly, and the Queen was silent.The King laid his hand u
pon her arm, and timidly said 'Consider, my dear: she is only a child!'The Queen
 turned angrily away from him, and said to the Knave 'Turn them over!'The Knave 
did so, very carefully, with one foot.'Get up!' said the Queen, in a shrill, lou
d voice, and the three gardeners instantly jumped up, and began bowing to the Ki
ng, the Queen, the royal children, and everybody else.'Leave off that!' screamed
 the Queen. 'You make me giddy.' And then, turning to the rose-tree, she went on
, 'What HAVE you been doing here?''May it please your Majesty,' said Two, in a v
ery humble tone, going down on one knee as he spoke, 'we were trying''I see!' s
aid the Queen, who had meanwhile been examining the roses. 'Off with their heads
!' and the procession moved on, three of the soldiers remaining behind to execut
e the unfortunate gardeners, who ran to Alice for protection.'You shan't be behe
aded!' said Alice, and she put them into a large flower-pot that stood near. The
 three soldiers wandered about for a minute or two, looking for them, and then q
uietly marched off after the others.'Are their heads off?' shouted the Queen.'Th
eir heads are gone, if it please your Majesty!' the soldiers shouted in reply.'T
hat's right!' shouted the Queen. 'Can you play croquet?'The soldiers were silent
, and looked at Alice, as the question was evidently meant for her.'Yes!' shoute
d Alice.'Come on, then!' roared the Queen, and Alice joined the procession, wond
ering very much what would happen next.'It'sit's a very fine day!' said a timid
 voice at her side. She was walking by the White Rabbit, who was peeping anxious
ly into her face.'Very,' said Alice: 'where's the Duchess?''Hush! Hush!' said t
he Rabbit in a low, hurried tone. He looked anxiously over his shoulder as he sp
oke, and then raised himself upon tiptoe, put his mouth close to her ear, and wh
ispered 'She's under sentence of execution.''What for?' said Alice.'Did you say 
"What a pity!"?' the Rabbit asked.'No, I didn't,' said Alice: 'I don't think it'
s at all a pity. I said "What for?"''She boxed the Queen's ears' the Rabbit beg
an. Alice gave a little scream of laughter. 'Oh, hush!' the Rabbit whispered in 
a frightened tone. 'The Queen will hear you! You see, she came rather late, and 
the Queen said''Get to your places!' shouted the Queen in a voice of thunder, a
nd people began running about in all directions, tumbling up against each other;
 however, they got settled down in a minute or two, and the game began. Alice th
ought she had never seen such a curious croquet-ground in her life; it was all r
idges and furrows; the balls were live hedgehogs, the mallets live flamingoes, a
nd the soldiers had to double themselves up and to stand on their hands and feet
, to make the arches.The chief difficulty Alice found at first was in managing h
er flamingo: she succeeded in getting its body tucked away, comfortably enough, 
under her arm, with its legs hanging down, but generally, just as she had got it
s neck nicely straightened out, and was going to give the hedgehog a blow with i
ts head, it WOULD twist itself round and look up in her face, with such a puzzle
d expression that she could not help bursting out laughing: and when she had got
 its head down, and was going to begin again, it was very provoking to find that
 the hedgehog had unrolled itself, and was in the act of crawling away: besides 
all this, there was generally a ridge or furrow in the way wherever she wanted t
o send the hedgehog to, and, as the doubled-up soldiers were always getting up a
nd walking off to other parts of the ground, Alice soon came to the conclusion t
hat it was a very difficult game indeed.The players all played at once without w
aiting for turns, quarrelling all the while, and fighting for the hedgehogs; and
 in a very short time the Queen was in a furious passion, and went stamping abou
t, and shouting 'Off with his head!' or 'Off with her head!' about once in a min
ute.Alice began to feel very uneasy: to be sure, she had not as yet had any disp
ute with the Queen, but she knew that it might happen any minute, 'and then,' th
ought she, 'what would become of me? They're dreadfully fond of beheading people
 here; the great wonder is, that there's any one left alive!'She was looking abo
ut for some way of escape, and wondering whether she could get away without bein
g seen, when she noticed a curious appearance in the air: it puzzled her very mu
ch at first, but, after watching it a minute or two, she made it out to be a gri
n, and she said to herself 'It's the Cheshire Cat: now I shall have somebody to 
talk to.''How are you getting on?' said the Cat, as soon as there was mouth enou
gh for it to speak with.Alice waited till the eyes appeared, and then nodded. 'I
t's no use speaking to it,' she thought, 'till its ears have come, or at least o
ne of them.' In another minute the whole head appeared, and then Alice put down 
her flamingo, and began an account of the game, feeling very glad she had someon
e to listen to her. The Cat seemed to think that there was enough of it now in s
ight, and no more of it appeared.'I don't think they play at all fairly,' Alice 
began, in rather a complaining tone, 'and they all quarrel so dreadfully one can
't hear oneself speakand they don't seem to have any rules in particular; at le
ast, if there are, nobody attends to themand you've no idea how confusing it is
 all the things being alive; for instance, there's the arch I've got to go throu
gh next walking about at the other end of the groundand I should have croqueted
 the Queen's hedgehog just now, only it ran away when it saw mine coming!''How d
o you like the Queen?' said the Cat in a low voice.'Not at all,' said Alice: 'sh
e's so extremely' Just then she noticed that the Queen was close behind her, li
stening: so she went on, 'likely to win, that it's hardly worth while finishing
 the game.'The Queen smiled and passed on.'Who ARE you talking to?' said the Kin
g, going up to Alice, and looking at the Cat's head with great curiosity.'It's a
 friend of minea Cheshire Cat,' said Alice: 'allow me to introduce it.''I don't
 like the look of it at all,' said the King: 'however, it may kiss my hand if it
 likes.''I'd rather not,' the Cat remarked.'Don't be impertinent,' said the King
, 'and don't look at me like that!' He got behind Alice as he spoke.'A cat may l
ook at a king,' said Alice. 'I've read that in some book, but I don't remember w
here.''Well, it must be removed,' said the King very decidedly, and he called th
e Queen, who was passing at the moment, 'My dear! I wish you would have this cat
 removed!'The Queen had only one way of settling all difficulties, great or smal
l. 'Off with his head!' she said, without even looking round.'I'll fetch the exe
cutioner myself,' said the King eagerly, and he hurried off.Alice thought she mi
ght as well go back, and see how the game was going on, as she heard the Queen's
 voice in the distance, screaming with passion. She had already heard her senten
ce three of the players to be executed for having missed their turns, and she di
d not like the look of things at all, as the game was in such confusion that she
 never knew whether it was her turn or not. So she went in search of her hedgeho
g.The hedgehog was engaged in a fight with another hedgehog, which seemed to Ali
ce an excellent opportunity for croqueting one of them with the other: the only 
difficulty was, that her flamingo was gone across to the other side of the garde
n, where Alice could see it trying in a helpless sort of way to fly up into a tr
ee.By the time she had caught the flamingo and brought it back, the fight was ov
er, and both the hedgehogs were out of sight: 'but it doesn't matter much,' thou
ght Alice, 'as all the arches are gone from this side of the ground.' So she tuc
ked it away under her arm, that it might not escape again, and went back for a l
ittle more conversation with her friend.When she got back to the Cheshire Cat, s
he was surprised to find quite a large crowd collected round it: there was a dis
pute going on between the executioner, the King, and the Queen, who were all tal
king at once, while all the rest were quite silent, and looked very uncomfortabl
e.The moment Alice appeared, she was appealed to by all three to settle the ques
tion, and they repeated their arguments to her, though, as they all spoke at onc
e, she found it very hard indeed to make out exactly what they said.The executio
ner's argument was, that you couldn't cut off a head unless there was a body to 
cut it off from: that he had never had to do such a thing before, and he wasn't 
going to begin at HIS time of life.The King's argument was, that anything that h
ad a head could be beheaded, and that you weren't to talk nonsense.The Queen's a
rgument was, that if something wasn't done about it in less than no time she'd h
ave everybody executed, all round. (It was this last remark that had made the wh
ole party look so grave and anxious.)Alice could think of nothing else to say bu
t 'It belongs to the Duchess: you'd better ask HER about it.''She's in prison,' 
the Queen said to the executioner: 'fetch her here.'And the executioner went off
 like an arrow.The Cat's head began fading away the moment he was gone, and,by t
he time he had come back with the Duchess, it had entirelydisappeared; so the Ki
ng and the executioner ran wildly up and downlooking for it, while the rest of t
he party went back to the game.CHAPTER IX. The Mock Turtle's Story'You can't thi
nk how glad I am to see you again, you dear old thing!' said the Duchess, as she
 tucked her arm affectionately into Alice's, and they walked off together.Alice 
was very glad to find her in such a pleasant temper, and thought to herself that
 perhaps it was only the pepper that had made her so savage when they met in the
 kitchen.'When I'M a Duchess,' she said to herself, (not in a very hopeful tone 
though), 'I won't have any pepper in my kitchen AT ALL. Soup does very well with
outMaybe it's always pepper that makes people hot-tempered,' she went on, very 
much pleased at having found out a new kind of rule, 'and vinegar that makes the
m sourand camomile that makes them bitterandand barley-sugar and such things 
that make children sweet-tempered. I only wish people knew that: then they would
n't be so stingy about it, you know'She had quite forgotten the Duchess by this
 time, and was a little startled when she heard her voice close to her ear. 'You
're thinking about something, my dear, and that makes you forget to talk. I can'
t tell you just now what the moral of that is, but I shall remember it in a bit.
''Perhaps it hasn't one,' Alice ventured to remark.'Tut, tut, child!' said the D
uchess. 'Everything's got a moral, if only you can find it.' And she squeezed he
rself up closer to Alice's side as she spoke.Alice did not much like keeping so 
close to her: first, because the Duchess was VERY ugly; and secondly, because sh
e was exactly the right height to rest her chin upon Alice's shoulder, and it wa
s an uncomfortably sharp chin. However, she did not like to be rude, so she bore
 it as well as she could.'The game's going on rather better now,' she said, by w
ay of keeping up the conversation a little.''Tis so,' said the Duchess: 'and the
 moral of that is"Oh, 'tis love, 'tis love, that makes the world go round!"''So
mebody said,' Alice whispered, 'that it's done by everybody minding their own bu
siness!''Ah, well! It means much the same thing,' said the Duchess, digging her 
sharp little chin into Alice's shoulder as she added, 'and the moral of THAT is
"Take care of the sense, and the sounds will take care of themselves."''How fond
 she is of finding morals in things!' Alice thought to herself.'I dare say you'r
e wondering why I don't put my arm round your waist,' the Duchess said after a p
ause: 'the reason is, that I'm doubtful about the temper of your flamingo. Shall
 I try the experiment?''HE might bite,' Alice cautiously replied, not feeling at
 all anxious to have the experiment tried.'Very true,' said the Duchess: 'flamin
goes and mustard both bite. And the moral of that is"Birds of a feather flock t
ogether."''Only mustard isn't a bird,' Alice remarked.'Right, as usual,' said th
e Duchess: 'what a clear way you have of putting things!''It's a mineral, I THIN
K,' said Alice.'Of course it is,' said the Duchess, who seemed ready to agree to
 everything that Alice said; 'there's a large mustard-mine near here. And the mo
ral of that is"The more there is of mine, the less there is of yours."''Oh, I k
now!' exclaimed Alice, who had not attended to this last remark, 'it's a vegetab
le. It doesn't look like one, but it is.''I quite agree with you,' said the Duch
ess; 'and the moral of that is"Be what you would seem to be"or if you'd like i
t put more simply"Never imagine yourself not to be otherwise than what it might
 appear to others that what you were or might have been was not otherwise than w
hat you had been would have appeared to them to be otherwise."''I think I should
 understand that better,' Alice said very politely, 'if I had it written down: b
ut I can't quite follow it as you say it.''That's nothing to what I could say if
 I chose,' the Duchess replied, in a pleased tone.'Pray don't trouble yourself t
o say it any longer than that,' said Alice.'Oh, don't talk about trouble!' said 
the Duchess. 'I make you a present of everything I've said as yet.''A cheap sort
 of present!' thought Alice. 'I'm glad they don't give birthday presents like th
at!' But she did not venture to say it out loud.'Thinking again?' the Duchess as
ked, with another dig of her sharp little chin.'I've a right to think,' said Ali
ce sharply, for she was beginning to feel a little worried.'Just about as much r
ight,' said the Duchess, 'as pigs have to fly; and the m'But here, to Alice's g
reat surprise, the Duchess's voice died away, even in the middle of her favourit
e word 'moral,' and the arm that was linked into hers began to tremble. Alice lo
oked up, and there stood the Queen in front of them, with her arms folded, frown
ing like a thunderstorm.'A fine day, your Majesty!' the Duchess began in a low, 
weak voice.'Now, I give you fair warning,' shouted the Queen, stamping on the gr
ound as she spoke; 'either you or your head must be off, and that in about half 
no time! Take your choice!'The Duchess took her choice, and was gone in a moment
.'Let's go on with the game,' the Queen said to Alice; and Alice was too much fr
ightened to say a word, but slowly followed her back to the croquet-ground.The o
ther guests had taken advantage of the Queen's absence, and were resting in the 
shade: however, the moment they saw her, they hurried back to the game, the Quee
n merely remarking that a moment's delay would cost them their lives.All the tim
e they were playing the Queen never left off quarrelling with the other players,
 and shouting 'Off with his head!' or 'Off with her head!' Those whom she senten
ced were taken into custody by the soldiers, who of course had to leave off bein
g arches to do this, so that by the end of half an hour or so there were no arch
es left, and all the players, except the King, the Queen, and Alice, were in cus
tody and under sentence of execution.Then the Queen left off, quite out of breat
h, and said to Alice, 'Have you seen the Mock Turtle yet?''No,' said Alice. 'I d
on't even know what a Mock Turtle is.''It's the thing Mock Turtle Soup is made f
rom,' said the Queen.'I never saw one, or heard of one,' said Alice.'Come on, th
en,' said the Queen, 'and he shall tell you his history,'As they walked off toge
ther, Alice heard the King say in a low voice, to the company generally, 'You ar
e all pardoned.' 'Come, THAT'S a good thing!' she said to herself, for she had f
elt quite unhappy at the number of executions the Queen had ordered.They very so
on came upon a Gryphon, lying fast asleep in the sun. (IF you don't know what a 
Gryphon is, look at the picture.) 'Up, lazy thing!' said the Queen, 'and take th
is young lady to see the Mock Turtle, and to hear his history. I must go back an
d see after some executions I have ordered'; and she walked off, leaving Alice a
lone with the Gryphon. Alice did not quite like the look of the creature, but on
 the whole she thought it would be quite as safe to stay with it as to go after 
that savage Queen: so she waited.The Gryphon sat up and rubbed its eyes: then it
 watched the Queen till she was out of sight: then it chuckled. 'What fun!' said
 the Gryphon, half to itself, half to Alice.'What IS the fun?' said Alice.'Why, 
SHE,' said the Gryphon. 'It's all her fancy, that: they never executes nobody, y
ou know. Come on!''Everybody says "come on!" here,' thought Alice, as she went s
lowly after it: 'I never was so ordered about in all my life, never!'They had no
t gone far before they saw the Mock Turtle in the distance, sitting sad and lone
ly on a little ledge of rock, and, as they came nearer, Alice could hear him sig
hing as if his heart would break. She pitied him deeply. 'What is his sorrow?' s
he asked the Gryphon, and the Gryphon answered, very nearly in the same words as
 before, 'It's all his fancy, that: he hasn't got no sorrow, you know. Come on!'
So they went up to the Mock Turtle, who looked at them with large eyes full of t
ears, but said nothing.'This here young lady,' said the Gryphon, 'she wants for 
to know your history, she do.''I'll tell it her,' said the Mock Turtle in a deep
, hollow tone: 'sit down, both of you, and don't speak a word till I've finished
.'So they sat down, and nobody spoke for some minutes. Alice thought to herself,
 'I don't see how he can EVEN finish, if he doesn't begin.' But she waited patie
ntly.'Once,' said the Mock Turtle at last, with a deep sigh, 'I was a real Turtl
e.'These words were followed by a very long silence, broken only by an occasiona
l exclamation of 'Hjckrrh!' from the Gryphon, and the constant heavy sobbing of 
the Mock Turtle. Alice was very nearly getting up and saying, 'Thank you, sir, f
or your interesting story,' but she could not help thinking there MUST be more t
o come, so she sat still and said nothing.'When we were little,' the Mock Turtle
 went on at last, more calmly, though still sobbing a little now and then, 'we w
ent to school in the sea. The master was an old Turtlewe used to call him Torto
ise''Why did you call him Tortoise, if he wasn't one?' Alice asked.'We called h
im Tortoise because he taught us,' said the Mock Turtle angrily: 'really you are
 very dull!''You ought to be ashamed of yourself for asking such a simple questi
on,' added the Gryphon; and then they both sat silent and looked at poor Alice, 
who felt ready to sink into the earth. At last the Gryphon said to the Mock Turt
le, 'Drive on, old fellow! Don't be all day about it!' and he went on in these w
ords:'Yes, we went to school in the sea, though you mayn't believe it''I never 
said I didn't!' interrupted Alice.'You did,' said the Mock Turtle.'Hold your ton
gue!' added the Gryphon, before Alice could speak again. The Mock Turtle went on
.'We had the best of educationsin fact, we went to school every day''I'VE been
 to a day-school, too,' said Alice; 'you needn't be so proud as all that.''With 
extras?' asked the Mock Turtle a little anxiously.'Yes,' said Alice, 'we learned
 French and music.''And washing?' said the Mock Turtle.'Certainly not!' said Ali
ce indignantly.'Ah! then yours wasn't a really good school,' said the Mock Turtl
e in a tone of great relief. 'Now at OURS they had at the end of the bill, "Fren
ch, music, AND WASHINGextra."''You couldn't have wanted it much,' said Alice; '
living at the bottom of the sea.''I couldn't afford to learn it.' said the Mock 
Turtle with a sigh. 'I only took the regular course.''What was that?' inquired A
lice.'Reeling and Writhing, of course, to begin with,' the Mock Turtle replied; 
'and then the different branches of ArithmeticAmbition, Distraction, Uglificati
on, and Derision.''I never heard of "Uglification,"' Alice ventured to say. 'Wha
t is it?'The Gryphon lifted up both its paws in surprise. 'What! Never heard of 
uglifying!' it exclaimed. 'You know what to beautify is, I suppose?''Yes,' said 
Alice doubtfully: 'it meanstomakeanythingprettier.''Well, then,' the Gryphon
 went on, 'if you don't know what to uglify is, you ARE a simpleton.'Alice did n
ot feel encouraged to ask any more questions about it, so she turned to the Mock
 Turtle, and said 'What else had you to learn?''Well, there was Mystery,' the Mo
ck Turtle replied, counting off the subjects on his flappers, 'Mystery, ancient
 and modern, with Seaography: then Drawlingthe Drawling-master was an old conge
r-eel, that used to come once a week: HE taught us Drawling, Stretching, and Fai
nting in Coils.''What was THAT like?' said Alice.'Well, I can't show it you myse
lf,' the Mock Turtle said: 'I'm too stiff. And the Gryphon never learnt it.''Had
n't time,' said the Gryphon: 'I went to the Classics master, though. He was an o
ld crab, HE was.''I never went to him,' the Mock Turtle said with a sigh: 'he ta
ught Laughing and Grief, they used to say.''So he did, so he did,' said the Gryp
hon, sighing in his turn; and both creatures hid their faces in their paws.'And 
how many hours a day did you do lessons?' said Alice, in a hurry to change the s
ubject.'Ten hours the first day,' said the Mock Turtle: 'nine the next, and so o
n.''What a curious plan!' exclaimed Alice.'That's the reason they're called less
ons,' the Gryphon remarked: 'because they lessen from day to day.'This was quite
 a new idea to Alice, and she thought it over a little before she made her next 
remark. 'Then the eleventh day must have been a holiday?''Of course it was,' sai
d the Mock Turtle.'And how did you manage on the twelfth?' Alice went on eagerly
.'That's enough about lessons,' the Gryphon interrupted in a very decided tone: 
'tell her something about the games now.'CHAPTER X. The Lobster QuadrilleThe Moc
k Turtle sighed deeply, and drew the back of one flapper across his eyes. He loo
ked at Alice, and tried to speak, but for a minute or two sobs choked his voice.
 'Same as if he had a bone in his throat,' said the Gryphon: and it set to work 
shaking him and punching him in the back. At last the Mock Turtle recovered his 
voice, and, with tears running down his cheeks, he went on again:'You may not h
ave lived much under the sea' ('I haven't,' said Alice)'and perhaps you were n
ever even introduced to a lobster' (Alice began to say 'I once tasted' but che
cked herself hastily, and said 'No, never') 'so you can have no idea what a del
ightful thing a Lobster Quadrille is!''No, indeed,' said Alice. 'What sort of a 
dance is it?''Why,' said the Gryphon, 'you first form into a line along the sea-
shore''Two lines!' cried the Mock Turtle. 'Seals, turtles, salmon, and so on; t
hen, when you've cleared all the jelly-fish out of the way''THAT generally take
s some time,' interrupted the Gryphon.'you advance twice''Each with a lobster 
as a partner!' cried the Gryphon.'Of course,' the Mock Turtle said: 'advance twi
ce, set to partners''change lobsters, and retire in same order,' continued the
 Gryphon.'Then, you know,' the Mock Turtle went on, 'you throw the''The lobster
s!' shouted the Gryphon, with a bound into the air.'as far out to sea as you ca
n''Swim after them!' screamed the Gryphon.'Turn a somersault in the sea!' cried
 the Mock Turtle, capering wildly about.'Change lobsters again!' yelled the Gryp
hon at the top of its voice.'Back to land again, and that's all the first figure
,' said the Mock Turtle, suddenly dropping his voice; and the two creatures, who
 had been jumping about like mad things all this time, sat down again very sadly
 and quietly, and looked at Alice.'It must be a very pretty dance,' said Alice t
imidly.'Would you like to see a little of it?' said the Mock Turtle.'Very much i
ndeed,' said Alice.'Come, let's try the first figure!' said the Mock Turtle to t
he Gryphon. 'We can do without lobsters, you know. Which shall sing?''Oh, YOU si
ng,' said the Gryphon. 'I've forgotten the words.'So they began solemnly dancing
 round and round Alice, every now and then treading on her toes when they passed
 too close, and waving their forepaws to mark the time, while the Mock Turtle sa
ng this, very slowly and sadly:'"Will you walk a little faster?" said a whiting
 to a snail."There's a porpoise close behind us, and he's treading on my tail.Se
e how eagerly the lobsters and the turtles all advance!They are waiting on the s
hinglewill you come and join the dance?Will you, won't you, will you, won't you
, will you join the dance?Will you, won't you, will you, won't you, won't you jo
in the dance?"You can really have no notion how delightful it will beWhen they t
ake us up and throw us, with the lobsters, out to sea!"But the snail replied "To
o far, too far!" and gave a look askanceSaid he thanked the whiting kindly, but
 he would not join the dance.Would not, could not, would not, could not, would n
ot join the dance.Would not, could not, would not, could not, could not join the
 dance.'"What matters it how far we go?" his scaly friend replied."There is anot
her shore, you know, upon the other side.The further off from England the nearer
 is to FranceThen turn not pale, beloved snail, but come and join the dance.Wil
l you, won't you, will you, won't you, will you join the dance?Will you, won't y
ou, will you, won't you, won't you join the dance?"''Thank you, it's a very inte
resting dance to watch,' said Alice, feeling very glad that it was over at last:
 'and I do so like that curious song about the whiting!''Oh, as to the whiting,'
 said the Mock Turtle, 'theyyou've seen them, of course?''Yes,' said Alice, 'I'
ve often seen them at dinn' she checked herself hastily.'I don't know where Din
n may be,' said the Mock Turtle, 'but if you've seen them so often, of course yo
u know what they're like.''I believe so,' Alice replied thoughtfully. 'They have
 their tails in their mouthsand they're all over crumbs.''You're wrong about th
e crumbs,' said the Mock Turtle: 'crumbs would all wash off in the sea. But they
 HAVE their tails in their mouths; and the reason is' here the Mock Turtle yawn
ed and shut his eyes.'Tell her about the reason and all that,' he said to the G
ryphon.'The reason is,' said the Gryphon, 'that they WOULD go with the lobsters 
to the dance. So they got thrown out to sea. So they had to fall a long way. So 
they got their tails fast in their mouths. So they couldn't get them out again. 
That's all.''Thank you,' said Alice, 'it's very interesting. I never knew so muc
h about a whiting before.''I can tell you more than that, if you like,' said the
 Gryphon. 'Do you know why it's called a whiting?''I never thought about it,' sa
id Alice. 'Why?''IT DOES THE BOOTS AND SHOES.' the Gryphon replied very solemnly
.Alice was thoroughly puzzled. 'Does the boots and shoes!' she repeated in a won
dering tone.'Why, what are YOUR shoes done with?' said the Gryphon. 'I mean, wha
t makes them so shiny?'Alice looked down at them, and considered a little before
 she gave her answer. 'They're done with blacking, I believe.''Boots and shoes u
nder the sea,' the Gryphon went on in a deep voice, 'are done with a whiting. No
w you know.''And what are they made of?' Alice asked in a tone of great curiosit
y.'Soles and eels, of course,' the Gryphon replied rather impatiently: 'any shri
mp could have told you that.''If I'd been the whiting,' said Alice, whose though
ts were still running on the song, 'I'd have said to the porpoise, "Keep back, p
lease: we don't want YOU with us!"''They were obliged to have him with them,' th
e Mock Turtle said: 'no wise fish would go anywhere without a porpoise.''Wouldn'
t it really?' said Alice in a tone of great surprise.'Of course not,' said the M
ock Turtle: 'why, if a fish came to ME, and told me he was going a journey, I sh
ould say "With what porpoise?"''Don't you mean "purpose"?' said Alice.'I mean wh
at I say,' the Mock Turtle replied in an offended tone. And the Gryphon added 'C
ome, let's hear some of YOUR adventures.''I could tell you my adventuresbeginni
ng from this morning,' said Alice a little timidly: 'but it's no use going back 
to yesterday, because I was a different person then.''Explain all that,' said th
e Mock Turtle.'No, no! The adventures first,' said the Gryphon in an impatient t
one: 'explanations take such a dreadful time.'So Alice began telling them her ad
ventures from the time when she first saw the White Rabbit. She was a little ner
vous about it just at first, the two creatures got so close to her, one on each 
side, and opened their eyes and mouths so VERY wide, but she gained courage as s
he went on. Her listeners were perfectly quiet till she got to the part about he
r repeating 'YOU ARE OLD, FATHER WILLIAM,' to the Caterpillar, and the words all
 coming different, and then the Mock Turtle drew a long breath, and said 'That's
 very curious.''It's all about as curious as it can be,' said the Gryphon.'It al
l came different!' the Mock Turtle repeated thoughtfully. 'I should like to hear
 her try and repeat something now. Tell her to begin.' He looked at the Gryphon 
as if he thought it had some kind of authority over Alice.'Stand up and repeat "
'TIS THE VOICE OF THE SLUGGARD,"' said the Gryphon.'How the creatures order one 
about, and make one repeat lessons!' thought Alice; 'I might as well be at schoo
l at once.' However, she got up, and began to repeat it, but her head was so ful
l of the Lobster Quadrille, that she hardly knew what she was saying, and the wo
rds came very queer indeed:''Tis the voice of the Lobster; I heard him declare,
"You have baked me too brown, I must sugar my hair."As a duck with its eyelids, 
so he with his noseTrims his belt and his buttons, and turns out his toes.'[late
r editions continued as followsWhen the sands are all dry, he is gay as a lark,A
nd will talk in contemptuous tones of the Shark,But, when the tide rises and sha
rks are around,His voice has a timid and tremulous sound.]'That's different from
 what I used to say when I was a child,' said the Gryphon.'Well, I never heard i
t before,' said the Mock Turtle; 'but it sounds uncommon nonsense.'Alice said no
thing; she had sat down with her face in her hands, wondering if anything would 
EVER happen in a natural way again.'I should like to have it explained,' said th
e Mock Turtle.'She can't explain it,' said the Gryphon hastily. 'Go on with the 
next verse.''But about his toes?' the Mock Turtle persisted. 'How COULD he turn 
them out with his nose, you know?''It's the first position in dancing.' Alice sa
id; but was dreadfully puzzled by the whole thing, and longed to change the subj
ect.'Go on with the next verse,' the Gryphon repeated impatiently: 'it begins "I
 passed by his garden."'Alice did not dare to disobey, though she felt sure it w
ould all come wrong, and she went on in a trembling voice:'I passed by his gard
en, and marked, with one eye,How the Owl and the Panther were sharing a pie'[la
ter editions continued as followsThe Panther took pie-crust, and gravy, and meat
,While the Owl had the dish as its share of the treat.When the pie was all finis
hed, the Owl, as a boon,Was kindly permitted to pocket the spoon:While the Panth
er received knife and fork with a growl,And concluded the banquet]'What IS the 
use of repeating all that stuff,' the Mock Turtle interrupted, 'if you don't exp
lain it as you go on? It's by far the most confusing thing I ever heard!''Yes, I
 think you'd better leave off,' said the Gryphon: and Alice was only too glad to
 do so.'Shall we try another figure of the Lobster Quadrille?' the Gryphon went 
on. 'Or would you like the Mock Turtle to sing you a song?''Oh, a song, please, 
if the Mock Turtle would be so kind,' Alice replied, so eagerly that the Gryphon
 said, in a rather offended tone, 'Hm! No accounting for tastes! Sing her "Turtl
e Soup," will you, old fellow?'The Mock Turtle sighed deeply, and began, in a vo
ice sometimes choked with sobs, to sing this:'Beautiful Soup, so rich and green
,Waiting in a hot tureen!Who for such dainties would not stoop?Soup of the eveni
ng, beautiful Soup!Soup of the evening, beautiful Soup!Beauootiful Soooop!Beau
ootiful Soooop!Soooop of the eeevening,Beautiful, beautiful Soup!'Beautiful
 Soup! Who cares for fish,Game, or any other dish?Who would not give all else fo
r twoPennyworth only of beautiful Soup?Pennyworth only of beautiful Soup?Beauoo
tiful Soooop!Beauootiful Soooop!Soooop of the eeevening,Beautiful, beauti
FUL SOUP!''Chorus again!' cried the Gryphon, and the Mock Turtle had just begun 
to repeat it, when a cry of 'The trial's beginning!' was heard in the distance.'
Come on!' cried the Gryphon, and, taking Alice by the hand, it hurried off, with
out waiting for the end of the song.'What trial is it?' Alice panted as she ran;
 but the Gryphon only answered 'Come on!' and ran the faster, while more and mor
e faintly came, carried on the breeze that followed them, the melancholy words:
'Soooop of the eeevening,Beautiful, beautiful Soup!'CHAPTER XI. Who Stole the
 Tarts?The King and Queen of Hearts were seated on their throne when they arrive
d, with a great crowd assembled about themall sorts of little birds and beasts,
 as well as the whole pack of cards: the Knave was standing before them, in chai
ns, with a soldier on each side to guard him; and near the King was the White Ra
bbit, with a trumpet in one hand, and a scroll of parchment in the other. In the
 very middle of the court was a table, with a large dish of tarts upon it: they 
looked so good, that it made Alice quite hungry to look at them'I wish they'd g
et the trial done,' she thought, 'and hand round the refreshments!' But there se
emed to be no chance of this, so she began looking at everything about her, to p
ass away the time.Alice had never been in a court of justice before, but she had
 read about them in books, and she was quite pleased to find that she knew the n
ame of nearly everything there. 'That's the judge,' she said to herself, 'becaus
e of his great wig.'The judge, by the way, was the King; and as he wore his crow
n over the wig, (look at the frontispiece if you want to see how he did it,) he 
did not look at all comfortable, and it was certainly not becoming.'And that's t
he jury-box,' thought Alice, 'and those twelve creatures,' (she was obliged to s
ay 'creatures,' you see, because some of them were animals, and some were birds,
) 'I suppose they are the jurors.' She said this last word two or three times ov
er to herself, being rather proud of it: for she thought, and rightly too, that 
very few little girls of her age knew the meaning of it at all. However, 'jury-m
en' would have done just as well.The twelve jurors were all writing very busily 
on slates. 'What are they doing?' Alice whispered to the Gryphon. 'They can't ha
ve anything to put down yet, before the trial's begun.''They're putting down the
ir names,' the Gryphon whispered in reply, 'for fear they should forget them bef
ore the end of the trial.''Stupid things!' Alice began in a loud, indignant voic
e, but she stopped hastily, for the White Rabbit cried out, 'Silence in the cour
t!' and the King put on his spectacles and looked anxiously round, to make out w
ho was talking.Alice could see, as well as if she were looking over their should
ers, that all the jurors were writing down 'stupid things!' on their slates, and
 she could even make out that one of them didn't know how to spell 'stupid,' and
 that he had to ask his neighbour to tell him. 'A nice muddle their slates'll be
 in before the trial's over!' thought Alice.One of the jurors had a pencil that 
squeaked. This of course, Alice could not stand, and she went round the court an
d got behind him, and very soon found an opportunity of taking it away. She did 
it so quickly that the poor little juror (it was Bill, the Lizard) could not mak
e out at all what had become of it; so, after hunting all about for it, he was o
bliged to write with one finger for the rest of the day; and this was of very li
ttle use, as it left no mark on the slate.'Herald, read the accusation!' said th
e King.On this the White Rabbit blew three blasts on the trumpet, and then unrol
led the parchment scroll, and read as follows:'The Queen of Hearts, she made so
me tarts,All on a summer day:The Knave of Hearts, he stole those tarts,And took 
them quite away!''Consider your verdict,' the King said to the jury.'Not yet, no
t yet!' the Rabbit hastily interrupted. 'There's a great deal to come before tha
t!''Call the first witness,' said the King; and the White Rabbit blew three blas
ts on the trumpet, and called out, 'First witness!'The first witness was the Hat
ter. He came in with a teacup in one hand and a piece of bread-and-butter in the
 other. 'I beg pardon, your Majesty,' he began, 'for bringing these in: but I ha
dn't quite finished my tea when I was sent for.''You ought to have finished,' sa
id the King. 'When did you begin?'The Hatter looked at the March Hare, who had f
ollowed him into the court, arm-in-arm with the Dormouse. 'Fourteenth of March, 
I think it was,' he said.'Fifteenth,' said the March Hare.'Sixteenth,' added the
 Dormouse.'Write that down,' the King said to the jury, and the jury eagerly wro
te down all three dates on their slates, and then added them up, and reduced the
 answer to shillings and pence.'Take off your hat,' the King said to the Hatter.
'It isn't mine,' said the Hatter.'Stolen!' the King exclaimed, turning to the ju
ry, who instantly made a memorandum of the fact.'I keep them to sell,' the Hatte
r added as an explanation; 'I've none of my own. I'm a hatter.'Here the Queen pu
t on her spectacles, and began staring at the Hatter, who turned pale and fidget
ed.'Give your evidence,' said the King; 'and don't be nervous, or I'll have you 
executed on the spot.'This did not seem to encourage the witness at all: he kept
 shifting from one foot to the other, looking uneasily at the Queen, and in his 
confusion he bit a large piece out of his teacup instead of the bread-and-butter
.Just at this moment Alice felt a very curious sensation, which puzzled her a go
od deal until she made out what it was: she was beginning to grow larger again, 
and she thought at first she would get up and leave the court; but on second tho
ughts she decided to remain where she was as long as there was room for her.'I w
ish you wouldn't squeeze so.' said the Dormouse, who was sitting next to her. 'I
 can hardly breathe.''I can't help it,' said Alice very meekly: 'I'm growing.''Y
ou've no right to grow here,' said the Dormouse.'Don't talk nonsense,' said Alic
e more boldly: 'you know you're growing too.''Yes, but I grow at a reasonable pa
ce,' said the Dormouse: 'not in that ridiculous fashion.' And he got up very sul
kily and crossed over to the other side of the court.All this time the Queen had
 never left off staring at the Hatter, and, just as the Dormouse crossed the cou
rt, she said to one of the officers of the court, 'Bring me the list of the sing
ers in the last concert!' on which the wretched Hatter trembled so, that he shoo
k both his shoes off.'Give your evidence,' the King repeated angrily, 'or I'll h
ave you executed, whether you're nervous or not.''I'm a poor man, your Majesty,'
 the Hatter began, in a trembling voice, 'and I hadn't begun my teanot above a
 week or soand what with the bread-and-butter getting so thinand the twinkling
 of the tea''The twinkling of the what?' said the King.'It began with the tea,'
 the Hatter replied.'Of course twinkling begins with a T!' said the King sharply
. 'Do you take me for a dunce? Go on!''I'm a poor man,' the Hatter went on, 'and
 most things twinkled after thatonly the March Hare said''I didn't!' the March
 Hare interrupted in a great hurry.'You did!' said the Hatter.'I deny it!' said 
the March Hare.'He denies it,' said the King: 'leave out that part.''Well, at an
y rate, the Dormouse said' the Hatter went on, looking anxiously round to see i
f he would deny it too: but the Dormouse denied nothing, being fast asleep.'Afte
r that,' continued the Hatter, 'I cut some more bread-and-butter''But what did 
the Dormouse say?' one of the jury asked.'That I can't remember,' said the Hatte
r.'You MUST remember,' remarked the King, 'or I'll have you executed.'The misera
ble Hatter dropped his teacup and bread-and-butter, and went down on one knee. '
I'm a poor man, your Majesty,' he began.'You're a very poor speaker,' said the K
ing.Here one of the guinea-pigs cheered, and was immediately suppressed by the o
fficers of the court. (As that is rather a hard word, I will just explain to you
 how it was done. They had a large canvas bag, which tied up at the mouth with s
trings: into this they slipped the guinea-pig, head first, and then sat upon it.
)'I'm glad I've seen that done,' thought Alice. 'I've so often read in the newsp
apers, at the end of trials, "There was some attempts at applause, which was imm
ediately suppressed by the officers of the court," and I never understood what i
t meant till now.''If that's all you know about it, you may stand down,' continu
ed the King.'I can't go no lower,' said the Hatter: 'I'm on the floor, as it is.
''Then you may SIT down,' the King replied.Here the other guinea-pig cheered, an
d was suppressed.'Come, that finished the guinea-pigs!' thought Alice. 'Now we s
hall get on better.''I'd rather finish my tea,' said the Hatter, with an anxious
 look at the Queen, who was reading the list of singers.'You may go,' said the K
ing, and the Hatter hurriedly left the court, without even waiting to put his sh
oes on.'and just take his head off outside,' the Queen added to one of the offi
cers: but the Hatter was out of sight before the officer could get to the door.'
Call the next witness!' said the King.The next witness was the Duchess's cook. S
he carried the pepper-box in her hand, and Alice guessed who it was, even before
 she got into the court, by the way the people near the door began sneezing all 
at once.'Give your evidence,' said the King.'Shan't,' said the cook.The King loo
ked anxiously at the White Rabbit, who said in a low voice, 'Your Majesty must c
ross-examine THIS witness.''Well, if I must, I must,' the King said, with a mela
ncholy air, and, after folding his arms and frowning at the cook till his eyes w
ere nearly out of sight, he said in a deep voice, 'What are tarts made of?''Pepp
er, mostly,' said the cook.'Treacle,' said a sleepy voice behind her.'Collar tha
t Dormouse,' the Queen shrieked out. 'Behead that Dormouse! Turn that Dormouse o
ut of court! Suppress him! Pinch him! Off with his whiskers!'For some minutes th
e whole court was in confusion, getting the Dormouse turned out, and, by the tim
e they had settled down again, the cook had disappeared.'Never mind!' said the K
ing, with an air of great relief. 'Call the next witness.' And he added in an un
dertone to the Queen, 'Really, my dear, YOU must cross-examine the next witness.
 It quite makes my forehead ache!'Alice watched the White Rabbit as he fumbled o
ver the list, feeling very curious to see what the next witness would be like, '
for they haven't got much evidence YET,' she said to herself. Imagine her surpr
ise, when the White Rabbit read out, at the top of his shrill little voice, the 
name 'Alice!'CHAPTER XII. Alice's Evidence'Here!' cried Alice, quite forgetting 
in the flurry of the moment how large she had grown in the last few minutes, and
 she jumped up in such a hurry that she tipped over the jury-box with the edge o
f her skirt, upsetting all the jurymen on to the heads of the crowd below, and t
here they lay sprawling about, reminding her very much of a globe of goldfish sh
e had accidentally upset the week before.'Oh, I BEG your pardon!' she exclaimed 
in a tone of great dismay, and began picking them up again as quickly as she cou
ld, for the accident of the goldfish kept running in her head, and she had a vag
ue sort of idea that they must be collected at once and put back into the jury-b
ox, or they would die.'The trial cannot proceed,' said the King in a very grave 
voice, 'until all the jurymen are back in their proper placesALL,' he repeated 
with great emphasis, looking hard at Alice as he said do.Alice looked at the jur
y-box, and saw that, in her haste, she had put the Lizard in head downwards, and
 the poor little thing was waving its tail about in a melancholy way, being quit
e unable to move. She soon got it out again, and put it right; 'not that it sign
ifies much,' she said to herself; 'I should think it would be QUITE as much use 
in the trial one way up as the other.'As soon as the jury had a little recovered
 from the shock of being upset, and their slates and pencils had been found and 
handed back to them, they set to work very diligently to write out a history of 
the accident, all except the Lizard, who seemed too much overcome to do anything
 but sit with its mouth open, gazing up into the roof of the court.'What do you 
know about this business?' the King said to Alice.'Nothing,' said Alice.'Nothing
 WHATEVER?' persisted the King.'Nothing whatever,' said Alice.'That's very impor
tant,' the King said, turning to the jury. They were just beginning to write thi
s down on their slates, when the White Rabbit interrupted: 'UNimportant, your Ma
jesty means, of course,' he said in a very respectful tone, but frowning and mak
ing faces at him as he spoke.'UNimportant, of course, I meant,' the King hastily
 said, and went on to himself in an undertone,'importantunimportantunimportant
important' as if he were trying which word sounded best.Some of the jury wrote
 it down 'important,' and some 'unimportant.' Alice could see this, as she was n
ear enough to look over their slates; 'but it doesn't matter a bit,' she thought
 to herself.At this moment the King, who had been for some time busily writing i
n his note-book, cackled out 'Silence!' and read out from his book, 'Rule Forty-
two. ALL PERSONS MORE THAN A MILE HIGH TO LEAVE THE COURT.'Everybody looked at A
lice.'I'M not a mile high,' said Alice.'You are,' said the King.'Nearly two mile
s high,' added the Queen.'Well, I shan't go, at any rate,' said Alice: 'besides,
 that's not a regular rule: you invented it just now.''It's the oldest rule in t
he book,' said the King.'Then it ought to be Number One,' said Alice.The King tu
rned pale, and shut his note-book hastily. 'Consider your verdict,' he said to t
he jury, in a low, trembling voice.'There's more evidence to come yet, please yo
ur Majesty,' said the White Rabbit, jumping up in a great hurry; 'this paper has
 just been picked up.''What's in it?' said the Queen.'I haven't opened it yet,' 
said the White Rabbit, 'but it seems to be a letter, written by the prisoner to
to somebody.''It must have been that,' said the King, 'unless it was written to 
nobody, which isn't usual, you know.''Who is it directed to?' said one of the ju
rymen.'It isn't directed at all,' said the White Rabbit; 'in fact, there's nothi
ng written on the OUTSIDE.' He unfolded the paper as he spoke, and added 'It isn
't a letter, after all: it's a set of verses.''Are they in the prisoner's handwr
iting?' asked another of the jurymen.'No, they're not,' said the White Rabbit, '
and that's the queerest thing about it.' (The jury all looked puzzled.)'He must 
have imitated somebody else's hand,' said the King. (The jury all brightened up 
again.)'Please your Majesty,' said the Knave, 'I didn't write it, and they can't
 prove I did: there's no name signed at the end.''If you didn't sign it,' said t
he King, 'that only makes the matter worse. You MUST have meant some mischief, o
r else you'd have signed your name like an honest man.'There was a general clapp
ing of hands at this: it was the first really clever thing the King had said tha
t day.'That PROVES his guilt,' said the Queen.'It proves nothing of the sort!' s
aid Alice. 'Why, you don't even know what they're about!''Read them,' said the K
ing.The White Rabbit put on his spectacles. 'Where shall I begin, please your Ma
jesty?' he asked.'Begin at the beginning,' the King said gravely, 'and go on til
l you come to the end: then stop.'These were the verses the White Rabbit read:'
They told me you had been to her,And mentioned me to him:She gave me a good char
acter,But said I could not swim.He sent them word I had not gone(We know it to b
e true):If she should push the matter on,What would become of you?I gave her one
, they gave him two,You gave us three or more;They all returned from him to you,
Though they were mine before.If I or she should chance to beInvolved in this aff
air,He trusts to you to set them free,Exactly as we were.My notion was that you 
had been(Before she had this fit)An obstacle that came betweenHim, and ourselves
, and it.Don't let him know she liked them best,For this must ever beA secret, k
ept from all the rest,Between yourself and me.''That's the most important piece 
of evidence we've heard yet,' said the King, rubbing his hands; 'so now let the 
jury''If any one of them can explain it,' said Alice, (she had grown so large i
n the last few minutes that she wasn't a bit afraid of interrupting him,) 'I'll 
give him sixpence. I don't believe there's an atom of meaning in it.'The jury al
l wrote down on their slates, 'SHE doesn't believe there's an atom of meaning in
 it,' but none of them attempted to explain the paper.'If there's no meaning in 
it,' said the King, 'that saves a world of trouble, you know, as we needn't try 
to find any. And yet I don't know,' he went on, spreading out the verses on his 
knee, and looking at them with one eye; 'I seem to see some meaning in them, aft
er all. "SAID I COULD NOT SWIM" you can't swim, can you?' he added, turning to
 the Knave.The Knave shook his head sadly. 'Do I look like it?' he said. (Which 
he certainly did NOT, being made entirely of cardboard.)'All right, so far,' sai
d the King, and he went on muttering over the verses to himself: '"WE KNOW IT TO
 BE TRUE" that's the jury, of course"I GAVE HER ONE, THEY GAVE HIM TWO" why, 
that must be what he did with the tarts, you know''But, it goes on "THEY ALL RE
TURNED FROM HIM TO YOU,"' said Alice.'Why, there they are!' said the King triump
hantly, pointing to the tarts on the table. 'Nothing can be clearer than THAT. T
hen again"BEFORE SHE HAD THIS FIT" you never had fits, my dear, I think?' he s
aid to the Queen.'Never!' said the Queen furiously, throwing an inkstand at the 
Lizard as she spoke. (The unfortunate little Bill had left off writing on his sl
ate with one finger, as he found it made no mark; but he now hastily began again
, using the ink, that was trickling down his face, as long as it lasted.)'Then t
he words don't FIT you,' said the King, looking round the court with a smile. Th
ere was a dead silence.'It's a pun!' the King added in an offended tone, and eve
rybody laughed, 'Let the jury consider their verdict,' the King said, for about 
the twentieth time that day.'No, no!' said the Queen. 'Sentence firstverdict af
terwards.''Stuff and nonsense!' said Alice loudly. 'The idea of having the sente
nce first!''Hold your tongue!' said the Queen, turning purple.'I won't!' said Al
ice.'Off with her head!' the Queen shouted at the top of her voice. Nobody moved
.'Who cares for you?' said Alice, (she had grown to her full size by this time.)
 'You're nothing but a pack of cards!'At this the whole pack rose up into the ai
r, and came flying down upon her: she gave a little scream, half of fright and h
alf of anger, and tried to beat them off, and found herself lying on the bank, w
ith her head in the lap of her sister, who was gently brushing away some dead le
aves that had fluttered down from the trees upon her face.'Wake up, Alice dear!'
 said her sister; 'Why, what a long sleep you've had!''Oh, I've had such a curio
us dream!' said Alice, and she told her sister, as well as she could remember th
em, all these strange Adventures of hers that you have just been reading about; 
and when she had finished, her sister kissed her, and said, 'It WAS a curious dr
eam, dear, certainly: but now run in to your tea; it's getting late.' So Alice g
ot up and ran off, thinking while she ran, as well she might, what a wonderful d
ream it had been.But her sister sat still just as she left her, leaning her head
 on her hand, watching the setting sun, and thinking of little Alice and all her
 wonderful Adventures, till she too began dreaming after a fashion, and this was
 her dream:First, she dreamed of little Alice herself, and once again the tiny 
hands were clasped upon her knee, and the bright eager eyes were looking up into
 hersshe could hear the very tones of her voice, and see that queer little toss
 of her head to keep back the wandering hair that WOULD always get into her eyes
and still as she listened, or seemed to listen, the whole place around her beca
me alive with the strange creatures of her little sister's dream.The long grass 
rustled at her feet as the White Rabbit hurried bythe frightened Mouse splashed
 his way through the neighbouring poolshe could hear the rattle of the teacups 
as the March Hare and his friends shared their never-ending meal, and the shrill
 voice of the Queen ordering off her unfortunate guests to executiononce more t
he pig-baby was sneezing on the Duchess's knee, while plates and dishes crashed 
around itonce more the shriek of the Gryphon, the squeaking of the Lizard's sla
te-pencil, and the choking of the suppressed guinea-pigs, filled the air, mixed 
up with the distant sobs of the miserable Mock Turtle.So she sat on, with closed
 eyes, and half believed herself in Wonderland, though she knew she had but to o
pen them again, and all would change to dull realitythe grass would be only rus
tling in the wind, and the pool rippling to the waving of the reedsthe rattling
 teacups would change to tinkling sheep-bells, and the Queen's shrill cries to t
he voice of the shepherd boyand the sneeze of the baby, the shriek of the Gryph
on, and all the other queer noises, would change (she knew) to the confused clam
our of the busy farm-yardwhile the lowing of the cattle in the distance would t
ake the place of the Mock Turtle's heavy sobs.Lastly, she pictured to herself ho
w this same little sister of hers would, in the after-time, be herself a grown w
oman; and how she would keep, through all her riper years, the simple and loving
 heart of her childhood: and how she would gather about her other little childre
n, and make THEIR eyes bright and eager with many a strange tale, perhaps even w
ith the dream of Wonderland of long ago: and how she would feel with all their s
imple sorrows, and find a pleasure in all their simple joys, remembering her own
 child-life, and the happy summer days.THE ENDEnd of Project Gutenberg's Alice's
 Adventures in Wonderland, by Lewis Carroll*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBO
OK ALICE'S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND ******** This file should be named 11-h.htm 
or 11-h.zip *****This and all associated files of various formats will be found 
in:http://www.gutenberg.org/1/11/Produced by David WidgerUpdated editions will r
eplace the previous one--the old editionswill be renamed.Creating the works from
 public domain print editions means that noone owns a United States copyright in
 these works, so the Foundation(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the Unit
ed States withoutpermission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rul
es,set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply tocopying a
nd distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works toprotect the PROJECT GUTE
NBERG-tm concept and trademark.  ProjectGutenberg is a registered trademark, and
 may not be used if youcharge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permis
sion.  If youdo not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purposesuch as creati
on of derivative works, reports, performances andresearch.  They may be modified
 and printed and given away--you may dopractically ANYTHING with public domain e
Books.  Redistribution issubject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.*** START: FULL LICENSE ***THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSEPLEA
SE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORKTo protect the Project Gutenb
erg-tm mission of promoting the freedistribution of electronic works, by using o
r distributing this work(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase
 "ProjectGutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online athttp://gutenberg.org/
license).Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-t
melectronic works1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree toand accept
 all the terms of this license and intellectual property(trademark/copyright) ag
reement.  If you do not agree to abide by allthe terms of this agreement, you mu
st cease using and return or destroyall copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electroni
c works in your possession.If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access t
o a ProjectGutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by thet
erms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person orentity to whom
 you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a
 registered trademark.  It may only beused on or associated in any way with an e
lectronic work by people whoagree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  T
here are a fewthings that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic w
orkseven without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  Seeparagraph 
1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with ProjectGutenberg-tm electr
onic works if you follow the terms of this agreementand help preserve free futur
e access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronicworks.  See paragraph 1.E below.1.C. 
 The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"or PGLAF), o
wns a compilation copyright in the collection of ProjectGutenberg-tm electronic 
works.  Nearly all the individual works in thecollection are in the public domai
n in the United States.  If anindividual work is in the public domain in the Uni
ted States and you arelocated in the United States, we do not claim a right to p
revent you fromcopying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivat
iveworks based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenbergare rem
oved.  Of course, we hope that you will support the ProjectGutenberg-tm mission 
of promoting free access to electronic works byfreely sharing Project Gutenberg-
tm works in compliance with the terms ofthis agreement for keeping the Project G
utenberg-tm name associated withthe work.  You can easily comply with the terms 
of this agreement bykeeping this work in the same format with its attached full 
ProjectGutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.1.D.  T
he copyright laws of the place where you are located also governwhat you can do 
with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are ina constant state of chan
ge.  If you are outside the United States, checkthe laws of your country in addi
tion to the terms of this agreementbefore downloading, copying, displaying, perf
orming, distributing orcreating derivative works based on this work or any other
 ProjectGutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerningth
e copyright status of any work in any country outside the UnitedStates.1.E.  Unl
ess you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:1.E.1.  The following s
entence, with active links to, or other immediateaccess to, the full Project Gut
enberg-tm License must appear prominentlywhenever any copy of a Project Gutenber
g-tm work (any work on which thephrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with whic
h the phrase "ProjectGutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed
, viewed,copied or distributed:This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at n
o cost and withalmost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away
 orre-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License includedwith this 
eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-t
m electronic work is derivedfrom the public domain (does not contain a notice in
dicating that it isposted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can
 be copiedand distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a workwith the phr
ase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on thework, you must comply
 either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1through 1.E.7 or obtain permiss
ion for the use of the work and theProject Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth i
n paragraphs 1.E.8 or1.E.9.1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electro
nic work is postedwith the permission of the copyright holder, your use and dist
ributionmust comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additionalt
erms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linkedto the Pro
ject Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with thepermission of the copyrig
ht holder found at the beginning of this work.1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or
 remove the full Project Gutenberg-tmLicense terms from this work, or any files 
containing a part of thiswork or any other work associated with Project Gutenber
g-tm.1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute thiselect
ronic work, or any part of this electronic work, withoutprominently displaying t
he sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 withactive links or immediate access to
 the full terms of the ProjectGutenberg-tm License.1.E.6.  You may convert to an
d distribute this work in any binary,compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or pr
oprietary form, including anyword processing or hypertext form.  However, if you
 provide access to ordistribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a forma
t other than"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official versionpo
sted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),you must,
 at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide acopy, a means of ex
porting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy uponrequest, of the work in its o
riginal "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or otherform.  Any alternate format must include t
he full Project Gutenberg-tmLicense as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.1.E.7.  Do n
ot charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,performing, copying or distri
buting any Project Gutenberg-tm worksunless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1
.E.9.1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providingaccess to
 or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works providedthat- You pay a r
oyalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive fromthe use of Project Gutenbe
rg-tm works calculated using the methodyou already use to calculate your applica
ble taxes.  The fee isowed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, b
ut hehas agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to theProject Gutenberg
 Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty paymentsmust be paid within 60 days follo
wing each date on which youprepare (or are legally required to prepare) your per
iodic taxreturns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such andsent to 
the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at theaddress specified in Sec
tion 4, "Information about donations tothe Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Fo
undation."- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifiesyo
u in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/hedoes not agree to
 the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tmLicense.  You must require such a use
r to return ordestroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical mediumand 
discontinue all use of and all access to other copies ofProject Gutenberg-tm wor
ks.- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of anymoney 
paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in theelectronic work is disc
overed and reported to you within 90 daysof receipt of the work.- You comply wit
h all other terms of this agreement for freedistribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
 works.1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tme
lectronic work or group of works on different terms than are setforth in this ag
reement, you must obtain permission in writing fromboth the Project Gutenberg Li
terary Archive Foundation and MichaelHart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm
 trademark.  Contact theFoundation as set forth in Section 3 below.1.F.1.F.1.  P
roject Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerableeffort to identify,
 do copyright research on, transcribe and proofreadpublic domain works in creati
ng the Project Gutenberg-tmcollection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg
-tm electronicworks, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain"Def
ects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate orcorrupt data, trans
cription errors, a copyright or other intellectualproperty infringement, a defec
tive or damaged disk or other medium, acomputer virus, or computer codes that da
mage or cannot be read byyour equipment.1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF 
DAMAGES - Except for the "Rightof Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 
1.F.3, the ProjectGutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Projec
tGutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a ProjectGutenberg-tm 
electronic work under this agreement, disclaim allliability to you for damages, 
costs and expenses, including legalfees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FO
R NEGLIGENCE, STRICTLIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT T
HOSEPROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THETRADEMARK OWNER
, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BELIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, 
DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE ORINCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE 
NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCHDAMAGE.1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR 
REFUND - If you discover adefect in this electronic work within 90 days of recei
ving it, you canreceive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sendin
g awritten explanation to the person you received the work from.  If youreceived
 the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium withyour written expl
anation.  The person or entity that provided you withthe defective work may elec
t to provide a replacement copy in lieu of arefund.  If you received the work el
ectronically, the person or entityproviding it to you may choose to give you a s
econd opportunity toreceive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the
 second copyis also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without furthe
ropportunities to fix the problem.1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replac
ement or refund set forthin paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS
' WITH NO OTHERWARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIM
ITED TOWARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.1.F.5.  Some sta
tes do not allow disclaimers of certain impliedwarranties or the exclusion or li
mitation of certain types of damages.If any disclaimer or limitation set forth i
n this agreement violates thelaw of the state applicable to this agreement, the 
agreement shall beinterpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permi
tted bythe applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of anyprovi
sion of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.1.F.6.  INDEMNITY
 - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, thetrademark owner, any agent
 or employee of the Foundation, anyoneproviding copies of Project Gutenberg-tm e
lectronic works in accordancewith this agreement, and any volunteers associated 
with the production,promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electroni
c works,harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,th
at arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you door cause t
o occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tmwork, (b) alteratio
n, modification, or additions or deletions to anyProject Gutenberg-tm work, and 
(c) any Defect you cause.Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project G
utenberg-tmProject Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution ofelect
ronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computersincluding obso
lete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It existsbecause of the efforts of hu
ndreds of volunteers and donations frompeople in all walks of life.Volunteers an
d financial support to provide volunteers with theassistance they need, is criti
cal to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm'sgoals and ensuring that the Project Gutenb
erg-tm collection willremain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001,
 the ProjectGutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secur
eand permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.To learn m
ore about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundationand how your efforts 
and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4and the Foundation web page at http:
//www.pglaf.org.Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Arc
hiveFoundationThe Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit5
01(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of thestate of Mississ
ippi and granted tax exempt status by the InternalRevenue Service.  The Foundati
on's EIN or federal tax identificationnumber is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) lette
r is posted athttp://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenb
ergLiterary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extentpermitted by
 U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.The Foundation's principal office is lo
cated at 4557 Melan Dr. S.Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employee
s are scatteredthroughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, emailbusiness@pgl
af.org.  Email contact links and up to date contactinformation can be found at t
he Foundation's web site and officialpage at http://pglaf.orgFor additional cont
act information:Dr. Gregory B. NewbyChief Executive and Directorgbnewby@pglaf.or
gSection 4.  Information about Donations to the Project GutenbergLiterary Archiv
e FoundationProject Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without widespr
ead public support and donations to carry out its mission ofincreasing the numbe
r of public domain and licensed works that can befreely distributed in machine r
eadable form accessible by the widestarray of equipment including outdated equip
ment.  Many small donations($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintain
ing tax exemptstatus with the IRS.The Foundation is committed to complying with 
the laws regulatingcharities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the Un
itedStates.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes aconsiderable 
effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep upwith these requirements.
  We do not solicit donations in locationswhere we have not received written con
firmation of compliance.  ToSEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance
 for anyparticular state visit http://pglaf.orgWhile we cannot and do not solici
t contributions from states where wehave not met the solicitation requirements, 
we know of no prohibitionagainst accepting unsolicited donations from donors in 
such states whoapproach us with offers to donate.International donations are gra
tefully accepted, but we cannot makeany statements concerning tax treatment of d
onations received fromoutside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our smal
l staff.Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donationmethods
 and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of otherways including check
s, online payments and credit card donations.To donate, please visit: http://pgl
af.org/donateSection 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electron
icworks.Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tmc
oncept of a library of electronic works that could be freely sharedwith anyone. 
 For thirty years, he produced and distributed ProjectGutenberg-tm eBooks with o
nly a loose network of volunteer support.Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often c
reated from several printededitions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain
 in the U.S.unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarilyk
eep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.Most people start at 
our Web site which has the main PG search facility:http://www.gutenberg.orgThis 
Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,including how to make d
onations to the Project Gutenberg LiteraryArchive Foundation, how to help produc
e our new eBooks, and how tosubscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new 
eBooks.Well, Prince, so Genoa and Lucca are now just family estates of theBuonap
artes. But I warn you, if you don't tell me that this means war,if you still try
 to defend the infamies and horrors perpetrated by thatAntichrist--I really beli
eve he is Antichrist--I will have nothing moreto do with you and you are no long
er my friend, no longer my 'faithfulslave,' as you call yourself! But how do you
 do? I see I have frightenedyou--sit down and tell me all the news."It was in Ju
ly, 1805, and the speaker was the well-known Anna PavlovnaScherer, maid of honor
 and favorite of the Empress Marya Fedorovna. Withthese words she greeted Prince
 Vasili Kuragin, a man of high rank andimportance, who was the first to arrive a
t her reception. Anna Pavlovnahad had a cough for some days. She was, as she sai
d, suffering from lagrippe; grippe being then a new word in St. Petersburg, used
 only by theelite.All her invitations without exception, written in French, and 
deliveredby a scarlet-liveried footman that morning, ran as follows:"If you have
 nothing better to do, Count (or Prince), and if theprospect of spending an even
ing with a poor invalid is not too terrible,I shall be very charmed to see you t
onight between 7 and 10--AnnetteScherer.""Heavens! what a virulent attack!" repl
ied the prince, not in the leastdisconcerted by this reception. He had just ente
red, wearing anembroidered court uniform, knee breeches, and shoes, and had star
s onhis breast and a serene expression on his flat face. He spoke in thatrefined
 French in which our grandfathers not only spoke but thought, andwith the gentle
, patronizing intonation natural to a man of importancewho had grown old in soci
ety and at court. He went up to Anna Pavlovna,kissed her hand, presenting to her
 his bald, scented, and shining head,and complacently seated himself on the sofa
."First of all, dear friend, tell me how you are. Set your friend's mindat rest,
" said he without altering his tone, beneath the politeness andaffected sympathy
 of which indifference and even irony could bediscerned."Can one be well while s
uffering morally? Can one be calm in times likethese if one has any feeling?" sa
id Anna Pavlovna. "You are staying thewhole evening, I hope?""And the fete at th
e English ambassador's? Today is Wednesday. I mustput in an appearance there," s
aid the prince. "My daughter is coming forme to take me there.""I thought today'
s fete had been canceled. I confess all thesefestivities and fireworks are becom
ing wearisome.""If they had known that you wished it, the entertainment would ha
ve beenput off," said the prince, who, like a wound-up clock, by force of habits
aid things he did not even wish to be believed."Don't tease! Well, and what has 
been decided about Novosiltsev'sdispatch? You know everything.""What can one say
 about it?" replied the prince in a cold, listlesstone. "What has been decided? 
They have decided that Buonaparte hasburnt his boats, and I believe that we are 
ready to burn ours."Prince Vasili always spoke languidly, like an actor repeatin
g a stalepart. Anna Pavlovna Scherer on the contrary, despite her forty years,ov
erflowed with animation and impulsiveness. To be an enthusiast hadbecome her soc
ial vocation and, sometimes even when she did not feellike it, she became enthus
iastic in order not to disappoint theexpectations of those who knew her. The sub
dued smile which, though itdid not suit her faded features, always played round 
her lips expressed,as in a spoiled child, a continual consciousness of her charm
ing defect,which she neither wished, nor could, nor considered it necessary, toc
orrect.In the midst of a conversation on political matters Anna Pavlovna burstou
t:"Oh, don't speak to me of Austria. Perhaps I don't understand things,but Austr
ia never has wished, and does not wish, for war. She isbetraying us! Russia alon
e must save Europe. Our gracious sovereignrecognizes his high vocation and will 
be true to it. That is the onething I have faith in! Our good and wonderful sove
reign has to performthe noblest role on earth, and he is so virtuous and noble t
hat God willnot forsake him. He will fulfill his vocation and crush the hydra of
revolution, which has become more terrible than ever in the person ofthis murder
er and villain! We alone must avenge the blood of the justone.... Whom, I ask yo
u, can we rely on?... England with her commercialspirit will not and cannot unde
rstand the Emperor Alexander's loftinessof soul. She has refused to evacuate Mal
ta. She wanted to find, andstill seeks, some secret motive in our actions. What 
answer didNovosiltsev get? None. The English have not understood and cannotunder
stand the self-abnegation of our Emperor who wants nothing forhimself, but only 
desires the good of mankind. And what have theypromised? Nothing! And what littl
e they have promised they will notperform! Prussia has always declared that Buon
aparte is invincible, andthat all Europe is powerless before him.... And I don't
 believe a wordthat Hardenburg says, or Haugwitz either. This famous Prussianneu
trality is just a trap. I have faith only in God and the loftydestiny of our ado
red monarch. He will save Europe!"She suddenly paused, smiling at her own impetu
osity."I think," said the prince with a smile, "that if you had been sentinstead
 of our dear Wintzingerode you would have captured the King ofPrussia's consent 
by assault. You are so eloquent. Will you give me acup of tea?""In a moment. A p
ropos," she added, becoming calm again, "I am expectingtwo very interesting men 
tonight, le Vicomte de Mortemart, who isconnected with the Montmorencys through 
the Rohans, one of the bestFrench families. He is one of the genuine emigres, th
e good ones. Andalso the Abbe Morio. Do you know that profound thinker? He has b
eenreceived by the Emperor. Had you heard?""I shall be delighted to meet them," 
said the prince. "But tell me," headded with studied carelessness as if it had o
nly just occurred to him,though the question he was about to ask was the chief m
otive of hisvisit, "is it true that the Dowager Empress wants Baron Funke to bea
ppointed first secretary at Vienna? The baron by all accounts is a poorcreature.
"Prince Vasili wished to obtain this post for his son, but others weretrying thr
ough the Dowager Empress Marya Fedorovna to secure it for thebaron.Anna Pavlovna
 almost closed her eyes to indicate that neither she noranyone else had a right 
to criticize what the Empress desired or waspleased with."Baron Funke has been r
ecommended to the Dowager Empress by her sister,"was all she said, in a dry and 
mournful tone.As she named the Empress, Anna Pavlovna's face suddenly assumed an
expression of profound and sincere devotion and respect mingled withsadness, and
 this occurred every time she mentioned her illustriouspatroness. She added that
 Her Majesty had deigned to show Baron Funkebeaucoup d'estime, and again her fac
e clouded over with sadness.The prince was silent and looked indifferent. But, w
ith the womanly andcourtierlike quickness and tact habitual to her, Anna Pavlovn
a wishedboth to rebuke him (for daring to speak as he had done of a manrecommend
ed to the Empress) and at the same time to console him, so shesaid:"Now about yo
ur family. Do you know that since your daughter came outeveryone has been enrapt
ured by her? They say she is amazinglybeautiful."The prince bowed to signify his
 respect and gratitude."I often think," she continued after a short pause, drawi
ng nearer tothe prince and smiling amiably at him as if to show that political a
ndsocial topics were ended and the time had come for intimateconversation--"I of
ten think how unfairly sometimes the joys of life aredistributed. Why has fate g
iven you two such splendid children? I don'tspeak of Anatole, your youngest. I d
on't like him," she added in a toneadmitting of no rejoinder and raising her eye
brows. "Two such charmingchildren. And really you appreciate them less than anyo
ne, and so youdon't deserve to have them."And she smiled her ecstatic smile."I c
an't help it," said the prince. "Lavater would have said I lack thebump of pater
nity.""Don't joke; I mean to have a serious talk with you. Do you know I amdissa
tisfied with your younger son? Between ourselves" (and her faceassumed its melan
choly expression), "he was mentioned at Her Majesty'sand you were pitied...."The
 prince answered nothing, but she looked at him significantly,awaiting a reply. 
He frowned."What would you have me do?" he said at last. "You know I did all afa
ther could for their education, and they have both turned out fools.Hippolyte is
 at least a quiet fool, but Anatole is an active one. Thatis the only difference
 between them." He said this smiling in a way morenatural and animated than usua
l, so that the wrinkles round his mouthvery clearly revealed something unexpecte
dly coarse and unpleasant."And why are children born to such men as you? If you 
were not a fatherthere would be nothing I could reproach you with," said Anna Pa
vlovna,looking up pensively."I am your faithful slave and to you alone I can con
fess that mychildren are the bane of my life. It is the cross I have to bear. Th
atis how I explain it to myself. It can't be helped!"He said no more, but expres
sed his resignation to cruel fate by agesture. Anna Pavlovna meditated."Have you
 never thought of marrying your prodigal son Anatole?" sheasked. "They say old m
aids have a mania for matchmaking, and though Idon't feel that weakness in mysel
f as yet, I know a little person who isvery unhappy with her father. She is a re
lation of yours, Princess MaryBolkonskaya."Prince Vasili did not reply, though, 
with the quickness of memory andperception befitting a man of the world, he indi
cated by a movement ofthe head that he was considering this information."Do you 
know," he said at last, evidently unable to check the sadcurrent of his thoughts
, "that Anatole is costing me forty thousandrubles a year? And," he went on afte
r a pause, "what will it be in fiveyears, if he goes on like this?" Presently he
 added: "That's what wefathers have to put up with.... Is this princess of yours
 rich?""Her father is very rich and stingy. He lives in the country. He is thewe
ll-known Prince Bolkonski who had to retire from the army under thelate Emperor,
 and was nicknamed 'the King of Prussia.' He is very cleverbut eccentric, and a 
bore. The poor girl is very unhappy. She has abrother; I think you know him, he 
married Lise Meinen lately. He is anaide-de-camp of Kutuzov's and will be here t
onight.""Listen, dear Annette," said the prince, suddenly taking Anna Pavlovna's
hand and for some reason drawing it downwards. "Arrange that affair forme and I 
shall always be your most devoted slave-slafe with an f, as avillage elder of mi
ne writes in his reports. She is rich and of goodfamily and that's all I want."A
nd with the familiarity and easy grace peculiar to him, he raised themaid of hon
or's hand to his lips, kissed it, and swung it to and fro ashe lay back in his a
rmchair, looking in another direction."Attendez," said Anna Pavlovna, reflecting
, "I'll speak to Lise, youngBolkonski's wife, this very evening, and perhaps the
 thing can bearranged. It shall be on your family's behalf that I'll start myapp
renticeship as old maid."CHAPTER IIAnna Pavlovna's drawing room was gradually fi
lling. The highestPetersburg society was assembled there: people differing widel
y in ageand character but alike in the social circle to which they belonged.Prin
ce Vasili's daughter, the beautiful Helene, came to take her fatherto the ambass
ador's entertainment; she wore a ball dress and her badgeas maid of honor. The y
outhful little Princess Bolkonskaya, known as lafemme la plus seduisante de Pete
rsbourg, * was also there. She had beenmarried during the previous winter, and b
eing pregnant did not go to anylarge gatherings, but only to small receptions. P
rince Vasili's son,Hippolyte, had come with Mortemart, whom he introduced. The A
bbe Morioand many others had also come.* The most fascinating woman in Petersbur
g.To each new arrival Anna Pavlovna said, "You have not yet seen my aunt,"or "Yo
u do not know my aunt?" and very gravely conducted him or her to alittle old lad
y, wearing large bows of ribbon in her cap, who had comesailing in from another 
room as soon as the guests began to arrive; andslowly turning her eyes from the 
visitor to her aunt, Anna Pavlovnamentioned each one's name and then left them.E
ach visitor performed the ceremony of greeting this old aunt whom notone of them
 knew, not one of them wanted to know, and not one of themcared about; Anna Pavl
ovna observed these greetings with mournful andsolemn interest and silent approv
al. The aunt spoke to each of them inthe same words, about their health and her 
own, and the health of HerMajesty, "who, thank God, was better today." And each 
visitor, thoughpoliteness prevented his showing impatience, left the old woman w
ith asense of relief at having performed a vexatious duty and did not returnto h
er the whole evening.The young Princess Bolkonskaya had brought some work in a g
old-embroidered velvet bag. Her pretty little upper lip, on which a delicatedark
 down was just perceptible, was too short for her teeth, but itlifted all the mo
re sweetly, and was especially charming when sheoccasionally drew it down to mee
t the lower lip. As is always the casewith a thoroughly attractive woman, her de
fect--the shortness of herupper lip and her half-open mouth--seemed to be her ow
n special andpeculiar form of beauty. Everyone brightened at the sight of this p
rettyyoung woman, so soon to become a mother, so full of life and health, andcar
rying her burden so lightly. Old men and dull dispirited young oneswho looked at
 her, after being in her company and talking to her alittle while, felt as if th
ey too were becoming, like her, full of lifeand health. All who talked to her, a
nd at each word saw her bright smileand the constant gleam of her white teeth, t
hought that they were in aspecially amiable mood that day.The little princess we
nt round the table with quick, short, swayingsteps, her workbag on her arm, and 
gaily spreading out her dress satdown on a sofa near the silver samovar, as if a
ll she was doing was apleasure to herself and to all around her. "I have brought
 my work,"said she in French, displaying her bag and addressing all present."Min
d, Annette, I hope you have not played a wicked trick on me," sheadded, turning 
to her hostess. "You wrote that it was to be quite asmall reception, and just se
e how badly I am dressed." And she spreadout her arms to show her short-waisted,
 lace-trimmed, dainty gray dress,girdled with a broad ribbon just below the brea
st."Soyez tranquille, Lise, you will always be prettier than anyone else,"replie
d Anna Pavlovna."You know," said the princess in the same tone of voice and stil
l inFrench, turning to a general, "my husband is deserting me? He is goingto get
 himself killed. Tell me what this wretched war is for?" sheadded, addressing Pr
ince Vasili, and without waiting for an answer sheturned to speak to his daughte
r, the beautiful Helene."What a delightful woman this little princess is!" said 
Prince Vasili toAnna Pavlovna.One of the next arrivals was a stout, heavily buil
t young man withclose-cropped hair, spectacles, the light-colored breeches fashi
onableat that time, a very high ruffle, and a brown dress coat. This stoutyoung 
man was an illegitimate son of Count Bezukhov, a well-knowngrandee of Catherine'
s time who now lay dying in Moscow. The young manhad not yet entered either the 
military or civil service, as he had onlyjust returned from abroad where he had 
been educated, and this was hisfirst appearance in society. Anna Pavlovna greete
d him with the nod sheaccorded to the lowest hierarchy in her drawing room. But 
in spite ofthis lowest-grade greeting, a look of anxiety and fear, as at the sig
htof something too large and unsuited to the place, came over her facewhen she s
aw Pierre enter. Though he was certainly rather bigger thanthe other men in the 
room, her anxiety could only have reference to theclever though shy, but observa
nt and natural, expression whichdistinguished him from everyone else in that dra
wing room."It is very good of you, Monsieur Pierre, to come and visit a poorinva
lid," said Anna Pavlovna, exchanging an alarmed glance with her auntas she condu
cted him to her.Pierre murmured something unintelligible, and continued to look 
round asif in search of something. On his way to the aunt he bowed to the little
princess with a pleased smile, as to an intimate acquaintance.Anna Pavlovna's al
arm was justified, for Pierre turned away from theaunt without waiting to hear h
er speech about Her Majesty's health. AnnaPavlovna in dismay detained him with t
he words: "Do you know the AbbeMorio? He is a most interesting man.""Yes, I have
 heard of his scheme for perpetual peace, and it is veryinteresting but hardly f
easible.""You think so?" rejoined Anna Pavlovna in order to say something and ge
taway to attend to her duties as hostess. But Pierre now committed areverse act 
of impoliteness. First he had left a lady before she hadfinished speaking to him
, and now he continued to speak to another whowished to get away. With his head 
bent, and his big feet spread apart,he began explaining his reasons for thinking
 the abbe's plan chimerical."We will talk of it later," said Anna Pavlovna with 
a smile.And having got rid of this young man who did not know how to behave, she
resumed her duties as hostess and continued to listen and watch, readyto help at
 any point where the conversation might happen to flag. As theforeman of a spinn
ing mill, when he has set the hands to work, goesround and notices here a spindl
e that has stopped or there one thatcreaks or makes more noise than it should, a
nd hastens to check themachine or set it in proper motion, so Anna Pavlovna move
d about herdrawing room, approaching now a silent, now a too-noisy group, and by
 aword or slight rearrangement kept the conversational machine in steady,proper,
 and regular motion. But amid these cares her anxiety aboutPierre was evident. S
he kept an anxious watch on him when he approachedthe group round Mortemart to l
isten to what was being said there, andagain when he passed to another group who
se center was the abbe.Pierre had been educated abroad, and this reception at An
na Pavlovna'swas the first he had attended in Russia. He knew that all theintell
ectual lights of Petersburg were gathered there and, like a childin a toyshop, d
id not know which way to look, afraid of missing anyclever conversation that was
 to be heard. Seeing the self-confident andrefined expression on the faces of th
ose present he was always expectingto hear something very profound. At last he c
ame up to Morio. Here theconversation seemed interesting and he stood waiting fo
r an opportunityto express his own views, as young people are fond of doing.CHAP
TER IIIAnna Pavlovna's reception was in full swing. The spindles hummedsteadily 
and ceaselessly on all sides. With the exception of the aunt,beside whom sat onl
y one elderly lady, who with her thin careworn facewas rather out of place in th
is brilliant society, the whole company hadsettled into three groups. One, chief
ly masculine, had formed round theabbe. Another, of young people, was grouped ro
und the beautiful PrincessHelene, Prince Vasili's daughter, and the little Princ
ess Bolkonskaya,very pretty and rosy, though rather too plump for her age. The t
hirdgroup was gathered round Mortemart and Anna Pavlovna.The vicomte was a nice-
looking young man with soft features and polishedmanners, who evidently consider
ed himself a celebrity but out ofpoliteness modestly placed himself at the dispo
sal of the circle inwhich he found himself. Anna Pavlovna was obviously serving 
him up as atreat to her guests. As a clever maitre d'hotel serves up as a specia
llychoice delicacy a piece of meat that no one who had seen it in thekitchen wou
ld have cared to eat, so Anna Pavlovna served up to herguests, first the vicomte
 and then the abbe, as peculiarly choicemorsels. The group about Mortemart immed
iately began discussing themurder of the Duc d'Enghien. The vicomte said that th
e Duc d'Enghien hadperished by his own magnanimity, and that there were particul
ar reasonsfor Buonaparte's hatred of him."Ah, yes! Do tell us all about it, Vico
mte," said Anna Pavlovna, with apleasant feeling that there was something a la L
ouis XV in the sound ofthat sentence: "Contez nous cela, Vicomte."The vicomte bo
wed and smiled courteously in token of his willingness tocomply. Anna Pavlovna a
rranged a group round him, inviting everyone tolisten to his tale."The vicomte k
new the duc personally," whispered Anna Pavlovna to one ofthe guests. "The vicom
te is a wonderful raconteur," said she to another."How evidently he belongs to t
he best society," said she to a third; andthe vicomte was served up to the compa
ny in the choicest and mostadvantageous style, like a well-garnished joint of ro
ast beef on a hotdish.The vicomte wished to begin his story and gave a subtle sm
ile."Come over here, Helene, dear," said Anna Pavlovna to the beautifulyoung pri
ncess who was sitting some way off, the center of anothergroup.The princess smil
ed. She rose with the same unchanging smile with whichshe had first entered the 
room--the smile of a perfectly beautifulwoman. With a slight rustle of her white
 dress trimmed with moss andivy, with a gleam of white shoulders, glossy hair, a
nd sparklingdiamonds, she passed between the men who made way for her, not looki
ngat any of them but smiling on all, as if graciously allowing each theprivilege
 of admiring her beautiful figure and shapely shoulders, back,and bosom--which i
n the fashion of those days were very much exposed--and she seemed to bring the 
glamour of a ballroom with her as she movedtoward Anna Pavlovna. Helene was so l
ovely that not only did she notshow any trace of coquetry, but on the contrary s
he even appeared shy ofher unquestionable and all too victorious beauty. She see
med to wish,but to be unable, to diminish its effect."How lovely!" said everyone
 who saw her; and the vicomte lifted hisshoulders and dropped his eyes as if sta
rtled by something extraordinarywhen she took her seat opposite and beamed upon 
him also with herunchanging smile."Madame, I doubt my ability before such an aud
ience," said he, smilinglyinclining his head.The princess rested her bare round 
arm on a little table and considereda reply unnecessary. She smilingly waited. A
ll the time the story wasbeing told she sat upright, glancing now at her beautif
ul round arm,altered in shape by its pressure on the table, now at her still mor
ebeautiful bosom, on which she readjusted a diamond necklace. From timeto time s
he smoothed the folds of her dress, and whenever the storyproduced an effect she
 glanced at Anna Pavlovna, at once adopted justthe expression she saw on the mai
d of honor's face, and again relapsedinto her radiant smile.The little princess 
had also left the tea table and followed Helene."Wait a moment, I'll get my work
.... Now then, what are you thinkingof?" she went on, turning to Prince Hippolyt
e. "Fetch me my workbag."There was a general movement as the princess, smiling a
nd talkingmerrily to everyone at once, sat down and gaily arranged herself in he
rseat."Now I am all right," she said, and asking the vicomte to begin, shetook u
p her work.Prince Hippolyte, having brought the workbag, joined the circle andmo
ving a chair close to hers seated himself beside her.Le charmant Hippolyte was s
urprising by his extraordinary resemblance tohis beautiful sister, but yet more 
by the fact that in spite of thisresemblance he was exceedingly ugly. His featur
es were like hissister's, but while in her case everything was lit up by a joyou
s, self-satisfied, youthful, and constant smile of animation, and by thewonderfu
l classic beauty of her figure, his face on the contrary wasdulled by imbecility
 and a constant expression of sullen self-confidence, while his body was thin an
d weak. His eyes, nose, and mouthall seemed puckered into a vacant, wearied grim
ace, and his arms andlegs always fell into unnatural positions."It's not going t
o be a ghost story?" said he, sitting down beside theprincess and hastily adjust
ing his lorgnette, as if without thisinstrument he could not begin to speak."Why
 no, my dear fellow," said the astonished narrator, shrugging hisshoulders."Beca
use I hate ghost stories," said Prince Hippolyte in a tone whichshowed that he o
nly understood the meaning of his words after he haduttered them.He spoke with s
uch self-confidence that his hearers could not be surewhether what he said was v
ery witty or very stupid. He was dressed in adark-green dress coat, knee breeche
s of the color of cuisse de nympheeffrayee, as he called it, shoes, and silk sto
ckings.The vicomte told his tale very neatly. It was an anecdote, then current,t
o the effect that the Duc d'Enghien had gone secretly to Paris to visitMademoise
lle George; that at her house he came upon Bonaparte, who alsoenjoyed the famous
 actress' favors, and that in his presence Napoleonhappened to fall into one of 
the fainting fits to which he was subject,and was thus at the duc's mercy. The l
atter spared him, and thismagnanimity Bonaparte subsequently repaid by death.The
 story was very pretty and interesting, especially at the point wherethe rivals 
suddenly recognized one another; and the ladies lookedagitated."Charming!" said 
Anna Pavlovna with an inquiring glance at the littleprincess."Charming!" whisper
ed the little princess, sticking the needle into herwork as if to testify that t
he interest and fascination of the storyprevented her from going on with it.The 
vicomte appreciated this silent praise and smiling gratefullyprepared to continu
e, but just then Anna Pavlovna, who had kept awatchful eye on the young man who 
so alarmed her, noticed that he wastalking too loudly and vehemently with the ab
be, so she hurried to therescue. Pierre had managed to start a conversation with
 the abbe aboutthe balance of power, and the latter, evidently interested by the
 youngman's simple-minded eagerness, was explaining his pet theory. Both weretal
king and listening too eagerly and too naturally, which was why AnnaPavlovna dis
approved."The means are... the balance of power in Europe and the rights of thep
eople," the abbe was saying. "It is only necessary for one powerfulnation like R
ussia--barbaric as she is said to be--to place herselfdisinterestedly at the hea
d of an alliance having for its object themaintenance of the balance of power of
 Europe, and it would save theworld!""But how are you to get that balance?" Pier
re was beginning.At that moment Anna Pavlovna came up and, looking severely at P
ierre,asked the Italian how he stood Russian climate. The Italian's faceinstantl
y changed and assumed an offensively affected, sugaryexpression, evidently habit
ual to him when conversing with women."I am so enchanted by the brilliancy of th
e wit and culture of thesociety, more especially of the feminine society, in whi
ch I have hadthe honor of being received, that I have not yet had time to think 
ofthe climate," said he.Not letting the abbe and Pierre escape, Anna Pavlovna, t
he moreconveniently to keep them under observation, brought them into thelarger 
circle.CHAPTER IVJust then another visitor entered the drawing room: Prince Andr
ewBolkonski, the little princess' husband. He was a very handsome youngman, of m
edium height, with firm, clearcut features. Everything abouthim, from his weary,
 bored expression to his quiet, measured step,offered a most striking contrast t
o his quiet, little wife. It wasevident that he not only knew everyone in the dr
awing room, but hadfound them to be so tiresome that it wearied him to look at o
r listen tothem. And among all these faces that he found so tedious, none seemed
 tobore him so much as that of his pretty wife. He turned away from herwith a gr
imace that distorted his handsome face, kissed Anna Pavlovna'shand, and screwing
 up his eyes scanned the whole company."You are off to the war, Prince?" said An
na Pavlovna."General Kutuzov," said Bolkonski, speaking French and stressing the
last syllable of the general's name like a Frenchman, "has been pleasedto take m
e as an aide-de-camp....""And Lise, your wife?""She will go to the country.""Are
 you not ashamed to deprive us of your charming wife?""Andre," said his wife, ad
dressing her husband in the same coquettishmanner in which she spoke to other me
n, "the vicomte has been telling ussuch a tale about Mademoiselle George and Buo
naparte!"Prince Andrew screwed up his eyes and turned away. Pierre, who from the
moment Prince Andrew entered the room had watched him with glad,affectionate eye
s, now came up and took his arm. Before he looked roundPrince Andrew frowned aga
in, expressing his annoyance with whoever wastouching his arm, but when he saw P
ierre's beaming face he gave him anunexpectedly kind and pleasant smile."There n
ow!... So you, too, are in the great world?" said he to Pierre."I knew you would
 be here," replied Pierre. "I will come to supper withyou. May I?" he added in a
 low voice so as not to disturb the vicomtewho was continuing his story."No, imp
ossible!" said Prince Andrew, laughing and pressing Pierre'shand to show that th
ere was no need to ask the question. He wished tosay something more, but at that
 moment Prince Vasili and his daughtergot up to go and the two young men rose to
 let them pass."You must excuse me, dear Vicomte," said Prince Vasili to the Fre
nchman,holding him down by the sleeve in a friendly way to prevent his rising."T
his unfortunate fete at the ambassador's deprives me of a pleasure,and obliges m
e to interrupt you. I am very sorry to leave yourenchanting party," said he, tur
ning to Anna Pavlovna.His daughter, Princess Helene, passed between the chairs, 
lightlyholding up the folds of her dress, and the smile shone still moreradiantl
y on her beautiful face. Pierre gazed at her with rapturous,almost frightened, e
yes as she passed him."Very lovely," said Prince Andrew."Very," said Pierre.In p
assing Prince Vasili seized Pierre's hand and said to Anna Pavlovna:"Educate thi
s bear for me! He has been staying with me a whole month andthis is the first ti
me I have seen him in society. Nothing is sonecessary for a young man as the soc
iety of clever women."Anna Pavlovna smiled and promised to take Pierre in hand. 
She knew hisfather to be a connection of Prince Vasili's. The elderly lady who h
adbeen sitting with the old aunt rose hurriedly and overtook Prince Vasiliin the
 anteroom. All the affectation of interest she had assumed hadleft her kindly an
d tear-worn face and it now expressed only anxiety andfear."How about my son Bor
is, Prince?" said she, hurrying after him into theanteroom. "I can't remain any 
longer in Petersburg. Tell me what news Imay take back to my poor boy."Although 
Prince Vasili listened reluctantly and not very politely to theelderly lady, eve
n betraying some impatience, she gave him aningratiating and appealing smile, an
d took his hand that he might not goaway."What would it cost you to say a word t
o the Emperor, and then he wouldbe transferred to the Guards at once?" said she.
"Believe me, Princess, I am ready to do all I can," answered PrinceVasili, "but 
it is difficult for me to ask the Emperor. I should adviseyou to appeal to Rumya
ntsev through Prince Golitsyn. That would be thebest way."The elderly lady was a
 Princess Drubetskaya, belonging to one of thebest families in Russia, but she w
as poor, and having long been out ofsociety had lost her former influential conn
ections. She had now come toPetersburg to procure an appointment in the Guards f
or her only son. Itwas, in fact, solely to meet Prince Vasili that she had obtai
ned aninvitation to Anna Pavlovna's reception and had sat listening to thevicomt
e's story. Prince Vasili's words frightened her, an embitteredlook clouded her o
nce handsome face, but only for a moment; then shesmiled again and clutched Prin
ce Vasili's arm more tightly."Listen to me, Prince," said she. "I have never yet
 asked you foranything and I never will again, nor have I ever reminded you of m
yfather's friendship for you; but now I entreat you for God's sake to dothis for
 my son--and I shall always regard you as a benefactor," sheadded hurriedly. "No
, don't be angry, but promise! I have asked Golitsynand he has refused. Be the k
indhearted man you always were," she said,trying to smile though tears were in h
er eyes."Papa, we shall be late," said Princess Helene, turning her beautifulhea
d and looking over her classically molded shoulder as she stoodwaiting by the do
or.Influence in society, however, is a capital which has to be economizedif it i
s to last. Prince Vasili knew this, and having once realized thatif he asked on 
behalf of all who begged of him, he would soon be unableto ask for himself, he b
ecame chary of using his influence. But inPrincess Drubetskaya's case he felt, a
fter her second appeal, somethinglike qualms of conscience. She had reminded him
 of what was quite true;he had been indebted to her father for the first steps i
n his career.Moreover, he could see by her manners that she was one of those wom
en--mostly mothers--who, having once made up their minds, will not restuntil the
y have gained their end, and are prepared if necessary to go oninsisting day aft
er day and hour after hour, and even to make scenes.This last consideration move
d him."My dear Anna Mikhaylovna," said he with his usual familiarity andwearines
s of tone, "it is almost impossible for me to do what you ask;but to prove my de
votion to you and how I respect your father's memory,I will do the impossible--y
our son shall be transferred to the Guards.Here is my hand on it. Are you satisf
ied?""My dear benefactor! This is what I expected from you--I knew yourkindness!
" He turned to go."Wait--just a word! When he has been transferred to the Guards
..." shefaltered. "You are on good terms with Michael Ilarionovich Kutuzov...rec
ommend Boris to him as adjutant! Then I shall be at rest, andthen..."Prince Vasi
li smiled."No, I won't promise that. You don't know how Kutuzov is pestered sinc
ehis appointment as Commander in Chief. He told me himself that all theMoscow la
dies have conspired to give him all their sons as adjutants.""No, but do promise
! I won't let you go! My dear benefactor...""Papa," said his beautiful daughter 
in the same tone as before, "weshall be late.""Well, au revoir! Good-bye! You he
ar her?""Then tomorrow you will speak to the Emperor?""Certainly; but about Kutu
zov, I don't promise.""Do promise, do promise, Vasili!" cried Anna Mikhaylovna a
s he went,with the smile of a coquettish girl, which at one time probably camena
turally to her, but was now very ill-suited to her careworn face.Apparently she 
had forgotten her age and by force of habit employed allthe old feminine arts. B
ut as soon as the prince had gone her faceresumed its former cold, artificial ex
pression. She returned to thegroup where the vicomte was still talking, and agai
n pretended tolisten, while waiting till it would be time to leave. Her task was
accomplished.CHAPTER V"And what do you think of this latest comedy, the coronati
on at Milan?"asked Anna Pavlovna, "and of the comedy of the people of Genoa and 
Luccalaying their petitions before Monsieur Buonaparte, and MonsieurBuonaparte s
itting on a throne and granting the petitions of thenations? Adorable! It is eno
ugh to make one's head whirl! It is as ifthe whole world had gone crazy."Prince 
Andrew looked Anna Pavlovna straight in the face with a sarcasticsmile."'Dieu me
 la donne, gare a qui la touche!' * They say he was very finewhen he said that,"
 he remarked, repeating the words in Italian: "'Diomi l'ha dato. Guai a chi la t
occhi!'"* God has given it to me, let him who touches it beware!"I hope this wil
l prove the last drop that will make the glass runover," Anna Pavlovna continued
. "The sovereigns will not be able toendure this man who is a menace to everythi
ng.""The sovereigns? I do not speak of Russia," said the vicomte, polite buthope
less: "The sovereigns, madame... What have they done for Louis XVII,for the Quee
n, or for Madame Elizabeth? Nothing!" and he became moreanimated. "And believe m
e, they are reaping the reward of their betrayalof the Bourbon cause. The sovere
igns! Why, they are sending ambassadorsto compliment the usurper."And sighing di
sdainfully, he again changed his position.Prince Hippolyte, who had been gazing 
at the vicomte for some timethrough his lorgnette, suddenly turned completely ro
und toward thelittle princess, and having asked for a needle began tracing the C
ondecoat of arms on the table. He explained this to her with as much gravityas i
f she had asked him to do it."Baton de gueules, engrele de gueules d'azur--maiso
n Conde," said he.The princess listened, smiling."If Buonaparte remains on the t
hrone of France a year longer," thevicomte continued, with the air of a man who,
 in a matter with which heis better acquainted than anyone else, does not listen
 to others butfollows the current of his own thoughts, "things will have gone to
o far.By intrigues, violence, exile, and executions, French society--I meangood 
French society--will have been forever destroyed, and then..."He shrugged his sh
oulders and spread out his hands. Pierre wished tomake a remark, for the convers
ation interested him, but Anna Pavlovna,who had him under observation, interrupt
ed:"The Emperor Alexander," said she, with the melancholy which alwaysaccompanie
d any reference of hers to the Imperial family, "has declaredthat he will leave 
it to the French people themselves to choose theirown form of government; and I 
believe that once free from the usurper,the whole nation will certainly throw it
self into the arms of itsrightful king," she concluded, trying to be amiable to 
the royalistemigrant."That is doubtful," said Prince Andrew. "Monsieur le Vicomt
e quiterightly supposes that matters have already gone too far. I think it willb
e difficult to return to the old regime.""From what I have heard," said Pierre, 
blushing and breaking into theconversation, "almost all the aristocracy has alre
ady gone over toBonaparte's side.""It is the Buonapartists who say that," replie
d the vicomte withoutlooking at Pierre. "At the present time it is difficult to 
know the realstate of French public opinion.""Bonaparte has said so," remarked P
rince Andrew with a sarcastic smile.It was evident that he did not like the vico
mte and was aiming hisremarks at him, though without looking at him."'I showed t
hem the path to glory, but they did not follow it,'" PrinceAndrew continued afte
r a short silence, again quoting Napoleon's words."'I opened my antechambers and
 they crowded in.' I do not know how farhe was justified in saying so.""Not in t
he least," replied the vicomte. "After the murder of the duceven the most partia
l ceased to regard him as a hero. If to somepeople," he went on, turning to Anna
 Pavlovna, "he ever was a hero,after the murder of the duc there was one martyr 
more in heaven and onehero less on earth."Before Anna Pavlovna and the others ha
d time to smile their appreciationof the vicomte's epigram, Pierre again broke i
nto the conversation, andthough Anna Pavlovna felt sure he would say something i
nappropriate, shewas unable to stop him."The execution of the Duc d'Enghien," de
clared Monsieur Pierre, "was apolitical necessity, and it seems to me that Napol
eon showed greatnessof soul by not fearing to take on himself the whole responsi
bility ofthat deed.""Dieu! Mon Dieu!" muttered Anna Pavlovna in a terrified whis
per."What, Monsieur Pierre... Do you consider that assassination showsgreatness 
of soul?" said the little princess, smiling and drawing herwork nearer to her."O
h! Oh!" exclaimed several voices."Capital!" said Prince Hippolyte in English, an
d began slapping his kneewith the palm of his hand.The vicomte merely shrugged h
is shoulders. Pierre looked solemnly at hisaudience over his spectacles and cont
inued."I say so," he continued desperately, "because the Bourbons fled fromthe R
evolution leaving the people to anarchy, and Napoleon aloneunderstood the Revolu
tion and quelled it, and so for the general good,he could not stop short for the
 sake of one man's life.""Won't you come over to the other table?" suggested Ann
a Pavlovna.But Pierre continued his speech without heeding her."No," cried he, b
ecoming more and more eager, "Napoleon is great becausehe rose superior to the R
evolution, suppressed its abuses, preserved allthat was good in it--equality of 
citizenship and freedom of speech andof the press--and only for that reason did 
he obtain power.""Yes, if having obtained power, without availing himself of it 
to commitmurder he had restored it to the rightful king, I should have called hi
ma great man," remarked the vicomte."He could not do that. The people only gave 
him power that he might ridthem of the Bourbons and because they saw that he was
 a great man. TheRevolution was a grand thing!" continued Monsieur Pierre, betra
ying bythis desperate and provocative proposition his extreme youth and hiswish 
to express all that was in his mind."What? Revolution and regicide a grand thing
?... Well, after that... Butwon't you come to this other table?" repeated Anna P
avlovna."Rousseau's Contrat Social," said the vicomte with a tolerant smile."I a
m not speaking of regicide, I am speaking about ideas.""Yes: ideas of robbery, m
urder, and regicide," again interjected anironical voice."Those were extremes, n
o doubt, but they are not what is most important.What is important are the right
s of man, emancipation from prejudices,and equality of citizenship, and all thes
e ideas Napoleon has retainedin full force.""Liberty and equality," said the vic
omte contemptuously, as if at lastdeciding seriously to prove to this youth how 
foolish his words were,"high-sounding words which have long been discredited. Wh
o does not loveliberty and equality? Even our Saviour preached liberty and equal
ity.Have people since the Revolution become happier? On the contrary. Wewanted l
iberty, but Buonaparte has destroyed it."Prince Andrew kept looking with an amus
ed smile from Pierre to thevicomte and from the vicomte to their hostess. In the
 first moment ofPierre's outburst Anna Pavlovna, despite her social experience, 
washorror-struck. But when she saw that Pierre's sacrilegious words had notexasp
erated the vicomte, and had convinced herself that it wasimpossible to stop him,
 she rallied her forces and joined the vicomte ina vigorous attack on the orator
."But, my dear Monsieur Pierre," said she, "how do you explain the factof a grea
t man executing a duc--or even an ordinary man who--is innocentand untried?""I s
hould like," said the vicomte, "to ask how monsieur explains the18th Brumaire; w
as not that an imposture? It was a swindle, and not atall like the conduct of a 
great man!""And the prisoners he killed in Africa? That was horrible!" said thel
ittle princess, shrugging her shoulders."He's a low fellow, say what you will," 
remarked Prince Hippolyte.Pierre, not knowing whom to answer, looked at them all
 and smiled. Hissmile was unlike the half-smile of other people. When he smiled,
 hisgrave, even rather gloomy, look was instantaneously replaced by another--a c
hildlike, kindly, even rather silly look, which seemed to askforgiveness.The vic
omte who was meeting him for the first time saw clearly that thisyoung Jacobin w
as not so terrible as his words suggested. All weresilent."How do you expect him
 to answer you all at once?" said Prince Andrew."Besides, in the actions of a st
atesman one has to distinguish betweenhis acts as a private person, as a general
, and as an emperor. So itseems to me.""Yes, yes, of course!" Pierre chimed in, 
pleased at the arrival of thisreinforcement."One must admit," continued Prince A
ndrew, "that Napoleon as a man wasgreat on the bridge of Arcola, and in the hosp
ital at Jaffa where hegave his hand to the plague-stricken; but... but there are
 other actswhich it is difficult to justify."Prince Andrew, who had evidently wi
shed to tone down the awkwardness ofPierre's remarks, rose and made a sign to hi
s wife that it was time togo.Suddenly Prince Hippolyte started up making signs t
o everyone to attend,and asking them all to be seated began:"I was told a charmi
ng Moscow story today and must treat you to it.Excuse me, Vicomte--I must tell i
t in Russian or the point will belost...." And Prince Hippolyte began to tell hi
s story in such Russianas a Frenchman would speak after spending about a year in
 Russia.Everyone waited, so emphatically and eagerly did he demand theirattentio
n to his story."There is in Moscow a lady, une dame, and she is very stingy. She
 musthave two footmen behind her carriage, and very big ones. That was hertaste.
 And she had a lady's maid, also big. She said..."Here Prince Hippolyte paused, 
evidently collecting his ideas withdifficulty."She said... Oh yes! She said, 'Gi
rl,' to the maid, 'put on a livery,get up behind the carriage, and come with me 
while I make some calls.'"Here Prince Hippolyte spluttered and burst out laughin
g long before hisaudience, which produced an effect unfavorable to the narrator.
 Severalpersons, among them the elderly lady and Anna Pavlovna, did howeversmile
."She went. Suddenly there was a great wind. The girl lost her hat andher long h
air came down...." Here he could contain himself no longer andwent on, between g
asps of laughter: "And the whole world knew...."And so the anecdote ended. Thoug
h it was unintelligible why he had toldit, or why it had to be told in Russian, 
still Anna Pavlovna and theothers appreciated Prince Hippolyte's social tact in 
so agreeably endingPierre's unpleasant and unamiable outburst. After the anecdot
e theconversation broke up into insignificant small talk about the last andnext 
balls, about theatricals, and who would meet whom, and when andwhere.CHAPTER VIH
aving thanked Anna Pavlovna for her charming soiree, the guests beganto take the
ir leave.Pierre was ungainly. Stout, about the average height, broad, with huger
ed hands; he did not know, as the saying is, how to enter a drawingroom and stil
l less how to leave one; that is, how to say somethingparticularly agreeable bef
ore going away. Besides this he was absent-minded. When he rose to go, he took u
p instead of his own, the general'sthree-cornered hat, and held it, pulling at t
he plume, till the generalasked him to restore it. All his absent-mindedness and
 inability toenter a room and converse in it was, however, redeemed by his kindl
y,simple, and modest expression. Anna Pavlovna turned toward him and, witha Chri
stian mildness that expressed forgiveness of his indiscretion,nodded and said: "
I hope to see you again, but I also hope you willchange your opinions, my dear M
onsieur Pierre."When she said this, he did not reply and only bowed, but again e
verybodysaw his smile, which said nothing, unless perhaps, "Opinions areopinions
, but you see what a capital, good-natured fellow I am." Andeveryone, including 
Anna Pavlovna, felt this.Prince Andrew had gone out into the hall, and, turning 
his shoulders tothe footman who was helping him on with his cloak, listenedindif
ferently to his wife's chatter with Prince Hippolyte who had alsocome into the h
all. Prince Hippolyte stood close to the pretty, pregnantprincess, and stared fi
xedly at her through his eyeglass."Go in, Annette, or you will catch cold," said
 the little princess,taking leave of Anna Pavlovna. "It is settled," she added i
n a lowvoice.Anna Pavlovna had already managed to speak to Lise about the match 
shecontemplated between Anatole and the little princess' sister-in-law."I rely o
n you, my dear," said Anna Pavlovna, also in a low tone. "Writeto her and let me
 know how her father looks at the matter. Au revoir!"--and she left the hall.Pri
nce Hippolyte approached the little princess and, bending his faceclose to her, 
began to whisper something.Two footmen, the princess' and his own, stood holding
 a shawl and acloak, waiting for the conversation to finish. They listened to th
eFrench sentences which to them were meaningless, with an air ofunderstanding bu
t not wishing to appear to do so. The princess as usualspoke smilingly and liste
ned with a laugh."I am very glad I did not go to the ambassador's," said Prince 
Hippolyte"-so dull-. It has been a delightful evening, has it not? Delightful!""
They say the ball will be very good," replied the princess, drawing upher downy 
little lip. "All the pretty women in society will be there.""Not all, for you wi
ll not be there; not all," said Prince Hippolytesmiling joyfully; and snatching 
the shawl from the footman, whom he evenpushed aside, he began wrapping it round
 the princess. Either fromawkwardness or intentionally (no one could have said w
hich) after theshawl had been adjusted he kept his arm around her for a long tim
e, asthough embracing her.Still smiling, she gracefully moved away, turning and 
glancing at herhusband. Prince Andrew's eyes were closed, so weary and sleepy di
d heseem."Are you ready?" he asked his wife, looking past her.Prince Hippolyte h
urriedly put on his cloak, which in the latest fashionreached to his very heels,
 and, stumbling in it, ran out into the porchfollowing the princess, whom a foot
man was helping into the carriage."Princesse, au revoir," cried he, stumbling wi
th his tongue as well aswith his feet.The princess, picking up her dress, was ta
king her seat in the darkcarriage, her husband was adjusting his saber; Prince H
ippolyte, underpretense of helping, was in everyone's way."Allow me, sir," said 
Prince Andrew in Russian in a cold, disagreeabletone to Prince Hippolyte who was
 blocking his path."I am expecting you, Pierre," said the same voice, but gently
 andaffectionately.The postilion started, the carriage wheels rattled. Prince Hi
ppolytelaughed spasmodically as he stood in the porch waiting for the vicomtewho
m he had promised to take home."Well, mon cher," said the vicomte, having seated
 himself besideHippolyte in the carriage, "your little princess is very nice, ve
ry niceindeed, quite French," and he kissed the tips of his fingers. Hippolytebu
rst out laughing."Do you know, you are a terrible chap for all your innocent air
s,"continued the vicomte. "I pity the poor husband, that little officer whogives
 himself the airs of a monarch."Hippolyte spluttered again, and amid his laughte
r said, "And you weresaying that the Russian ladies are not equal to the French?
 One has toknow how to deal with them."Pierre reaching the house first went into
 Prince Andrew's study like onequite at home, and from habit immediately lay dow
n on the sofa, tookfrom the shelf the first book that came to his hand (it was C
aesar'sCommentaries), and resting on his elbow, began reading it in the middle."
What have you done to Mlle Scherer? She will be quite ill now," saidPrince Andre
w, as he entered the study, rubbing his small white hands.Pierre turned his whol
e body, making the sofa creak. He lifted his eagerface to Prince Andrew, smiled,
 and waved his hand."That abbe is very interesting but he does not see the thing
 in theright light.... In my opinion perpetual peace is possible but--I do notkn
ow how to express it... not by a balance of political power...."It was evident t
hat Prince Andrew was not interested in such abstractconversation."One can't eve
rywhere say all one thinks, mon cher. Well, have you atlast decided on anything?
 Are you going to be a guardsman or adiplomatist?" asked Prince Andrew after a m
omentary silence.Pierre sat up on the sofa, with his legs tucked under him."Real
ly, I don't yet know. I don't like either the one or the other.""But you must de
cide on something! Your father expects it."Pierre at the age of ten had been sen
t abroad with an abbe as tutor, andhad remained away till he was twenty. When he
 returned to Moscow hisfather dismissed the abbe and said to the young man, "Now
 go toPetersburg, look round, and choose your profession. I will agree toanythin
g. Here is a letter to Prince Vasili, and here is money. Write tome all about it
, and I will help you in everything." Pierre had alreadybeen choosing a career f
or three months, and had not decided onanything. It was about this choice that P
rince Andrew was speaking.Pierre rubbed his forehead."But he must be a Freemason
," said he, referring to the abbe whom he hadmet that evening."That is all nonse
nse." Prince Andrew again interrupted him, "let ustalk business. Have you been t
o the Horse Guards?""No, I have not; but this is what I have been thinking and w
anted totell you. There is a war now against Napoleon. If it were a war forfreed
om I could understand it and should be the first to enter the army;but to help E
ngland and Austria against the greatest man in the world isnot right."Prince And
rew only shrugged his shoulders at Pierre's childish words. Heput on the air of 
one who finds it impossible to reply to such nonsense,but it would in fact have 
been difficult to give any other answer thanthe one Prince Andrew gave to this n
aive question."If no one fought except on his own conviction, there would be no 
wars,"he said."And that would be splendid," said Pierre.Prince Andrew smiled iro
nically."Very likely it would be splendid, but it will never come about...""Well
, why are you going to the war?" asked Pierre."What for? I don't know. I must. B
esides that I am going..." He paused."I am going because the life I am leading h
ere does not suit me!"CHAPTER VIIThe rustle of a woman's dress was heard in the 
next room. Prince Andrewshook himself as if waking up, and his face assumed the 
look it had hadin Anna Pavlovna's drawing room. Pierre removed his feet from the
 sofa.The princess came in. She had changed her gown for a house dress asfresh a
nd elegant as the other. Prince Andrew rose and politely placed achair for her."
How is it," she began, as usual in French, settling down briskly andfussily in t
he easy chair, "how is it Annette never got married? Howstupid you men all are n
ot to have married her! Excuse me for saying so,but you have no sense about wome
n. What an argumentative fellow you are,Monsieur Pierre!""And I am still arguing
 with your husband. I can't understand why hewants to go to the war," replied Pi
erre, addressing the princess withnone of the embarrassment so commonly shown by
 young men in theirintercourse with young women.The princess started. Evidently 
Pierre's words touched her to the quick."Ah, that is just what I tell him!" said
 she. "I don't understand it; Idon't in the least understand why men can't live 
without wars. How is itthat we women don't want anything of the kind, don't need
 it? Now youshall judge between us. I always tell him: Here he is Uncle's aide-d
e-camp, a most brilliant position. He is so well known, so muchappreciated by ev
eryone. The other day at the Apraksins' I heard a ladyasking, 'Is that the famou
s Prince Andrew?' I did indeed." She laughed."He is so well received everywhere.
 He might easily become aide-de-campto the Emperor. You know the Emperor spoke t
o him most graciously.Annette and I were speaking of how to arrange it. What do 
you think?"Pierre looked at his friend and, noticing that he did not like thecon
versation, gave no reply."When are you starting?" he asked."Oh, don't speak of h
is going, don't! I won't hear it spoken of," saidthe princess in the same petula
ntly playful tone in which she had spokento Hippolyte in the drawing room and wh
ich was so plainly ill-suited tothe family circle of which Pierre was almost a m
ember. "Today when Iremembered that all these delightful associations must be br
oken off...and then you know, Andre..." (she looked significantly at her husband
)"I'm afraid, I'm afraid!" she whispered, and a shudder ran down herback.Her hus
band looked at her as if surprised to notice that someone besidesPierre and hims
elf was in the room, and addressed her in a tone offrigid politeness."What is it
 you are afraid of, Lise? I don't understand," said he."There, what egotists men
 all are: all, all egotists! Just for a whim ofhis own, goodness only knows why,
 he leaves me and locks me up alone inthe country.""With my father and sister, r
emember," said Prince Andrew gently."Alone all the same, without my friends.... 
And he expects me not to beafraid."Her tone was now querulous and her lip drawn 
up, giving her not ajoyful, but an animal, squirrel-like expression. She paused 
as if shefelt it indecorous to speak of her pregnancy before Pierre, though theg
ist of the matter lay in that."I still can't understand what you are afraid of,"
 said Prince Andrewslowly, not taking his eyes off his wife.The princess blushed
, and raised her arms with a gesture of despair."No, Andrew, I must say you have
 changed. Oh, how you have...""Your doctor tells you to go to bed earlier," said
 Prince Andrew. "Youhad better go."The princess said nothing, but suddenly her s
hort downy lip quivered.Prince Andrew rose, shrugged his shoulders, and walked a
bout the room.Pierre looked over his spectacles with naive surprise, now at him 
andnow at her, moved as if about to rise too, but changed his mind."Why should I
 mind Monsieur Pierre being here?" exclaimed the littleprincess suddenly, her pr
etty face all at once distorted by a tearfulgrimace. "I have long wanted to ask 
you, Andrew, why you have changed soto me? What have I done to you? You are goin
g to the war and have nopity for me. Why is it?""Lise!" was all Prince Andrew sa
id. But that one word expressed anentreaty, a threat, and above all conviction t
hat she would herselfregret her words. But she went on hurriedly:"You treat me l
ike an invalid or a child. I see it all! Did you behavelike that six months ago?
""Lise, I beg you to desist," said Prince Andrew still more emphatically.Pierre,
 who had been growing more and more agitated as he listened toall this, rose and
 approached the princess. He seemed unable to bear thesight of tears and was rea
dy to cry himself."Calm yourself, Princess! It seems so to you because... I assu
re you Imyself have experienced... and so... because... No, excuse me! Anoutside
r is out of place here... No, don't distress yourself... Good-bye!"Prince Andrew
 caught him by the hand."No, wait, Pierre! The princess is too kind to wish to d
eprive me of thepleasure of spending the evening with you.""No, he thinks only o
f himself," muttered the princess withoutrestraining her angry tears."Lise!" sai
d Prince Andrew dryly, raising his voice to the pitch whichindicates that patien
ce is exhausted.Suddenly the angry, squirrel-like expression of the princess' pr
ettyface changed into a winning and piteous look of fear. Her beautiful eyesglan
ced askance at her husband's face, and her own assumed the timid,deprecating exp
ression of a dog when it rapidly but feebly wags itsdrooping tail."Mon Dieu, mon
 Dieu!" she muttered, and lifting her dress with one handshe went up to her husb
and and kissed him on the forehead."Good night, Lise," said he, rising and court
eously kissing her hand ashe would have done to a stranger.CHAPTER VIIIThe frien
ds were silent. Neither cared to begin talking. Pierrecontinually glanced at Pri
nce Andrew; Prince Andrew rubbed his foreheadwith his small hand."Let us go and 
have supper," he said with a sigh, going to the door.They entered the elegant, n
ewly decorated, and luxurious dining room.Everything from the table napkins to t
he silver, china, and glass borethat imprint of newness found in the households 
of the newly married.Halfway through supper Prince Andrew leaned his elbows on t
he table and,with a look of nervous agitation such as Pierre had never before se
en onhis face, began to talk--as one who has long had something on his mindand s
uddenly determines to speak out."Never, never marry, my dear fellow! That's my a
dvice: never marry tillyou can say to yourself that you have done all you are ca
pable of, anduntil you have ceased to love the woman of your choice and have see
n herplainly as she is, or else you will make a cruel and irrevocablemistake. Ma
rry when you are old and good for nothing--or all that isgood and noble in you w
ill be lost. It will all be wasted on trifles.Yes! Yes! Yes! Don't look at me wi
th such surprise. If you marryexpecting anything from yourself in the future, yo
u will feel at everystep that for you all is ended, all is closed except the dra
wing room,where you will be ranged side by side with a court lackey and anidiot!
... But what's the good?..." and he waved his arm.Pierre took off his spectacles
, which made his face seem different andthe good-natured expression still more a
pparent, and gazed at his friendin amazement."My wife," continued Prince Andrew,
 "is an excellent woman, one of thoserare women with whom a man's honor is safe;
 but, O God, what would I notgive now to be unmarried! You are the first and onl
y one to whom Imention this, because I like you."As he said this Prince Andrew w
as less than ever like that Bolkonski whohad lolled in Anna Pavlovna's easy chai
rs and with half-closed eyes haduttered French phrases between his teeth. Every 
muscle of his thin facewas now quivering with nervous excitement; his eyes, in w
hich the fireof life had seemed extinguished, now flashed with brilliant light. 
Itwas evident that the more lifeless he seemed at ordinary times, the moreimpass
ioned he became in these moments of almost morbid irritation."You don't understa
nd why I say this," he continued, "but it is thewhole story of life. You talk of
 Bonaparte and his career," said he(though Pierre had not mentioned Bonaparte), 
"but Bonaparte when heworked went step by step toward his goal. He was free, he 
had nothingbut his aim to consider, and he reached it. But tie yourself up with 
awoman and, like a chained convict, you lose all freedom! And all youhave of hop
e and strength merely weighs you down and torments you withregret. Drawing rooms
, gossip, balls, vanity, and triviality--these arethe enchanted circle I cannot 
escape from. I am now going to the war,the greatest war there ever was, and I kn
ow nothing and am fit fornothing. I am very amiable and have a caustic wit," con
tinued PrinceAndrew, "and at Anna Pavlovna's they listen to me. And that stupid 
setwithout whom my wife cannot exist, and those women... If you only knewwhat th
ose society women are, and women in general! My father is right.Selfish, vain, s
tupid, trivial in everything--that's what women are whenyou see them in their tr
ue colors! When you meet them in society itseems as if there were something in t
hem, but there's nothing, nothing,nothing! No, don't marry, my dear fellow; don'
t marry!" concluded PrinceAndrew."It seems funny to me," said Pierre, "that you,
 you should consideryourself incapable and your life a spoiled life. You have ev
erythingbefore you, everything. And you..."He did not finish his sentence, but h
is tone showed how highly hethought of his friend and how much he expected of hi
m in the future."How can he talk like that?" thought Pierre. He considered his f
riend amodel of perfection because Prince Andrew possessed in the highestdegree 
just the very qualities Pierre lacked, and which might be bestdescribed as stren
gth of will. Pierre was always astonished at PrinceAndrew's calm manner of treat
ing everybody, his extraordinary memory,his extensive reading (he had read every
thing, knew everything, and hadan opinion about everything), but above all at hi
s capacity for work andstudy. And if Pierre was often struck by Andrew's lack of
 capacity forphilosophical meditation (to which he himself was particularlyaddic
ted), he regarded even this not as a defect but as a sign ofstrength.Even in the
 best, most friendly and simplest relations of life, praiseand commendation are 
essential, just as grease is necessary to wheelsthat they may run smoothly."My p
art is played out," said Prince Andrew. "What's the use of talkingabout me? Let 
us talk about you," he added after a silence, smiling athis reassuring thoughts.
That smile was immediately reflected on Pierre's face."But what is there to say 
about me?" said Pierre, his face relaxing intoa careless, merry smile. "What am 
I? An illegitimate son!" He suddenlyblushed crimson, and it was plain that he ha
d made a great effort to saythis. "Without a name and without means... And it re
ally..." But he didnot say what "it really" was. "For the present I am free and 
am allright. Only I haven't the least idea what I am to do; I wanted toconsult y
ou seriously."Prince Andrew looked kindly at him, yet his glance--friendly andaf
fectionate as it was--expressed a sense of his own superiority."I am fond of you
, especially as you are the one live man among ourwhole set. Yes, you're all rig
ht! Choose what you will; it's all thesame. You'll be all right anywhere. But lo
ok here: give up visitingthose Kuragins and leading that sort of life. It suits 
you so badly--allthis debauchery, dissipation, and the rest of it!""What would y
ou have, my dear fellow?" answered Pierre, shrugging hisshoulders. "Women, my de
ar fellow; women!""I don't understand it," replied Prince Andrew. "Women who are
 comme ilfaut, that's a different matter; but the Kuragins' set of women, 'women
and wine' I don't understand!"Pierre was staying at Prince Vasili Kuragin's and 
sharing the dissipatedlife of his son Anatole, the son whom they were planning t
o reform bymarrying him to Prince Andrew's sister."Do you know?" said Pierre, as
 if suddenly struck by a happy thought,"seriously, I have long been thinking of 
it.... Leading such a life Ican't decide or think properly about anything. One's
 head aches, and onespends all one's money. He asked me for tonight, but I won't
 go.""You give me your word of honor not to go?""On my honor!"CHAPTER IXIt was p
ast one o'clock when Pierre left his friend. It was a cloudless,northern, summer
 night. Pierre took an open cab intending to drivestraight home. But the nearer 
he drew to the house the more he felt theimpossibility of going to sleep on such
 a night. It was light enough tosee a long way in the deserted street and it see
med more like morning orevening than night. On the way Pierre remembered that An
atole Kuraginwas expecting the usual set for cards that evening, after which the
rewas generally a drinking bout, finishing with visits of a kind Pierrewas very 
fond of."I should like to go to Kuragin's," thought he.But he immediately recall
ed his promise to Prince Andrew not to gothere. Then, as happens to people of we
ak character, he desired sopassionately once more to enjoy that dissipation he w
as so accustomed tothat he decided to go. The thought immediately occurred to hi
m that hispromise to Prince Andrew was of no account, because before he gave it 
hehad already promised Prince Anatole to come to his gathering; "besides,"though
t he, "all such 'words of honor' are conventional things with nodefinite meaning
, especially if one considers that by tomorrow one maybe dead, or something so e
xtraordinary may happen to one that honor anddishonor will be all the same!" Pie
rre often indulged in reflections ofthis sort, nullifying all his decisions and 
intentions. He went toKuragin's.Reaching the large house near the Horse Guards' 
barracks, in whichAnatole lived, Pierre entered the lighted porch, ascended the 
stairs,and went in at the open door. There was no one in the anteroom; emptybott
les, cloaks, and overshoes were lying about; there was a smell ofalcohol, and so
unds of voices and shouting in the distance.Cards and supper were over, but the 
visitors had not yet dispersed.Pierre threw off his cloak and entered the first 
room, in which were theremains of supper. A footman, thinking no one saw him, wa
s drinking onthe sly what was left in the glasses. From the third room came soun
ds oflaughter, the shouting of familiar voices, the growling of a bear, andgener
al commotion. Some eight or nine young men were crowding anxiouslyround an open 
window. Three others were romping with a young bear, onepulling him by the chain
 and trying to set him at the others."I bet a hundred on Stevens!" shouted one."
Mind, no holding on!" cried another."I bet on Dolokhov!" cried a third. "Kuragin
, you part our hands.""There, leave Bruin alone; here's a bet on.""At one draugh
t, or he loses!" shouted a fourth."Jacob, bring a bottle!" shouted the host, a t
all, handsome fellow whostood in the midst of the group, without a coat, and wit
h his fine linenshirt unfastened in front. "Wait a bit, you fellows.... Here is 
Petya!Good man!" cried he, addressing Pierre.Another voice, from a man of medium
 height with clear blue eyes,particularly striking among all these drunken voice
s by its sober ring,cried from the window: "Come here; part the bets!" This was 
Dolokhov, anofficer of the Semenov regiment, a notorious gambler and duelist, wh
owas living with Anatole. Pierre smiled, looking about him merrily."I don't unde
rstand. What's it all about?""Wait a bit, he is not drunk yet! A bottle here," s
aid Anatole, taking aglass from the table he went up to Pierre."First of all you
 must drink!"Pierre drank one glass after another, looking from under his brows 
atthe tipsy guests who were again crowding round the window, and listeningto the
ir chatter. Anatole kept on refilling Pierre's glass whileexplaining that Dolokh
ov was betting with Stevens, an English navalofficer, that he would drink a bott
le of rum sitting on the outer ledgeof the third floor window with his legs hang
ing out."Go on, you must drink it all," said Anatole, giving Pierre the lastglas
s, "or I won't let you go!""No, I won't," said Pierre, pushing Anatole aside, an
d he went up to thewindow.Dolokhov was holding the Englishman's hand and clearly
 and distinctlyrepeating the terms of the bet, addressing himself particularly t
oAnatole and Pierre.Dolokhov was of medium height, with curly hair and light-blu
e eyes. Hewas about twenty-five. Like all infantry officers he wore no mustache,
so that his mouth, the most striking feature of his face, was clearlyseen. The l
ines of that mouth were remarkably finely curved. The middleof the upper lip for
med a sharp wedge and closed firmly on the firmlower one, and something like two
 distinct smiles played continuallyround the two corners of the mouth; this, tog
ether with the resolute,insolent intelligence of his eyes, produced an effect wh
ich made itimpossible not to notice his face. Dolokhov was a man of small means 
andno connections. Yet, though Anatole spent tens of thousands of rubles,Dolokho
v lived with him and had placed himself on such a footing thatall who knew them,
 including Anatole himself, respected him more thanthey did Anatole. Dolokhov co
uld play all games and nearly always won.However much he drank, he never lost hi
s clearheadedness. Both Kuraginand Dolokhov were at that time notorious among th
e rakes and scapegracesof Petersburg.The bottle of rum was brought. The window f
rame which prevented anyonefrom sitting on the outer sill was being forced out b
y two footmen, whowere evidently flurried and intimidated by the directions and 
shouts ofthe gentlemen around.Anatole with his swaggering air strode up to the w
indow. He wanted tosmash something. Pushing away the footmen he tugged at the fr
ame, butcould not move it. He smashed a pane."You have a try, Hercules," said he
, turning to Pierre.Pierre seized the crossbeam, tugged, and wrenched the oak fr
ame out witha crash."Take it right out, or they'll think I'm holding on," said D
olokhov."Is the Englishman bragging?... Eh? Is it all right?" said Anatole."Firs
t-rate," said Pierre, looking at Dolokhov, who with a bottle of rumin his hand w
as approaching the window, from which the light of the sky,the dawn merging with
 the afterglow of sunset, was visible.Dolokhov, the bottle of rum still in his h
and, jumped onto the windowsill. "Listen!" cried he, standing there and addressi
ng those in theroom. All were silent."I bet fifty imperials"--he spoke French th
at the Englishman mightunderstand him, but he did not speak it very well--"I bet
 fiftyimperials... or do you wish to make it a hundred?" added he, addressingthe
 Englishman."No, fifty," replied the latter."All right. Fifty imperials... that 
I will drink a whole bottle of rumwithout taking it from my mouth, sitting outsi
de the window on thisspot" (he stooped and pointed to the sloping ledge outside 
the window)"and without holding on to anything. Is that right?""Quite right," sa
id the Englishman.Anatole turned to the Englishman and taking him by one of the 
buttons ofhis coat and looking down at him--the Englishman was short--beganrepea
ting the terms of the wager to him in English."Wait!" cried Dolokhov, hammering 
with the bottle on the window sill toattract attention. "Wait a bit, Kuragin. Li
sten! If anyone else does thesame, I will pay him a hundred imperials. Do you un
derstand?"The Englishman nodded, but gave no indication whether he intended toac
cept this challenge or not. Anatole did not release him, and though hekept noddi
ng to show that he understood, Anatole went on translatingDolokhov's words into 
English. A thin young lad, an hussar of the LifeGuards, who had been losing that
 evening, climbed on the window sill,leaned over, and looked down."Oh! Oh! Oh!" 
he muttered, looking down from the window at the stones ofthe pavement."Shut up!
" cried Dolokhov, pushing him away from the window. The ladjumped awkwardly back
 into the room, tripping over his spurs.Placing the bottle on the window sill wh
ere he could reach it easily,Dolokhov climbed carefully and slowly through the w
indow and lowered hislegs. Pressing against both sides of the window, he adjuste
d himself onhis seat, lowered his hands, moved a little to the right and then to
 theleft, and took up the bottle. Anatole brought two candles and placedthem on 
the window sill, though it was already quite light. Dolokhov'sback in his white 
shirt, and his curly head, were lit up from bothsides. Everyone crowded to the w
indow, the Englishman in front. Pierrestood smiling but silent. One man, older t
han the others present,suddenly pushed forward with a scared and angry look and 
wanted to seizehold of Dolokhov's shirt."I say, this is folly! He'll be killed,"
 said this more sensible man.Anatole stopped him."Don't touch him! You'll startl
e him and then he'll be killed. Eh?...What then?... Eh?"Dolokhov turned round an
d, again holding on with both hands, arrangedhimself on his seat."If anyone come
s meddling again," said he, emitting the words separatelythrough his thin compre
ssed lips, "I will throw him down there. Nowthen!"Saying this he again turned ro
und, dropped his hands, took the bottleand lifted it to his lips, threw back his
 head, and raised his free handto balance himself. One of the footmen who had st
ooped to pick up somebroken glass remained in that position without taking his e
yes from thewindow and from Dolokhov's back. Anatole stood erect with staring ey
es.The Englishman looked on sideways, pursing up his lips. The man who hadwished
 to stop the affair ran to a corner of the room and threw himselfon a sofa with 
his face to the wall. Pierre hid his face, from which afaint smile forgot to fad
e though his features now expressed horror andfear. All were still. Pierre took 
his hands from his eyes. Dolokhovstill sat in the same position, only his head w
as thrown further backtill his curly hair touched his shirt collar, and the hand
 holding thebottle was lifted higher and higher and trembled with the effort. Th
ebottle was emptying perceptibly and rising still higher and his headtilting yet
 further back. "Why is it so long?" thought Pierre. It seemedto him that more th
an half an hour had elapsed. Suddenly Dolokhov made abackward movement with his 
spine, and his arm trembled nervously; thiswas sufficient to cause his whole bod
y to slip as he sat on the slopingledge. As he began slipping down, his head and
 arm wavered still morewith the strain. One hand moved as if to clutch the windo
w sill, butrefrained from touching it. Pierre again covered his eyes and thought
 hewould never open them again. Suddenly he was aware of a stir all around.He lo
oked up: Dolokhov was standing on the window sill, with a pale butradiant face."
It's empty."He threw the bottle to the Englishman, who caught it neatly. Dolokho
vjumped down. He smelt strongly of rum."Well done!... Fine fellow!... There's a 
bet for you!... Devil takeyou!" came from different sides.The Englishman took ou
t his purse and began counting out the money.Dolokhov stood frowning and did not
 speak. Pierre jumped upon the windowsill."Gentlemen, who wishes to bet with me?
 I'll do the same thing!" hesuddenly cried. "Even without a bet, there! Tell the
m to bring me abottle. I'll do it.... Bring a bottle!""Let him do it, let him do
 it," said Dolokhov, smiling."What next? Have you gone mad?... No one would let 
you!... Why, you gogiddy even on a staircase," exclaimed several voices."I'll dr
ink it! Let's have a bottle of rum!" shouted Pierre, banging thetable with a det
ermined and drunken gesture and preparing to climb outof the window.They seized 
him by his arms; but he was so strong that everyone whotouched him was sent flyi
ng."No, you'll never manage him that way," said Anatole. "Wait a bit andI'll get
 round him.... Listen! I'll take your bet tomorrow, but now weare all going to -
---'s.""Come on then," cried Pierre. "Come on!... And we'll take Bruin withus."A
nd he caught the bear, took it in his arms, lifted it from the ground,and began 
dancing round the room with it.CHAPTER XPrince Vasili kept the promise he had gi
ven to Princess Drubetskaya whohad spoken to him on behalf of her only son Boris
 on the evening of AnnaPavlovna's soiree. The matter was mentioned to the Empero
r, an exceptionmade, and Boris transferred into the regiment of Semenov Guards w
ith therank of cornet. He received, however, no appointment to Kutuzov's staffde
spite all Anna Mikhaylovna's endeavors and entreaties. Soon after AnnaPavlovna's
 reception Anna Mikhaylovna returned to Moscow and wentstraight to her rich rela
tions, the Rostovs, with whom she stayed whenin the town and where her darling B
ory, who had only just entered aregiment of the line and was being at once trans
ferred to the Guards asa cornet, had been educated from childhood and lived for 
years at atime. The Guards had already left Petersburg on the tenth of August, a
ndher son, who had remained in Moscow for his equipment, was to join themon the 
march to Radzivilov.It was St. Natalia's day and the name day of two of the Rost
ovs--themother and the youngest daughter--both named Nataly. Ever since themorni
ng, carriages with six horses had been coming and goingcontinually, bringing vis
itors to the Countess Rostova's big house onthe Povarskaya, so well known to all
 Moscow. The countess herself andher handsome eldest daughter were in the drawin
g-room with the visitorswho came to congratulate, and who constantly succeeded o
ne another inrelays.The countess was a woman of about forty-five, with a thin Or
iental typeof face, evidently worn out with childbearing--she had had twelve. Al
anguor of motion and speech, resulting from weakness, gave her adistinguished ai
r which inspired respect. Princess Anna MikhaylovnaDrubetskaya, who as a member 
of the household was also seated in thedrawing room, helped to receive and enter
tain the visitors. The youngpeople were in one of the inner rooms, not consideri
ng it necessary totake part in receiving the visitors. The count met the guests 
and sawthem off, inviting them all to dinner."I am very, very grateful to you, m
on cher," or "ma chere"--he calledeveryone without exception and without the sli
ghtest variation in histone, "my dear," whether they were above or below him in 
rank--"I thankyou for myself and for our two dear ones whose name day we are kee
ping.But mind you come to dinner or I shall be offended, ma chere! On behalfof t
he whole family I beg you to come, mon cher!" These words herepeated to everyone
 without exception or variation, and with the sameexpression on his full, cheerf
ul, clean-shaven face, the same firmpressure of the hand and the same quick, rep
eated bows. As soon as hehad seen a visitor off he returned to one of those who 
were still in thedrawing room, drew a chair toward him or her, and jauntily spre
ading outhis legs and putting his hands on his knees with the air of a man whoen
joys life and knows how to live, he swayed to and fro with dignity,offered surmi
ses about the weather, or touched on questions of health,sometimes in Russian an
d sometimes in very bad but self-confidentFrench; then again, like a man weary b
ut unflinching in the fulfillmentof duty, he rose to see some visitors off and, 
stroking his scanty grayhairs over his bald patch, also asked them to dinner. So
metimes on hisway back from the anteroom he would pass through the conservatory 
andpantry into the large marble dining hall, where tables were being setout for 
eighty people; and looking at the footmen, who were bringing insilver and china,
 moving tables, and unfolding damask table linen, hewould call Dmitri Vasilevich
, a man of good family and the manager ofall his affairs, and while looking with
 pleasure at the enormous tablewould say: "Well, Dmitri, you'll see that things 
are all as they shouldbe? That's right! The great thing is the serving, that's i
t." And with acomplacent sigh he would return to the drawing room."Marya Lvovna 
Karagina and her daughter!" announced the countess'gigantic footman in his bass 
voice, entering the drawing room. Thecountess reflected a moment and took a pinc
h from a gold snuffbox withher husband's portrait on it."I'm quite worn out by t
hese callers. However, I'll see her and no more.She is so affected. Ask her in,"
 she said to the footman in a sad voice,as if saying: "Very well, finish me off.
"A tall, stout, and proud-looking woman, with a round-faced smilingdaughter, ent
ered the drawing room, their dresses rustling."Dear Countess, what an age... She
 has been laid up, poor child... atthe Razumovski's ball... and Countess Apraksi
na... I was sodelighted..." came the sounds of animated feminine voices, interru
ptingone another and mingling with the rustling of dresses and the scrapingof ch
airs. Then one of those conversations began which last out until,at the first pa
use, the guests rise with a rustle of dresses and say, "Iam so delighted... Mamm
a's health... and Countess Apraksina..." andthen, again rustling, pass into the 
anteroom, put on cloaks or mantles,and drive away. The conversation was on the c
hief topic of the day: theillness of the wealthy and celebrated beau of Catherin
e's day, CountBezukhov, and about his illegitimate son Pierre, the one who had b
ehavedso improperly at Anna Pavlovna's reception."I am so sorry for the poor cou
nt," said the visitor. "He is in such badhealth, and now this vexation about his
 son is enough to kill him!""What is that?" asked the countess as if she did not
 know what thevisitor alluded to, though she had already heard about the cause o
fCount Bezukhov's distress some fifteen times."That's what comes of a modern edu
cation," exclaimed the visitor. "Itseems that while he was abroad this young man
 was allowed to do as heliked, now in Petersburg I hear he has been doing such t
errible thingsthat he has been expelled by the police.""You don't say so!" repli
ed the countess."He chose his friends badly," interposed Anna Mikhaylovna. "Prin
ceVasili's son, he, and a certain Dolokhov have, it is said, been up toheaven on
ly knows what! And they have had to suffer for it. Dolokhov hasbeen degraded to 
the ranks and Bezukhov's son sent back to Moscow.Anatole Kuragin's father manage
d somehow to get his son's affair hushedup, but even he was ordered out of Peter
sburg.""But what have they been up to?" asked the countess."They are regular bri
gands, especially Dolokhov," replied the visitor."He is a son of Marya Ivanovna 
Dolokhova, such a worthy woman, butthere, just fancy! Those three got hold of a 
bear somewhere, put it in acarriage, and set off with it to visit some actresses
! The police triedto interfere, and what did the young men do? They tied a polic
eman andthe bear back to back and put the bear into the Moyka Canal. And therewa
s the bear swimming about with the policeman on his back!""What a nice figure th
e policeman must have cut, my dear!" shouted thecount, dying with laughter."Oh, 
how dreadful! How can you laugh at it, Count?"Yet the ladies themselves could no
t help laughing."It was all they could do to rescue the poor man," continued the
visitor. "And to think it is Cyril Vladimirovich Bezukhov's son whoamuses himsel
f in this sensible manner! And he was said to be so welleducated and clever. Thi
s is all that his foreign education has done forhim! I hope that here in Moscow 
no one will receive him, in spite of hismoney. They wanted to introduce him to m
e, but I quite declined: I havemy daughters to consider.""Why do you say this yo
ung man is so rich?" asked the countess, turningaway from the girls, who at once
 assumed an air of inattention. "Hischildren are all illegitimate. I think Pierr
e also is illegitimate."The visitor made a gesture with her hand."I should think
 he has a score of them."Princess Anna Mikhaylovna intervened in the conversatio
n, evidentlywishing to show her connections and knowledge of what went on insoci
ety."The fact of the matter is," said she significantly, and also in a halfwhisp
er, "everyone knows Count Cyril's reputation.... He has lost countof his childre
n, but this Pierre was his favorite.""How handsome the old man still was only a 
year ago!" remarked thecountess. "I have never seen a handsomer man.""He is very
 much altered now," said Anna Mikhaylovna. "Well, as I wassaying, Prince Vasili 
is the next heir through his wife, but the countis very fond of Pierre, looked a
fter his education, and wrote to theEmperor about him; so that in the case of hi
s death--and he is so illthat he may die at any moment, and Dr. Lorrain has come
 from Petersburg--no one knows who will inherit his immense fortune, Pierre or P
rinceVasili. Forty thousand serfs and millions of rubles! I know it all verywell
 for Prince Vasili told me himself. Besides, Cyril Vladimirovich ismy mother's s
econd cousin. He's also my Bory's godfather," she added, asif she attached no im
portance at all to the fact."Prince Vasili arrived in Moscow yesterday. I hear h
e has come on someinspection business," remarked the visitor."Yes, but between o
urselves," said the princess, "that is a pretext. Thefact is he has come to see 
Count Cyril Vladimirovich, hearing how ill heis.""But do you know, my dear, that
 was a capital joke," said the count; andseeing that the elder visitor was not l
istening, he turned to the youngladies. "I can just imagine what a funny figure 
that policeman cut!"And as he waved his arms to impersonate the policeman, his p
ortly formagain shook with a deep ringing laugh, the laugh of one who always eat
swell and, in particular, drinks well. "So do come and dine with us!" hesaid.CHA
PTER XISilence ensued. The countess looked at her callers, smiling affably, butn
ot concealing the fact that she would not be distressed if they nowrose and took
 their leave. The visitor's daughter was already smoothingdown her dress with an
 inquiring look at her mother, when suddenly fromthe next room were heard the fo
otsteps of boys and girls running to thedoor and the noise of a chair falling ov
er, and a girl of thirteen,hiding something in the folds of her short muslin fro
ck, darted in andstopped short in the middle of the room. It was evident that sh
e had notintended her flight to bring her so far. Behind her in the doorwayappea
red a student with a crimson coat collar, an officer of the Guards,a girl of fif
teen, and a plump rosy-faced boy in a short jacket.The count jumped up and, sway
ing from side to side, spread his arms wideand threw them round the little girl 
who had run in."Ah, here she is!" he exclaimed laughing. "My pet, whose name day
 it is.My dear pet!""Ma chere, there is a time for everything," said the countes
s withfeigned severity. "You spoil her, Ilya," she added, turning to herhusband.
"How do you do, my dear? I wish you many happy returns of your nameday," said th
e visitor. "What a charming child," she added, addressingthe mother.This black-e
yed, wide-mouthed girl, not pretty but full of life--withchildish bare shoulders
 which after her run heaved and shook her bodice,with black curls tossed backwar
d, thin bare arms, little legs in lace-frilled drawers, and feet in low slippers
--was just at that charming agewhen a girl is no longer a child, though the chil
d is not yet a youngwoman. Escaping from her father she ran to hide her flushed 
face in thelace of her mother's mantilla--not paying the least attention to hers
evere remark--and began to laugh. She laughed, and in fragmentarysentences tried
 to explain about a doll which she produced from thefolds of her frock."Do you s
ee?... My doll... Mimi... You see..." was all Natasha managedto utter (to her ev
erything seemed funny). She leaned against her motherand burst into such a loud,
 ringing fit of laughter that even the primvisitor could not help joining in."No
w then, go away and take your monstrosity with you," said the mother,pushing awa
y her daughter with pretended sternness, and turning to thevisitor she added: "S
he is my youngest girl."Natasha, raising her face for a moment from her mother's
 mantilla,glanced up at her through tears of laughter, and again hid her face.Th
e visitor, compelled to look on at this family scene, thought itnecessary to tak
e some part in it."Tell me, my dear," said she to Natasha, "is Mimi a relation o
f yours? Adaughter, I suppose?"Natasha did not like the visitor's tone of condes
cension to childishthings. She did not reply, but looked at her seriously.Meanwh
ile the younger generation: Boris, the officer, Anna Mikhaylovna'sson; Nicholas,
 the undergraduate, the count's eldest son; Sonya, thecount's fifteen-year-old n
iece, and little Petya, his youngest boy, hadall settled down in the drawing roo
m and were obviously trying torestrain within the bounds of decorum the exciteme
nt and mirth thatshone in all their faces. Evidently in the back rooms, from whi
ch theyhad dashed out so impetuously, the conversation had been more amusingthan
 the drawing-room talk of society scandals, the weather, andCountess Apraksina. 
Now and then they glanced at one another, hardlyable to suppress their laughter.
The two young men, the student and the officer, friends from childhood,were of t
he same age and both handsome fellows, though not alike. Boriswas tall and fair,
 and his calm and handsome face had regular, delicatefeatures. Nicholas was shor
t with curly hair and an open expression.Dark hairs were already showing on his 
upper lip, and his whole faceexpressed impetuosity and enthusiasm. Nicholas blus
hed when he enteredthe drawing room. He evidently tried to find something to say
, butfailed. Boris on the contrary at once found his footing, and relatedquietly
 and humorously how he had known that doll Mimi when she wasstill quite a young 
lady, before her nose was broken; how she had agedduring the five years he had k
nown her, and how her head had crackedright across the skull. Having said this h
e glanced at Natasha. Sheturned away from him and glanced at her younger brother
, who wasscrewing up his eyes and shaking with suppressed laughter, and unable t
ocontrol herself any longer, she jumped up and rushed from the room asfast as he
r nimble little feet would carry her. Boris did not laugh."You were meaning to g
o out, weren't you, Mamma? Do you want thecarriage?" he asked his mother with a 
smile."Yes, yes, go and tell them to get it ready," she answered, returninghis s
mile.Boris quietly left the room and went in search of Natasha. The plump boyran
 after them angrily, as if vexed that their program had beendisturbed.CHAPTER XI
IThe only young people remaining in the drawing room, not counting theyoung lady
 visitor and the countess' eldest daughter (who was four yearsolder than her sis
ter and behaved already like a grown-up person), wereNicholas and Sonya, the nie
ce. Sonya was a slender little brunette witha tender look in her eyes which were
 veiled by long lashes, thick blackplaits coiling twice round her head, and a ta
wny tint in her complexionand especially in the color of her slender but gracefu
l and musculararms and neck. By the grace of her movements, by the softness andf
lexibility of her small limbs, and by a certain coyness and reserve ofmanner, sh
e reminded one of a pretty, half-grown kitten which promisesto become a beautifu
l little cat. She evidently considered it proper toshow an interest in the gener
al conversation by smiling, but in spite ofherself her eyes under their thick lo
ng lashes watched her cousin whowas going to join the army, with such passionate
 girlish adoration thather smile could not for a single instant impose upon anyo
ne, and it wasclear that the kitten had settled down only to spring up with more
energy and again play with her cousin as soon as they too could, likeNatasha and
 Boris, escape from the drawing room."Ah yes, my dear," said the count, addressi
ng the visitor and pointingto Nicholas, "his friend Boris has become an officer,
 and so forfriendship's sake he is leaving the university and me, his old father
,and entering the military service, my dear. And there was a place andeverything
 waiting for him in the Archives Department! Isn't thatfriendship?" remarked the
 count in an inquiring tone."But they say that war has been declared," replied t
he visitor."They've been saying so a long while," said the count, "and they'll s
ayso again and again, and that will be the end of it. My dear, there'sfriendship
 for you," he repeated. "He's joining the hussars."The visitor, not knowing what
 to say, shook her head."It's not at all from friendship," declared Nicholas, fl
aring up andturning away as if from a shameful aspersion. "It is not from friend
shipat all; I simply feel that the army is my vocation."He glanced at his cousin
 and the young lady visitor; and they were bothregarding him with a smile of app
robation."Schubert, the colonel of the Pavlograd Hussars, is dining with ustoday
. He has been here on leave and is taking Nicholas back with him.It can't be hel
ped!" said the count, shrugging his shoulders andspeaking playfully of a matter 
that evidently distressed him."I have already told you, Papa," said his son, "th
at if you don't wishto let me go, I'll stay. But I know I am no use anywhere exc
ept in thearmy; I am not a diplomat or a government clerk.--I don't know how toh
ide what I feel." As he spoke he kept glancing with the flirtatiousnessof a hand
some youth at Sonya and the young lady visitor.The little kitten, feasting her e
yes on him, seemed ready at any momentto start her gambols again and display her
 kittenish nature."All right, all right!" said the old count. "He always flares 
up! ThisBuonaparte has turned all their heads; they all think of how he rosefrom
 an ensign and became Emperor. Well, well, God grant it," he added,not noticing 
his visitor's sarcastic smile.The elders began talking about Bonaparte. Julie Ka
ragina turned to youngRostov."What a pity you weren't at the Arkharovs' on Thurs
day. It was so dullwithout you," said she, giving him a tender smile.The young m
an, flattered, sat down nearer to her with a coquettishsmile, and engaged the sm
iling Julie in a confidential conversationwithout at all noticing that his invol
untary smile had stabbed the heartof Sonya, who blushed and smiled unnaturally. 
In the midst of his talkhe glanced round at her. She gave him a passionately ang
ry glance, andhardly able to restrain her tears and maintain the artificial smil
e onher lips, she got up and left the room. All Nicholas' animationvanished. He 
waited for the first pause in the conversation, and thenwith a distressed face l
eft the room to find Sonya."How plainly all these young people wear their hearts
 on their sleeves!"said Anna Mikhaylovna, pointing to Nicholas as he went out. "
Cousinage--dangereux voisinage;" * she added.* Cousinhood is a dangerous neighbo
rhood."Yes," said the countess when the brightness these young people hadbrought
 into the room had vanished; and as if answering a question noone had put but wh
ich was always in her mind, "and how much suffering,how much anxiety one has had
 to go through that we might rejoice in themnow! And yet really the anxiety is g
reater now than the joy. One isalways, always anxious! Especially just at this a
ge, so dangerous bothfor girls and boys.""It all depends on the bringing up," re
marked the visitor."Yes, you're quite right," continued the countess. "Till now 
I havealways, thank God, been my children's friend and had their fullconfidence,
" said she, repeating the mistake of so many parents whoimagine that their child
ren have no secrets from them. "I know I shallalways be my daughters' first conf
idante, and that if Nicholas, with hisimpulsive nature, does get into mischief (
a boy can't help it), he willall the same never be like those Petersburg young m
en.""Yes, they are splendid, splendid youngsters," chimed in the count, whoalway
s solved questions that seemed to him perplexing by deciding thateverything was 
splendid. "Just fancy: wants to be an hussar. What's oneto do, my dear?""What a 
charming creature your younger girl is," said the visitor; "alittle volcano!""Ye
s, a regular volcano," said the count. "Takes after me! And what avoice she has;
 though she's my daughter, I tell the truth when I sayshe'll be a singer, a seco
nd Salomoni! We have engaged an Italian togive her lessons.""Isn't she too young
? I have heard that it harms the voice to train itat that age.""Oh no, not at al
l too young!" replied the count. "Why, our mothers usedto be married at twelve o
r thirteen.""And she's in love with Boris already. Just fancy!" said the countes
swith a gentle smile, looking at Boris and went on, evidently concernedwith a th
ought that always occupied her: "Now you see if I were to besevere with her and 
to forbid it... goodness knows what they might be upto on the sly" (she meant th
at they would be kissing), "but as it is, Iknow every word she utters. She will 
come running to me of her ownaccord in the evening and tell me everything. Perha
ps I spoil her, butreally that seems the best plan. With her elder sister I was 
stricter.""Yes, I was brought up quite differently," remarked the handsome elder
daughter, Countess Vera, with a smile.But the smile did not enhance Vera's beaut
y as smiles generally do; onthe contrary it gave her an unnatural, and therefore
 unpleasant,expression. Vera was good-looking, not at all stupid, quick at learn
ing,was well-brought up, and had a pleasant voice; what she said was trueand app
ropriate, yet, strange to say, everyone--the visitors andcountess alike--turned 
to look at her as if wondering why she had saidit, and they all felt awkward."Pe
ople are always too clever with their eldest children and try to makesomething e
xceptional of them," said the visitor."What's the good of denying it, my dear? O
ur dear countess was tooclever with Vera," said the count. "Well, what of that? 
She's turned outsplendidly all the same," he added, winking at Vera.The guests g
ot up and took their leave, promising to return to dinner."What manners! I thoug
ht they would never go," said the countess, whenshe had seen her guests out.CHAP
TER XIIIWhen Natasha ran out of the drawing room she only went as far as thecons
ervatory. There she paused and stood listening to the conversationin the drawing
 room, waiting for Boris to come out. She was alreadygrowing impatient, and stam
ped her foot, ready to cry at his not comingat once, when she heard the young ma
n's discreet steps approachingneither quickly nor slowly. At this Natasha dashed
 swiftly among theflower tubs and hid there.Boris paused in the middle of the ro
om, looked round, brushed a littledust from the sleeve of his uniform, and going
 up to a mirror examinedhis handsome face. Natasha, very still, peered out from 
her ambush,waiting to see what he would do. He stood a little while before thegl
ass, smiled, and walked toward the other door. Natasha was about tocall him but 
changed her mind. "Let him look for me," thought she.Hardly had Boris gone than 
Sonya, flushed, in tears, and mutteringangrily, came in at the other door. Natas
ha checked her first impulse torun out to her, and remained in her hiding place,
 watching--as under aninvisible cap--to see what went on in the world. She was e
xperiencing anew and peculiar pleasure. Sonya, muttering to herself, kept lookin
ground toward the drawing-room door. It opened and Nicholas came in."Sonya, what
 is the matter with you? How can you?" said he, running upto her."It's nothing, 
nothing; leave me alone!" sobbed Sonya."Ah, I know what it is.""Well, if you do,
 so much the better, and you can go back to her!""So-o-onya! Look here! How can 
you torture me and yourself like that,for a mere fancy?" said Nicholas taking he
r hand.Sonya did not pull it away, and left off crying. Natasha, not stirringand
 scarcely breathing, watched from her ambush with sparkling eyes."What will happ
en now?" thought she."Sonya! What is anyone in the world to me? You alone are ev
erything!"said Nicholas. "And I will prove it to you.""I don't like you to talk 
like that.""Well, then, I won't; only forgive me, Sonya!" He drew her to him and
kissed her."Oh, how nice," thought Natasha; and when Sonya and Nicholas had gone
out of the conservatory she followed and called Boris to her."Boris, come here,"
 said she with a sly and significant look. "I havesomething to tell you. Here, h
ere!" and she led him into theconservatory to the place among the tubs where she
 had been hiding.Boris followed her, smiling."What is the something?" asked he.S
he grew confused, glanced round, and, seeing the doll she had throwndown on one 
of the tubs, picked it up."Kiss the doll," said she.Boris looked attentively and
 kindly at her eager face, but did notreply."Don't you want to? Well, then, come
 here," said she, and went furtherin among the plants and threw down the doll. "
Closer, closer!" shewhispered.She caught the young officer by his cuffs, and a l
ook of solemnity andfear appeared on her flushed face."And me? Would you like to
 kiss me?" she whispered almost inaudibly,glancing up at him from under her brow
s, smiling, and almost crying fromexcitement.Boris blushed."How funny you are!" 
he said, bending down to her and blushing stillmore, but he waited and did nothi
ng.Suddenly she jumped up onto a tub to be higher than he, embraced him sothat b
oth her slender bare arms clasped him above his neck, and, tossingback her hair,
 kissed him full on the lips.Then she slipped down among the flowerpots on the o
ther side of the tubsand stood, hanging her head."Natasha," he said, "you know t
hat I love you, but...""You are in love with me?" Natasha broke in."Yes, I am, b
ut please don't let us do like that.... In another fouryears... then I will ask 
for your hand."Natasha considered."Thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, sixteen," she co
unted on her slenderlittle fingers. "All right! Then it's settled?"A smile of jo
y and satisfaction lit up her eager face."Settled!" replied Boris."Forever?" sai
d the little girl. "Till death itself?"She took his arm and with a happy face we
nt with him into the adjoiningsitting room.CHAPTER XIVAfter receiving her visito
rs, the countess was so tired that she gaveorders to admit no more, but the port
er was told to be sure to invite todinner all who came "to congratulate." The co
untess wished to have atete-a-tete talk with the friend of her childhood, Prince
ss AnnaMikhaylovna, whom she had not seen properly since she returned fromPeters
burg. Anna Mikhaylovna, with her tear-worn but pleasant face, drewher chair near
er to that of the countess."With you I will be quite frank," said Anna Mikhaylov
na. "There are notmany left of us old friends! That's why I so value your friend
ship."Anna Mikhaylovna looked at Vera and paused. The countess pressed herfriend
's hand."Vera," she said to her eldest daughter who was evidently not afavorite,
 "how is it you have so little tact? Don't you see you are notwanted here? Go to
 the other girls, or..."The handsome Vera smiled contemptuously but did not seem
 at all hurt."If you had told me sooner, Mamma, I would have gone," she replied 
asshe rose to go to her own room.But as she passed the sitting room she noticed 
two couples sitting, onepair at each window. She stopped and smiled scornfully. 
Sonya wassitting close to Nicholas who was copying out some verses for her, thef
irst he had ever written. Boris and Natasha were at the other windowand ceased t
alking when Vera entered. Sonya and Natasha looked at Verawith guilty, happy fac
es.It was pleasant and touching to see these little girls in love; butapparently
 the sight of them roused no pleasant feeling in Vera."How often have I asked yo
u not to take my things?" she said. "You havea room of your own," and she took t
he inkstand from Nicholas."In a minute, in a minute," he said, dipping his pen."
You always manage to do things at the wrong time," continued Vera. "Youcame rush
ing into the drawing room so that everyone felt ashamed ofyou."Though what she s
aid was quite just, perhaps for that very reason no onereplied, and the four sim
ply looked at one another. She lingered in theroom with the inkstand in her hand
."And at your age what secrets can there be between Natasha and Boris, orbetween
 you two? It's all nonsense!""Now, Vera, what does it matter to you?" said Natas
ha in defense,speaking very gently.She seemed that day to be more than ever kind
 and affectionate toeveryone."Very silly," said Vera. "I am ashamed of you. Secr
ets indeed!""All have secrets of their own," answered Natasha, getting warmer. "
Wedon't interfere with you and Berg.""I should think not," said Vera, "because t
here can never be anythingwrong in my behavior. But I'll just tell Mamma how you
 are behaving withBoris.""Natalya Ilynichna behaves very well to me," remarked B
oris. "I havenothing to complain of.""Don't, Boris! You are such a diplomat that
 it is really tiresome," saidNatasha in a mortified voice that trembled slightly
. (She used the word"diplomat," which was just then much in vogue among the chil
dren, in thespecial sense they attached to it.) "Why does she bother me?" And sh
eadded, turning to Vera, "You'll never understand it, because you'venever loved 
anyone. You have no heart! You are a Madame de Genlis andnothing more" (this nic
kname, bestowed on Vera by Nicholas, wasconsidered very stinging), "and your gre
atest pleasure is to beunpleasant to people! Go and flirt with Berg as much as y
ou please," shefinished quickly."I shall at any rate not run after a young man b
efore visitors...""Well, now you've done what you wanted," put in Nicholas--"sai
dunpleasant things to everyone and upset them. Let's go to the nursery."All four
, like a flock of scared birds, got up and left the room."The unpleasant things 
were said to me," remarked Vera, "I said none toanyone.""Madame de Genlis! Madam
e de Genlis!" shouted laughing voices throughthe door.The handsome Vera, who pro
duced such an irritating and unpleasant effecton everyone, smiled and, evidently
 unmoved by what had been said to her,went to the looking glass and arranged her
 hair and scarf. Looking ather own handsome face she seemed to become still cold
er and calmer.In the drawing room the conversation was still going on."Ah, my de
ar," said the countess, "my life is not all roses either.Don't I know that at th
e rate we are living our means won't last long?It's all the Club and his easygoi
ng nature. Even in the country do weget any rest? Theatricals, hunting, and heav
en knows what besides! Butdon't let's talk about me; tell me how you managed eve
rything. I oftenwonder at you, Annette--how at your age you can rush off alone i
n acarriage to Moscow, to Petersburg, to those ministers and great people,and kn
ow how to deal with them all! It's quite astonishing. How did youget things sett
led? I couldn't possibly do it.""Ah, my love," answered Anna Mikhaylovna, "God g
rant you never know whatit is to be left a widow without means and with a son yo
u love todistraction! One learns many things then," she added with a certainprid
e. "That lawsuit taught me much. When I want to see one of those bigpeople I wri
te a note: 'Princess So-and-So desires an interview with Soand-So,' and then I t
ake a cab and go myself two, three, or four times--till I get what I want. I don
't mind what they think of me.""Well, and to whom did you apply about Bory?" ask
ed the countess. "Yousee yours is already an officer in the Guards, while my Nic
holas isgoing as a cadet. There's no one to interest himself for him. To whomdid
 you apply?""To Prince Vasili. He was so kind. He at once agreed to everything, 
andput the matter before the Emperor," said Princess Anna Mikhaylovnaenthusiasti
cally, quite forgetting all the humiliation she had enduredto gain her end."Has 
Prince Vasili aged much?" asked the countess. "I have not seen himsince we acted
 together at the Rumyantsovs' theatricals. I expect he hasforgotten me. He paid 
me attentions in those days," said the countess,with a smile."He is just the sam
e as ever," replied Anna Mikhaylovna, "overflowingwith amiability. His position 
has not turned his head at all. He said tome, 'I am sorry I can do so little for
 you, dear Princess. I am at yourcommand.' Yes, he is a fine fellow and a very k
ind relation. But,Nataly, you know my love for my son: I would do anything for h
ishappiness! And my affairs are in such a bad way that my position is nowa terri
ble one," continued Anna Mikhaylovna, sadly, dropping her voice."My wretched law
suit takes all I have and makes no progress. Would youbelieve it, I have literal
ly not a penny and don't know how to equipBoris." She took out her handkerchief 
and began to cry. "I need fivehundred rubles, and have only one twenty-five-rubl
e note. I am in such astate.... My only hope now is in Count Cyril Vladimirovich
 Bezukhov. Ifhe will not assist his godson--you know he is Bory's godfather--and
allow him something for his maintenance, all my trouble will have beenthrown awa
y.... I shall not be able to equip him."The countess' eyes filled with tears and
 she pondered in silence."I often think, though, perhaps it's a sin," said the p
rincess, "thathere lives Count Cyril Vladimirovich Bezukhov so rich, all alone..
. thattremendous fortune... and what is his life worth? It's a burden to him,and
 Bory's life is only just beginning....""Surely he will leave something to Boris
," said the countess."Heaven only knows, my dear! These rich grandees are so sel
fish. Still,I will take Boris and go to see him at once, and I shall speak to hi
mstraight out. Let people think what they will of me, it's really all thesame to
 me when my son's fate is at stake." The princess rose. "It's nowtwo o'clock and
 you dine at four. There will just be time."And like a practical Petersburg lady
 who knows how to make the most oftime, Anna Mikhaylovna sent someone to call he
r son, and went into theanteroom with him."Good-bye, my dear," said she to the c
ountess who saw her to the door,and added in a whisper so that her son should no
t hear, "Wish me goodluck.""Are you going to Count Cyril Vladimirovich, my dear?
" said the countcoming out from the dining hall into the anteroom, and he added:
 "If heis better, ask Pierre to dine with us. He has been to the house, youknow,
 and danced with the children. Be sure to invite him, my dear. Wewill see how Ta
ras distinguishes himself today. He says Count Orlovnever gave such a dinner as 
ours will be!"CHAPTER XV"My dear Boris," said Princess Anna Mikhaylovna to her s
on as CountessRostova's carriage in which they were seated drove over the strawc
overed street and turned into the wide courtyard of Count CyrilVladimirovich Bez
ukhov's house. "My dear Boris," said the mother,drawing her hand from beneath he
r old mantle and laying it timidly andtenderly on her son's arm, "be affectionat
e and attentive to him. CountCyril Vladimirovich is your godfather after all, yo
ur future depends onhim. Remember that, my dear, and be nice to him, as you so w
ell know howto be.""If only I knew that anything besides humiliation would come 
of it..."answered her son coldly. "But I have promised and will do it for yoursa
ke."Although the hall porter saw someone's carriage standing at theentrance, aft
er scrutinizing the mother and son (who without asking tobe announced had passed
 straight through the glass porch between therows of statues in niches) and look
ing significantly at the lady's oldcloak, he asked whether they wanted the count
 or the princesses, and,hearing that they wished to see the count, said his exce
llency was worsetoday, and that his excellency was not receiving anyone."We may 
as well go back," said the son in French."My dear!" exclaimed his mother implori
ngly, again laying her hand onhis arm as if that touch might soothe or rouse him
.Boris said no more, but looked inquiringly at his mother without takingoff his 
cloak."My friend," said Anna Mikhaylovna in gentle tones, addressing the hallpor
ter, "I know Count Cyril Vladimirovich is very ill... that's why Ihave come... I
 am a relation. I shall not disturb him, my friend... Ionly need see Prince Vasi
li Sergeevich: he is staying here, is he not?Please announce me."The hall porter
 sullenly pulled a bell that rang upstairs, and turnedaway."Princess Drubetskaya
 to see Prince Vasili Sergeevich," he called to afootman dressed in knee breeche
s, shoes, and a swallow-tail coat, whoran downstairs and looked over from the ha
lfway landing.The mother smoothed the folds of her dyed silk dress before a larg
eVenetian mirror in the wall, and in her trodden-down shoes brisklyascended the 
carpeted stairs."My dear," she said to her son, once more stimulating him by a t
ouch,"you promised me!"The son, lowering his eyes, followed her quietly.They ent
ered the large hall, from which one of the doors led to theapartments assigned t
o Prince Vasili.Just as the mother and son, having reached the middle of the hal
l, wereabout to ask their way of an elderly footman who had sprung up as theyent
ered, the bronze handle of one of the doors turned and Prince Vasilicame out--we
aring a velvet coat with a single star on his breast, as washis custom when at h
ome--taking leave of a good-looking, dark-hairedman. This was the celebrated Pet
ersburg doctor, Lorrain."Then it is certain?" said the prince."Prince, humanum e
st errare, * but..." replied the doctor, swallowinghis r's, and pronouncing the 
Latin words with a French accent.* To err is human."Very well, very well..."Seei
ng Anna Mikhaylovna and her son, Prince Vasili dismissed the doctorwith a bow an
d approached them silently and with a look of inquiry. Theson noticed that an ex
pression of profound sorrow suddenly clouded hismother's face, and he smiled sli
ghtly."Ah, Prince! In what sad circumstances we meet again! And how is ourdear i
nvalid?" said she, as though unaware of the cold offensive lookfixed on her.Prin
ce Vasili stared at her and at Boris questioningly and perplexed.Boris bowed pol
itely. Prince Vasili without acknowledging the bow turnedto Anna Mikhaylovna, an
swering her query by a movement of the head andlips indicating very little hope 
for the patient."Is it possible?" exclaimed Anna Mikhaylovna. "Oh, how awful! It
 isterrible to think.... This is my son," she added, indicating Boris. "Hewanted
 to thank you himself."Boris bowed again politely."Believe me, Prince, a mother'
s heart will never forget what you havedone for us.""I am glad I was able to do 
you a service, my dear Anna Mikhaylovna,"said Prince Vasili, arranging his lace 
frill, and in tone and manner,here in Moscow to Anna Mikhaylovna whom he had pla
ced under anobligation, assuming an air of much greater importance than he had d
onein Petersburg at Anna Scherer's reception."Try to serve well and show yoursel
f worthy," added he, addressing Boriswith severity. "I am glad.... Are you here 
on leave?" he went on in hisusual tone of indifference."I am awaiting orders to 
join my new regiment, your excellency," repliedBoris, betraying neither annoyanc
e at the prince's brusque manner nor adesire to enter into conversation, but spe
aking so quietly andrespectfully that the prince gave him a searching glance."Ar
e you living with your mother?""I am living at Countess Rostova's," replied Bori
s, again adding, "yourexcellency.""That is, with Ilya Rostov who married Nataly 
Shinshina," said AnnaMikhaylovna."I know, I know," answered Prince Vasili in his
 monotonous voice. "Inever could understand how Nataly made up her mind to marry
 thatunlicked bear! A perfectly absurd and stupid fellow, and a gambler too,I am
 told.""But a very kind man, Prince," said Anna Mikhaylovna with a patheticsmile
, as though she too knew that Count Rostov deserved this censure,but asked him n
ot to be too hard on the poor old man. "What do thedoctors say?" asked the princ
ess after a pause, her worn face againexpressing deep sorrow."They give little h
ope," replied the prince."And I should so like to thank Uncle once for all his k
indness to me andBoris. He is his godson," she added, her tone suggesting that t
his factought to give Prince Vasili much satisfaction.Prince Vasili became thoug
htful and frowned. Anna Mikhaylovna saw thathe was afraid of finding in her a ri
val for Count Bezukhov's fortune,and hastened to reassure him."If it were not fo
r my sincere affection and devotion to Uncle," saidshe, uttering the word with p
eculiar assurance and unconcern, "I knowhis character: noble, upright... but you
 see he has no one with himexcept the young princesses.... They are still young.
..." She bent herhead and continued in a whisper: "Has he performed his final du
ty,Prince? How priceless are those last moments! It can make things noworse, and
 it is absolutely necessary to prepare him if he is so ill. Wewomen, Prince," an
d she smiled tenderly, "always know how to say thesethings. I absolutely must se
e him, however painful it may be for me. Iam used to suffering."Evidently the pr
ince understood her, and also understood, as he had doneat Anna Pavlovna's, that
 it would be difficult to get rid of AnnaMikhaylovna."Would not such a meeting b
e too trying for him, dear Anna Mikhaylovna?"said he. "Let us wait until evening
. The doctors are expecting acrisis.""But one cannot delay, Prince, at such a mo
ment! Consider that thewelfare of his soul is at stake. Ah, it is awful: the dut
ies of aChristian..."A door of one of the inner rooms opened and one of the prin
cesses, thecount's niece, entered with a cold, stern face. The length of her bod
ywas strikingly out of proportion to her short legs. Prince Vasili turnedto her.
"Well, how is he?""Still the same; but what can you expect, this noise..." said 
theprincess, looking at Anna Mikhaylovna as at a stranger."Ah, my dear, I hardly
 knew you," said Anna Mikhaylovna with a happysmile, ambling lightly up to the c
ount's niece. "I have come, and am atyour service to help you nurse my uncle. I 
imagine what you have gonethrough," and she sympathetically turned up her eyes.T
he princess gave no reply and did not even smile, but left the room asAnna Mikha
ylovna took off her gloves and, occupying the position she hadconquered, settled
 down in an armchair, inviting Prince Vasili to take aseat beside her."Boris," s
he said to her son with a smile, "I shall go in to see thecount, my uncle; but y
ou, my dear, had better go to Pierre meanwhile anddon't forget to give him the R
ostovs' invitation. They ask him todinner. I suppose he won't go?" she continued
, turning to the prince."On the contrary," replied the prince, who had plainly b
ecome depressed,"I shall be only too glad if you relieve me of that young man...
. Herehe is, and the count has not once asked for him."He shrugged his shoulders
. A footman conducted Boris down one flight ofstairs and up another, to Pierre's
 rooms.CHAPTER XVIPierre, after all, had not managed to choose a career for hims
elf inPetersburg, and had been expelled from there for riotous conduct andsent t
o Moscow. The story told about him at Count Rostov's was true.Pierre had taken p
art in tying a policeman to a bear. He had now beenfor some days in Moscow and w
as staying as usual at his father's house.Though he expected that the story of h
is escapade would be already knownin Moscow and that the ladies about his father
--who were never favorablydisposed toward him--would have used it to turn the co
unt against him,he nevertheless on the day of his arrival went to his father's p
art ofthe house. Entering the drawing room, where the princesses spent most ofth
eir time, he greeted the ladies, two of whom were sitting atembroidery frames wh
ile a third read aloud. It was the eldest who wasreading--the one who had met An
na Mikhaylovna. The two younger ones wereembroidering: both were rosy and pretty
 and they differed only in thatone had a little mole on her lip which made her m
uch prettier. Pierrewas received as if he were a corpse or a leper. The eldest p
rincesspaused in her reading and silently stared at him with frightened eyes;the
 second assumed precisely the same expression; while the youngest,the one with t
he mole, who was of a cheerful and lively disposition,bent over her frame to hid
e a smile probably evoked by the amusing sceneshe foresaw. She drew her wool dow
n through the canvas and, scarcelyable to refrain from laughing, stooped as if t
rying to make out thepattern."How do you do, cousin?" said Pierre. "You don't re
cognize me?""I recognize you only too well, too well.""How is the count? Can I s
ee him?" asked Pierre, awkwardly as usual, butunabashed."The count is suffering 
physically and mentally, and apparently you havedone your best to increase his m
ental sufferings.""Can I see the count?" Pierre again asked."Hm.... If you wish 
to kill him, to kill him outright, you can seehim... Olga, go and see whether Un
cle's beef tea is ready--it is almosttime," she added, giving Pierre to understa
nd that they were busy, andbusy making his father comfortable, while evidently h
e, Pierre, was onlybusy causing him annoyance.Olga went out. Pierre stood lookin
g at the sisters; then he bowed andsaid: "Then I will go to my rooms. You will l
et me know when I can seehim."And he left the room, followed by the low but ring
ing laughter of thesister with the mole.Next day Prince Vasili had arrived and s
ettled in the count's house. Hesent for Pierre and said to him: "My dear fellow,
 if you are going tobehave here as you did in Petersburg, you will end very badl
y; that isall I have to say to you. The count is very, very ill, and you must no
tsee him at all."Since then Pierre had not been disturbed and had spent the whol
e time inhis rooms upstairs.When Boris appeared at his door Pierre was pacing up
 and down his room,stopping occasionally at a corner to make menacing gestures a
t the wall,as if running a sword through an invisible foe, and glaring savagelyo
ver his spectacles, and then again resuming his walk, mutteringindistinct words,
 shrugging his shoulders and gesticulating."England is done for," said he, scowl
ing and pointing his finger atsomeone unseen. "Mr. Pitt, as a traitor to the nat
ion and to the rightsof man, is sentenced to..." But before Pierre--who at that 
momentimagined himself to be Napoleon in person and to have just effected thedan
gerous crossing of the Straits of Dover and captured London--couldpronounce Pitt
's sentence, he saw a well-built and handsome youngofficer entering his room. Pi
erre paused. He had left Moscow when Boriswas a boy of fourteen, and had quite f
orgotten him, but in his usualimpulsive and hearty way he took Boris by the hand
 with a friendlysmile."Do you remember me?" asked Boris quietly with a pleasant 
smile. "I havecome with my mother to see the count, but it seems he is not well.
""Yes, it seems he is ill. People are always disturbing him," answeredPierre, tr
ying to remember who this young man was.Boris felt that Pierre did not recognize
 him but did not consider itnecessary to introduce himself, and without experien
cing the leastembarrassment looked Pierre straight in the face."Count Rostov ask
s you to come to dinner today," said he, after aconsiderable pause which made Pi
erre feel uncomfortable."Ah, Count Rostov!" exclaimed Pierre joyfully. "Then you
 are his son,Ilya? Only fancy, I didn't know you at first. Do you remember how w
ewent to the Sparrow Hills with Madame Jacquot?... It's such an age...""You are 
mistaken," said Boris deliberately, with a bold and slightlysarcastic smile. "I 
am Boris, son of Princess Anna MikhaylovnaDrubetskaya. Rostov, the father, is Il
ya, and his son is Nicholas. Inever knew any Madame Jacquot."Pierre shook his he
ad and arms as if attacked by mosquitoes or bees."Oh dear, what am I thinking ab
out? I've mixed everything up. One has somany relatives in Moscow! So you are Bo
ris? Of course. Well, now we knowwhere we are. And what do you think of the Boul
ogne expedition? TheEnglish will come off badly, you know, if Napoleon gets acro
ss theChannel. I think the expedition is quite feasible. If only Villeneuvedoesn
't make a mess of things!"Boris knew nothing about the Boulogne expedition; he d
id not read thepapers and it was the first time he had heard Villeneuve's name."
We here in Moscow are more occupied with dinner parties and scandalthan with pol
itics," said he in his quiet ironical tone. "I know nothingabout it and have not
 thought about it. Moscow is chiefly busy withgossip," he continued. "Just now t
hey are talking about you and yourfather."Pierre smiled in his good-natured way 
as if afraid for his companion'ssake that the latter might say something he woul
d afterwards regret. ButBoris spoke distinctly, clearly, and dryly, looking stra
ight intoPierre's eyes."Moscow has nothing else to do but gossip," Boris went on
. "Everybody iswondering to whom the count will leave his fortune, though he may
perhaps outlive us all, as I sincerely hope he will...""Yes, it is all very horr
id," interrupted Pierre, "very horrid."Pierre was still afraid that this officer
 might inadvertently saysomething disconcerting to himself."And it must seem to 
you," said Boris flushing slightly, but notchanging his tone or attitude, "it mu
st seem to you that everyone istrying to get something out of the rich man?""So 
it does," thought Pierre."But I just wish to say, to avoid misunderstandings, th
at you are quitemistaken if you reckon me or my mother among such people. We are
 verypoor, but for my own part at any rate, for the very reason that yourfather 
is rich, I don't regard myself as a relation of his, and neitherI nor my mother 
would ever ask or take anything from him."For a long time Pierre could not under
stand, but when he did, he jumpedup from the sofa, seized Boris under the elbow 
in his quick, clumsy way,and, blushing far more than Boris, began to speak with 
a feeling ofmingled shame and vexation."Well, this is strange! Do you suppose I.
.. who could think?... I knowvery well..."But Boris again interrupted him."I am 
glad I have spoken out fully. Perhaps you did not like it? Youmust excuse me," s
aid he, putting Pierre at ease instead of being put atease by him, "but I hope I
 have not offended you. I always make it arule to speak out... Well, what answer
 am I to take? Will you come todinner at the Rostovs'?"And Boris, having apparen
tly relieved himself of an onerous duty andextricated himself from an awkward si
tuation and placed another in it,became quite pleasant again."No, but I say," sa
id Pierre, calming down, "you are a wonderful fellow!What you have just said is 
good, very good. Of course you don't know me.We have not met for such a long tim
e... not since we were children. Youmight think that I... I understand, quite un
derstand. I could not havedone it myself, I should not have had the courage, but
 it's splendid. Iam very glad to have made your acquaintance. It's queer," he ad
ded aftera pause, "that you should have suspected me!" He began to laugh. "Well,
what of it! I hope we'll get better acquainted," and he pressed Boris'hand. "Do 
you know, I have not once been in to see the count. He has notsent for me.... I 
am sorry for him as a man, but what can one do?""And so you think Napoleon will 
manage to get an army across?" askedBoris with a smile.Pierre saw that Boris wis
hed to change the subject, and being of thesame mind he began explaining the adv
antages and disadvantages of theBoulogne expedition.A footman came in to summon 
Boris--the princess was going. Pierre, inorder to make Boris' better acquaintanc
e, promised to come to dinner,and warmly pressing his hand looked affectionately
 over his spectaclesinto Boris' eyes. After he had gone Pierre continued pacing 
up and downthe room for a long time, no longer piercing an imaginary foe with hi
simaginary sword, but smiling at the remembrance of that pleasant,intelligent, a
nd resolute young man.As often happens in early youth, especially to one who lea
ds a lonelylife, he felt an unaccountable tenderness for this young man and made
 uphis mind that they would be friends.Prince Vasili saw the princess off. She h
eld a handkerchief to her eyesand her face was tearful."It is dreadful, dreadful
!" she was saying, "but cost me what it may Ishall do my duty. I will come and s
pend the night. He must not be leftlike this. Every moment is precious. I can't 
think why his nieces put itoff. Perhaps God will help me to find a way to prepar
e him!... Adieu,Prince! May God support you...""Adieu, ma bonne," answered Princ
e Vasili turning away from her."Oh, he is in a dreadful state," said the mother 
to her son when theywere in the carriage. "He hardly recognizes anybody.""I don'
t understand, Mamma--what is his attitude to Pierre?" asked theson."The will wil
l show that, my dear; our fate also depends on it.""But why do you expect that h
e will leave us anything?""Ah, my dear! He is so rich, and we are so poor!""Well
, that is hardly a sufficient reason, Mamma...""Oh, Heaven! How ill he is!" excl
aimed the mother.CHAPTER XVIIAfter Anna Mikhaylovna had driven off with her son 
to visit Count CyrilVladimirovich Bezukhov, Countess Rostova sat for a long time
 all aloneapplying her handkerchief to her eyes. At last she rang."What is the m
atter with you, my dear?" she said crossly to the maid whokept her waiting some 
minutes. "Don't you wish to serve me? Then I'llfind you another place."The count
ess was upset by her friend's sorrow and humiliating poverty,and was therefore o
ut of sorts, a state of mind which with her alwaysfound expression in calling he
r maid "my dear" and speaking to her withexaggerated politeness."I am very sorry
, ma'am," answered the maid."Ask the count to come to me."The count came waddlin
g in to see his wife with a rather guilty look asusual."Well, little countess? W
hat a saute of game au madere we are to have,my dear! I tasted it. The thousand 
rubles I paid for Taras were not ill-spent. He is worth it!"He sat down by his w
ife, his elbows on his knees and his hands rufflinghis gray hair."What are your 
commands, little countess?""You see, my dear... What's that mess?" she said, poi
nting to hiswaistcoat. "It's the saute, most likely," she added with a smile. "W
ell,you see, Count, I want some money."Her face became sad."Oh, little countess!
"... and the count began bustling to get out hispocketbook."I want a great deal,
 Count! I want five hundred rubles," and taking outher cambric handkerchief she 
began wiping her husband's waistcoat."Yes, immediately, immediately! Hey, who's 
there?" he called out in atone only used by persons who are certain that those t
hey call will rushto obey the summons. "Send Dmitri to me!"Dmitri, a man of good
 family who had been brought up in the count'shouse and now managed all his affa
irs, stepped softly into the room."This is what I want, my dear fellow," said th
e count to the deferentialyoung man who had entered. "Bring me..." he reflected 
a moment, "yes,bring me seven hundred rubles, yes! But mind, don't bring me such
tattered and dirty notes as last time, but nice clean ones for thecountess.""Yes
, Dmitri, clean ones, please," said the countess, sighing deeply."When would you
 like them, your excellency?" asked Dmitri. "Allow me toinform you... But, don't
 be uneasy," he added, noticing that the countwas beginning to breathe heavily a
nd quickly which was always a sign ofapproaching anger. "I was forgetting... Do 
you wish it brought at once?""Yes, yes; just so! Bring it. Give it to the counte
ss.""What a treasure that Dmitri is," added the count with a smile when theyoung
 man had departed. "There is never any 'impossible' with him.That's a thing I ha
te! Everything is possible.""Ah, money, Count, money! How much sorrow it causes 
in the world," saidthe countess. "But I am in great need of this sum.""You, my l
ittle countess, are a notorious spendthrift," said the count,and having kissed h
is wife's hand he went back to his study.When Anna Mikhaylovna returned from Cou
nt Bezukhov's the money, all inclean notes, was lying ready under a handkerchief
 on the countess'little table, and Anna Mikhaylovna noticed that something was a
gitatingher."Well, my dear?" asked the countess."Oh, what a terrible state he is
 in! One would not know him, he is soill! I was only there a few moments and har
dly said a word...""Annette, for heaven's sake don't refuse me," the countess be
gan, with ablush that looked very strange on her thin, dignified, elderly face, 
andshe took the money from under the handkerchief.Anna Mikhaylovna instantly gue
ssed her intention and stooped to be readyto embrace the countess at the appropr
iate moment."This is for Boris from me, for his outfit."Anna Mikhaylovna was alr
eady embracing her and weeping. The countesswept too. They wept because they wer
e friends, and because they werekindhearted, and because they--friends from chil
dhood--had to thinkabout such a base thing as money, and because their youth was
 over....But those tears were pleasant to them both.CHAPTER XVIIICountess Rostov
a, with her daughters and a large number of guests, wasalready seated in the dra
wing room. The count took the gentlemen intohis study and showed them his choice
 collection of Turkish pipes. Fromtime to time he went out to ask: "Hasn't she c
ome yet?" They wereexpecting Marya Dmitrievna Akhrosimova, known in society as l
e terribledragon, a lady distinguished not for wealth or rank, but for commonsen
se and frank plainness of speech. Marya Dmitrievna was known to theImperial fami
ly as well as to all Moscow and Petersburg, and both citieswondered at her, laug
hed privately at her rudenesses, and told goodstories about her, while none the 
less all without exception respectedand feared her.In the count's room, which wa
s full of tobacco smoke, they talked of warthat had been announced in a manifest
o, and about the recruiting. Noneof them had yet seen the manifesto, but they al
l knew it had appeared.The count sat on the sofa between two guests who were smo
king andtalking. He neither smoked nor talked, but bending his head first to one
side and then to the other watched the smokers with evident pleasure andlistened
 to the conversation of his two neighbors, whom he egged onagainst each other.On
e of them was a sallow, clean-shaven civilian with a thin and wrinkledface, alre
ady growing old, though he was dressed like a most fashionableyoung man. He sat 
with his legs up on the sofa as if quite at home and,having stuck an amber mouth
piece far into his mouth, was inhaling thesmoke spasmodically and screwing up hi
s eyes. This was an old bachelor,Shinshin, a cousin of the countess', a man with
 "a sharp tongue" as theysaid in Moscow society. He seemed to be condescending t
o his companion.The latter, a fresh, rosy officer of the Guards, irreproachably 
washed,brushed, and buttoned, held his pipe in the middle of his mouth and withr
ed lips gently inhaled the smoke, letting it escape from his handsomemouth in ri
ngs. This was Lieutenant Berg, an officer in the Semenovregiment with whom Boris
 was to travel to join the army, and about whomNatasha had teased her elder sist
er Vera, speaking of Berg as her"intended." The count sat between them and liste
ned attentively. Hisfavorite occupation when not playing boston, a card game he 
was veryfond of, was that of listener, especially when he succeeded in settingtw
o loquacious talkers at one another."Well, then, old chap, mon tres honorable Al
phonse Karlovich," saidShinshin, laughing ironically and mixing the most ordinar
y Russianexpressions with the choicest French phrases--which was a peculiarity o
fhis speech. "Vous comptez vous faire des rentes sur l'etat; * you wantto make s
omething out of your company?"* You expect to make an income out of the governme
nt."No, Peter Nikolaevich; I only want to show that in the cavalry theadvantages
 are far less than in the infantry. Just consider my ownposition now, Peter Niko
laevich..."Berg always spoke quietly, politely, and with great precision. Hiscon
versation always related entirely to himself; he would remain calmand silent whe
n the talk related to any topic that had no direct bearingon himself. He could r
emain silent for hours without being at all putout of countenance himself or mak
ing others uncomfortable, but as soonas the conversation concerned himself he wo
uld begin to talkcircumstantially and with evident satisfaction."Consider my pos
ition, Peter Nikolaevich. Were I in the cavalry I shouldget not more than two hu
ndred rubles every four months, even with therank of lieutenant; but as it is I 
receive two hundred and thirty," saidhe, looking at Shinshin and the count with 
a joyful, pleasant smile, asif it were obvious to him that his success must alwa
ys be the chiefdesire of everyone else."Besides that, Peter Nikolaevich, by exch
anging into the Guards I shallbe in a more prominent position," continued Berg, 
"and vacancies occurmuch more frequently in the Foot Guards. Then just think wha
t can bedone with two hundred and thirty rubles! I even manage to put a littleas
ide and to send something to my father," he went on, emitting a smokering."La ba
lance y est... * A German knows how to skin a flint, as theproverb says," remark
ed Shinshin, moving his pipe to the other side ofhis mouth and winking at the co
unt.* So that squares matters.The count burst out laughing. The other guests see
ing that Shinshin wastalking came up to listen. Berg, oblivious of irony or indi
fference,continued to explain how by exchanging into the Guards he had alreadyga
ined a step on his old comrades of the Cadet Corps; how in wartime thecompany co
mmander might get killed and he, as senior in the company,might easily succeed t
o the post; how popular he was with everyone inthe regiment, and how satisfied h
is father was with him. Berg evidentlyenjoyed narrating all this, and did not se
em to suspect that others,too, might have their own interests. But all he said w
as so prettilysedate, and the naivete of his youthful egotism was so obvious, th
at hedisarmed his hearers."Well, my boy, you'll get along wherever you go--foot 
or horse--thatI'll warrant," said Shinshin, patting him on the shoulder and taki
ng hisfeet off the sofa.Berg smiled joyously. The count, by his guests, went int
o the drawingroom.It was just the moment before a big dinner when the assembled 
guests,expecting the summons to zakuska, * avoid engaging in any longconversatio
n but think it necessary to move about and talk, in order toshow that they are n
ot at all impatient for their food. The host andhostess look toward the door, an
d now and then glance at one another,and the visitors try to guess from these gl
ances who, or what, they arewaiting for--some important relation who has not yet
 arrived, or a dishthat is not yet ready.* Hors d'oeuvres.Pierre had come just a
t dinnertime and was sitting awkwardly in themiddle of the drawing room on the f
irst chair he had come across,blocking the way for everyone. The countess tried 
to make him talk, buthe went on naively looking around through his spectacles as
 if in searchof somebody and answered all her questions in monosyllables. He was
 inthe way and was the only one who did not notice the fact. Most of theguests, 
knowing of the affair with the bear, looked with curiosity atthis big, stout, qu
iet man, wondering how such a clumsy, modest fellowcould have played such a pran
k on a policeman."You have only lately arrived?" the countess asked him."Oui, ma
dame," replied he, looking around him."You have not yet seen my husband?""Non, m
adame." He smiled quite inappropriately."You have been in Paris recently, I beli
eve? I suppose it's veryinteresting.""Very interesting."The countess exchanged g
lances with Anna Mikhaylovna. The latterunderstood that she was being asked to e
ntertain this young man, andsitting down beside him she began to speak about his
 father; but heanswered her, as he had the countess, only in monosyllables. The 
otherguests were all conversing with one another. "The Razumovskis... It waschar
ming... You are very kind... Countess Apraksina..." was heard on allsides. The c
ountess rose and went into the ballroom."Marya Dmitrievna?" came her voice from 
there."Herself," came the answer in a rough voice, and Marya Dmitrievnaentered t
he room.All the unmarried ladies and even the married ones except the veryoldest
 rose. Marya Dmitrievna paused at the door. Tall and stout,holding high her fift
y-year-old head with its gray curls, she stoodsurveying the guests, and leisurel
y arranged her wide sleeves as ifrolling them up. Marya Dmitrievna always spoke 
in Russian."Health and happiness to her whose name day we are keeping and to her
children," she said, in her loud, full-toned voice which drowned allothers. "Wel
l, you old sinner," she went on, turning to the count whowas kissing her hand, "
you're feeling dull in Moscow, I daresay? Nowhereto hunt with your dogs? But wha
t is to be done, old man? Just see howthese nestlings are growing up," and she p
ointed to the girls. "You mustlook for husbands for them whether you like it or 
not....""Well," said she, "how's my Cossack?" (Marya Dmitrievna always calledNat
asha a Cossack) and she stroked the child's arm as she came upfearless and gay t
o kiss her hand. "I know she's a scamp of a girl, butI like her."She took a pair
 of pear-shaped ruby earrings from her huge reticule and,having given them to th
e rosy Natasha, who beamed with the pleasure ofher saint's-day fete, turned away
 at once and addressed herself toPierre."Eh, eh, friend! Come here a bit," said 
she, assuming a soft high toneof voice. "Come here, my friend..." and she ominou
sly tucked up hersleeves still higher. Pierre approached, looking at her in a ch
ildlikeway through his spectacles."Come nearer, come nearer, friend! I used to b
e the only one to tellyour father the truth when he was in favor, and in your ca
se it's myevident duty." She paused. All were silent, expectant of what was tofo
llow, for this was clearly only a prelude."A fine lad! My word! A fine lad!... H
is father lies on his deathbed andhe amuses himself setting a policeman astride 
a bear! For shame, sir,for shame! It would be better if you went to the war."She
 turned away and gave her hand to the count, who could hardly keepfrom laughing.
"Well, I suppose it is time we were at table?" said Marya Dmitrievna.The count w
ent in first with Marya Dmitrievna, the countess followed onthe arm of a colonel
 of hussars, a man of importance to them becauseNicholas was to go with him to t
he regiment; then came Anna Mikhaylovnawith Shinshin. Berg gave his arm to Vera.
 The smiling Julie Karaginawent in with Nicholas. After them other couples follo
wed, filling thewhole dining hall, and last of all the children, tutors, and gov
ernessesfollowed singly. The footmen began moving about, chairs scraped, theband
 struck up in the gallery, and the guests settled down in theirplaces. Then the 
strains of the count's household band were replaced bythe clatter of knives and 
forks, the voices of visitors, and the softsteps of the footmen. At one end of t
he table sat the countess withMarya Dmitrievna on her right and Anna Mikhaylovna
 on her left, theother lady visitors were farther down. At the other end sat the
 count,with the hussar colonel on his left and Shinshin and the other malevisito
rs on his right. Midway down the long table on one side sat thegrownup young peo
ple: Vera beside Berg, and Pierre beside Boris; and onthe other side, the childr
en, tutors, and governesses. From behind thecrystal decanters and fruit vases, t
he count kept glancing at his wifeand her tall cap with its light-blue ribbons, 
and busily filled hisneighbors' glasses, not neglecting his own. The countess in
 turn,without omitting her duties as hostess, threw significant glances frombehi
nd the pineapples at her husband whose face and bald head seemed bytheir redness
 to contrast more than usual with his gray hair. At theladies' end an even chatt
er of voices was heard all the time, at themen's end the voices sounded louder a
nd louder, especially that of thecolonel of hussars who, growing more and more f
lushed, ate and drank somuch that the count held him up as a pattern to the othe
r guests. Bergwith tender smiles was saying to Vera that love is not an earthly 
but aheavenly feeling. Boris was telling his new friend Pierre who the guestswer
e and exchanging glances with Natasha, who was sitting opposite.Pierre spoke lit
tle but examined the new faces, and ate a great deal. Ofthe two soups he chose t
urtle with savory patties and went on to thegame without omitting a single dish 
or one of the wines. These latterthe butler thrust mysteriously forward, wrapped
 in a napkin, from behindthe next man's shoulders and whispered: "Dry Madeira"..
. "Hungarian"...or "Rhine wine" as the case might be. Of the four crystal glasse
sengraved with the count's monogram that stood before his plate, Pierreheld out 
one at random and drank with enjoyment, gazing with ever-increasing amiability a
t the other guests. Natasha, who sat opposite,was looking at Boris as girls of t
hirteen look at the boy they are inlove with and have just kissed for the first 
time. Sometimes that samelook fell on Pierre, and that funny lively little girl'
s look made himinclined to laugh without knowing why.Nicholas sat at some distan
ce from Sonya, beside Julie Karagina, to whomhe was again talking with the same 
involuntary smile. Sonya wore acompany smile but was evidently tormented by jeal
ousy; now she turnedpale, now blushed and strained every nerve to overhear what 
Nicholas andJulie were saying to one another. The governess kept looking roundun
easily as if preparing to resent any slight that might be put upon thechildren. 
The German tutor was trying to remember all the dishes, wines,and kinds of desse
rt, in order to send a full description of the dinnerto his people in Germany; a
nd he felt greatly offended when the butlerwith a bottle wrapped in a napkin pas
sed him by. He frowned, trying toappear as if he did not want any of that wine, 
but was mortified becauseno one would understand that it was not to quench his t
hirst or fromgreediness that he wanted it, but simply from a conscientious desir
e forknowledge.CHAPTER XIXAt the men's end of the table the talk grew more and m
ore animated. Thecolonel told them that the declaration of war had already appea
red inPetersburg and that a copy, which he had himself seen, had that day beenfo
rwarded by courier to the commander-in-chief."And why the deuce are we going to 
fight Bonaparte?" remarked Shinshin."He has stopped Austria's cackle and I fear 
it will be our turn next."The colonel was a stout, tall, plethoric German, evide
ntly devoted tothe service and patriotically Russian. He resented Shinshin's rem
ark."It is for the reasson, my goot sir," said he, speaking with a Germanaccent,
 "for the reasson zat ze Emperor knows zat. He declares in zemanifessto zat he c
annot fiew wiz indifference ze danger vreateningRussia and zat ze safety and dig
nity of ze Empire as vell as ze sanctityof its alliances..." he spoke this last 
word with particular emphasis asif in it lay the gist of the matter.Then with th
e unerring official memory that characterized him herepeated from the opening wo
rds of the manifesto:... and the wish, which constitutes the Emperor's sole and 
absolute aim--to establish peace in Europe on firm foundations--has now decided 
himto despatch part of the army abroad and to create a new condition forthe atta
inment of that purpose."Zat, my dear sir, is vy..." he concluded, drinking a tum
bler of winewith dignity and looking to the count for approval."Connaissez-vous 
le Proverbe: * 'Jerome, Jerome, do not roam, but turnspindles at home!'?" said S
hinshin, puckering his brows and smiling."Cela nous convient a merveille.*(2) Su
vorov now--he knew what he wasabout; yet they beat him a plate couture,*(3) and 
where are we to findSuvorovs now? Je vous demande un peu,"*(4) said he, continua
lly changingfrom French to Russian.*Do you know the proverb?*(2) That suits us d
own to the ground.*(3) Hollow.*(4) I just ask you that."Ve must vight to the las
t tr-r-op of our plood!" said the colonel,thumping the table; "and ve must tie f
or our Emperor, and zen all villpe vell. And ve must discuss it as little as po-
o-ossible"... he dweltparticularly on the word possible... "as po-o-ossible," he
 ended, againturning to the count. "Zat is how ve old hussars look at it, and ze
re'san end of it! And how do you, a young man and a young hussar, how do youjudg
e of it?" he added, addressing Nicholas, who when he heard that thewar was being
 discussed had turned from his partner with eyes and earsintent on the colonel."
I am quite of your opinion," replied Nicholas, flaming up, turning hisplate roun
d and moving his wineglasses about with as much decision anddesperation as thoug
h he were at that moment facing some great danger."I am convinced that we Russia
ns must die or conquer," he concluded,conscious--as were others--after the words
 were uttered that his remarkswere too enthusiastic and emphatic for the occasio
n and were thereforeawkward."What you said just now was splendid!" said his part
ner Julie.Sonya trembled all over and blushed to her ears and behind them and do
wnto her neck and shoulders while Nicholas was speaking.Pierre listened to the c
olonel's speech and nodded approvingly."That's fine," said he."The young man's a
 real hussar!" shouted the colonel, again thumping thetable."What are you making
 such a noise about over there?" Marya Dmitrievna'sdeep voice suddenly inquired 
from the other end of the table. "What areyou thumping the table for?" she deman
ded of the hussar, "and why areyou exciting yourself? Do you think the French ar
e here?""I am speaking ze truce," replied the hussar with a smile."It's all abou
t the war," the count shouted down the table. "You know myson's going, Marya Dmi
trievna? My son is going.""I have four sons in the army but still I don't fret. 
It is all in God'shands. You may die in your bed or God may spare you in a battl
e,"replied Marya Dmitrievna's deep voice, which easily carried the wholelength o
f the table."That's true!"Once more the conversations concentrated, the ladies' 
at the one end andthe men's at the other."You won't ask," Natasha's little broth
er was saying; "I know you won'task!""I will," replied Natasha.Her face suddenly
 flushed with reckless and joyous resolution. She halfrose, by a glance inviting
 Pierre, who sat opposite, to listen to whatwas coming, and turning to her mothe
r:"Mamma!" rang out the clear contralto notes of her childish voice,audible the 
whole length of the table."What is it?" asked the countess, startled; but seeing
 by her daughter'sface that it was only mischief, she shook a finger at her ster
nly with athreatening and forbidding movement of her head.The conversation was h
ushed."Mamma! What sweets are we going to have?" and Natasha's voice soundedstil
l more firm and resolute.The countess tried to frown, but could not. Marya Dmitr
ievna shook herfat finger."Cossack!" she said threateningly.Most of the guests, 
uncertain how to regard this sally, looked at theelders."You had better take car
e!" said the countess."Mamma! What sweets are we going to have?" Natasha again c
ried boldly,with saucy gaiety, confident that her prank would be taken in good p
art.Sonya and fat little Petya doubled up with laughter."You see! I have asked,"
 whispered Natasha to her little brother and toPierre, glancing at him again."Ic
e pudding, but you won't get any," said Marya Dmitrievna.Natasha saw there was n
othing to be afraid of and so she braved evenMarya Dmitrievna."Marya Dmitrievna!
 What kind of ice pudding? I don't like ice cream.""Carrot ices.""No! What kind,
 Marya Dmitrievna? What kind?" she almost screamed; "Iwant to know!"Marya Dmitri
evna and the countess burst out laughing, and all the guestsjoined in. Everyone 
laughed, not at Marya Dmitrievna's answer but at theincredible boldness and smar
tness of this little girl who had dared totreat Marya Dmitrievna in this fashion
.Natasha only desisted when she had been told that there would bepineapple ice. 
Before the ices, champagne was served round. The bandagain struck up, the count 
and countess kissed, and the guests, leavingtheir seats, went up to "congratulat
e" the countess, and reached acrossthe table to clink glasses with the count, wi
th the children, and withone another. Again the footmen rushed about, chairs scr
aped, and in thesame order in which they had entered but with redder faces, the 
guestsreturned to the drawing room and to the count's study.CHAPTER XXThe card t
ables were drawn out, sets made up for boston, and the count'svisitors settled t
hemselves, some in the two drawing rooms, some in thesitting room, some in the l
ibrary.The count, holding his cards fanwise, kept himself with difficulty fromdr
opping into his usual after-dinner nap, and laughed at everything. Theyoung peop
le, at the countess' instigation, gathered round theclavichord and harp. Julie b
y general request played first. After shehad played a little air with variations
 on the harp, she joined theother young ladies in begging Natasha and Nicholas, 
who were noted fortheir musical talent, to sing something. Natasha, who was trea
ted asthough she were grown up, was evidently very proud of this but at thesame 
time felt shy."What shall we sing?" she said."'The Brook,'" suggested Nicholas."
Well, then, let's be quick. Boris, come here," said Natasha. "But whereis Sonya?
"She looked round and seeing that her friend was not in the room ran tolook for 
her.Running into Sonya's room and not finding her there, Natasha ran to thenurse
ry, but Sonya was not there either. Natasha concluded that she mustbe on the che
st in the passage. The chest in the passage was the placeof mourning for the you
nger female generation in the Rostov household.And there in fact was Sonya lying
 face downward on Nurse's dirty featherbed on the top of the chest, crumpling he
r gauzy pink dress under her,hiding her face with her slender fingers, and sobbi
ng so convulsivelythat her bare little shoulders shook. Natasha's face, which ha
d been soradiantly happy all that saint's day, suddenly changed: her eyes became
"Sonya! What is it? What is the matter?... Oo... Oo... Oo...!" AndNatasha's larg
e mouth widened, making her look quite ugly, and she beganto wail like a baby wi
thout knowing why, except that Sonya was crying.Sonya tried to lift her head to 
answer but could not, and hid her facestill deeper in the bed. Natasha wept, sit
ting on the blue-stripedfeather bed and hugging her friend. With an effort Sonya
 sat up andbegan wiping her eyes and explaining."Nicholas is going away in a wee
k's time, his... papers... have come...he told me himself... but still I should 
not cry," and she showed apaper she held in her hand--with the verses Nicholas h
ad written,"still, I should not cry, but you can't... no one can understand... w
hata soul he has!"And she began to cry again because he had such a noble soul."I
t's all very well for you... I am not envious... I love you and Borisalso," she 
went on, gaining a little strength; "he is nice... there areno difficulties in y
our way.... But Nicholas is my cousin... one wouldhave to... the Metropolitan hi
mself... and even then it can't be done.And besides, if she tells Mamma" (Sonya 
looked upon the countess as hermother and called her so) "that I am spoiling Nic
holas' career and amheartless and ungrateful, while truly... God is my witness,"
 and shemade the sign of the cross, "I love her so much, and all of you, onlyVer
a... And what for? What have I done to her? I am so grateful to youthat I would 
willingly sacrifice everything, only I have nothing...."Sonya could not continue
, and again hid her face in her hands and in thefeather bed. Natasha began conso
ling her, but her face showed that sheunderstood all the gravity of her friend's
 trouble."Sonya," she suddenly exclaimed, as if she had guessed the true reasono
f her friend's sorrow, "I'm sure Vera has said something to you sincedinner? Has
n't she?""Yes, these verses Nicholas wrote himself and I copied some others, and
she found them on my table and said she'd show them to Mamma, and that Iwas ungr
ateful, and that Mamma would never allow him to marry me, butthat he'll marry Ju
lie. You see how he's been with her all day...Natasha, what have I done to deser
ve it?..."And again she began to sob, more bitterly than before. Natasha liftedh
er up, hugged her, and, smiling through her tears, began comfortingher."Sonya, d
on't believe her, darling! Don't believe her! Do you rememberhow we and Nicholas
, all three of us, talked in the sitting room aftersupper? Why, we settled how e
verything was to be. I don't quite rememberhow, but don't you remember that it c
ould all be arranged and how niceit all was? There's Uncle Shinshin's brother ha
s married his firstcousin. And we are only second cousins, you know. And Boris s
ays it isquite possible. You know I have told him all about it. And he is soclev
er and so good!" said Natasha. "Don't you cry, Sonya, dear love,darling Sonya!" 
and she kissed her and laughed. "Vera's spiteful; nevermind her! And all will co
me right and she won't say anything to Mamma.Nicholas will tell her himself, and
 he doesn't care at all for Julie."Natasha kissed her on the hair.Sonya sat up. 
The little kitten brightened, its eyes shone, and itseemed ready to lift its tai
l, jump down on its soft paws, and beginplaying with the ball of worsted as a ki
tten should."Do you think so?... Really? Truly?" she said, quickly smoothing her
frock and hair."Really, truly!" answered Natasha, pushing in a crisp lock that h
adstrayed from under her friend's plaits.Both laughed."Well, let's go and sing '
The Brook.'""Come along!""Do you know, that fat Pierre who sat opposite me is so
 funny!" saidNatasha, stopping suddenly. "I feel so happy!"And she set off at a 
run along the passage.Sonya, shaking off some down which clung to her and tuckin
g away theverses in the bosom of her dress close to her bony little chest, ranaf
ter Natasha down the passage into the sitting room with flushed faceand light, j
oyous steps. At the visitors' request the young people sangthe quartette, "The B
rook," with which everyone was delighted. ThenNicholas sang a song he had just l
earned:At nighttime in the moon's fair glow How sweet, as fancies wander free,To
 feel that in this world there's one Who still is thinking but ofthee!That while
 her fingers touch the harp Wafting sweet music o'er the lea,It is for thee thus
 swells her heart, Sighing its message out to thee...A day or two, then bliss un
spoilt, But oh! till then I cannot live!...He had not finished the last verse be
fore the young people began to getready to dance in the large hall, and the soun
d of the feet and thecoughing of the musicians were heard from the gallery.Pierr
e was sitting in the drawing-room where Shinshin had engaged him,as a man recent
ly returned from abroad, in a political conversation inwhich several others join
ed but which bored Pierre. When the music beganNatasha came in and walking strai
ght up to Pierre said, laughing andblushing:"Mamma told me to ask you to join th
e dancers.""I am afraid of mixing the figures," Pierre replied; "but if you will
 bemy teacher..." And lowering his big arm he offered it to the slenderlittle gi
rl.While the couples were arranging themselves and the musicians tuning up,Pierr
e sat down with his little partner. Natasha was perfectly happy;she was dancing 
with a grown-up man, who had been abroad. She wassitting in a conspicuous place 
and talking to him like a grown-up lady.She had a fan in her hand that one of th
e ladies had given her to hold.Assuming quite the pose of a society woman (heave
n knows when and whereshe had learned it) she talked with her partner, fanning h
erself andsmiling over the fan."Dear, dear! Just look at her!" exclaimed the cou
ntess as she crossedthe ballroom, pointing to Natasha.Natasha blushed and laughe
d."Well, really, Mamma! Why should you? What is there to be surprised at?"In the
 midst of the third ecossaise there was a clatter of chairs beingpushed back in 
the sitting room where the count and Marya Dmitrievna hadbeen playing cards with
 the majority of the more distinguished and oldervisitors. They now, stretching 
themselves after sitting so long, andreplacing their purses and pocketbooks, ent
ered the ballroom. First cameMarya Dmitrievna and the count, both with merry cou
ntenances. The count,with playful ceremony somewhat in ballet style, offered his
 bent arm toMarya Dmitrievna. He drew himself up, a smile of debonair gallantry 
litup his face and as soon as the last figure of the ecossaise was ended,he clap
ped his hands to the musicians and shouted up to their gallery,addressing the fi
rst violin:"Semen! Do you know the Daniel Cooper?"This was the count's favorite 
dance, which he had danced in his youth.(Strictly speaking, Daniel Cooper was on
e figure of the anglaise.)"Look at Papa!" shouted Natasha to the whole company, 
and quiteforgetting that she was dancing with a grown-up partner she bent hercur
ly head to her knees and made the whole room ring with her laughter.And indeed e
verybody in the room looked with a smile of pleasure at thejovial old gentleman,
 who standing beside his tall and stout partner,Marya Dmitrievna, curved his arm
s, beat time, straightened hisshoulders, turned out his toes, tapped gently with
 his foot, and, by asmile that broadened his round face more and more, prepared 
theonlookers for what was to follow. As soon as the provocatively gaystrains of 
Daniel Cooper (somewhat resembling those of a merry peasantdance) began to sound
, all the doorways of the ballroom were suddenlyfilled by the domestic serfs--th
e men on one side and the women on theother--who with beaming faces had come to 
see their master making merry."Just look at the master! A regular eagle he is!" 
loudly remarked thenurse, as she stood in one of the doorways.The count danced w
ell and knew it. But his partner could not and did notwant to dance well. Her en
ormous figure stood erect, her powerful armshanging down (she had handed her ret
icule to the countess), and only herstern but handsome face really joined in the
 dance. What was expressedby the whole of the count's plump figure, in Marya Dmi
trievna foundexpression only in her more and more beaming face and quivering nos
e.But if the count, getting more and more into the swing of it, charmedthe spect
ators by the unexpectedness of his adroit maneuvers and theagility with which he
 capered about on his light feet, Marya Dmitrievnaproduced no less impression by
 slight exertions--the least effort tomove her shoulders or bend her arms when t
urning, or stamp her foot--which everyone appreciated in view of her size and ha
bitual severity.The dance grew livelier and livelier. The other couples could no
tattract a moment's attention to their own evolutions and did not eventry to do 
so. All were watching the count and Marya Dmitrievna. Natashakept pulling everyo
ne by sleeve or dress, urging them to "look at Papa!"though as it was they never
 took their eyes off the couple. In theintervals of the dance the count, breathi
ng deeply, waved and shouted tothe musicians to play faster. Faster, faster, and
 faster; lightly, morelightly, and yet more lightly whirled the count, flying ro
und MaryaDmitrievna, now on his toes, now on his heels; until, turning hispartne
r round to her seat, he executed the final pas, raising his softfoot backwards, 
bowing his perspiring head, smiling and making a widesweep with his arm, amid a 
thunder of applause and laughter led byNatasha. Both partners stood still, breat
hing heavily and wiping theirfaces with their cambric handkerchiefs."That's how 
we used to dance in our time, ma chere," said the count."That was a Daniel Coope
r!" exclaimed Marya Dmitrievna, tucking up hersleeves and puffing heavily.CHAPTE
R XXIWhile in the Rostovs' ballroom the sixth anglaise was being danced, to atun
e in which the weary musicians blundered, and while tired footmen andcooks were 
getting the supper, Count Bezukhov had a sixth stroke. Thedoctors pronounced rec
overy impossible. After a mute confession,communion was administered to the dyin
g man, preparations made for thesacrament of unction, and in his house there was
 the bustle and thrillof suspense usual at such moments. Outside the house, beyo
nd the gates,a group of undertakers, who hid whenever a carriage drove up, waite
d inexpectation of an important order for an expensive funeral. The MilitaryGove
rnor of Moscow, who had been assiduous in sending aides-de-camp toinquire after 
the count's health, came himself that evening to bid alast farewell to the celeb
rated grandee of Catherine's court, CountBezukhov.The magnificent reception room
 was crowded. Everyone stood uprespectfully when the Military Governor, having s
tayed about half anhour alone with the dying man, passed out, slightly acknowled
ging theirbows and trying to escape as quickly as possible from the glances fixe
don him by the doctors, clergy, and relatives of the family. PrinceVasili, who h
ad grown thinner and paler during the last few days,escorted him to the door, re
peating something to him several times inlow tones.When the Military Governor ha
d gone, Prince Vasili sat down all alone ona chair in the ballroom, crossing one
 leg high over the other, leaninghis elbow on his knee and covering his face wit
h his hand. After sittingso for a while he rose, and, looking about him with fri
ghtened eyes,went with unusually hurried steps down the long corridor leading to
 theback of the house, to the room of the eldest princess.Those who were in the 
dimly lit reception room spoke in nervouswhispers, and, whenever anyone went int
o or came from the dying man'sroom, grew silent and gazed with eyes full of curi
osity or expectancy athis door, which creaked slightly when opened."The limits o
f human life... are fixed and may not be o'erpassed," saidan old priest to a lad
y who had taken a seat beside him and waslistening naively to his words."I wonde
r, is it not too late to administer unction?" asked the lady,adding the priest's
 clerical title, as if she had no opinion of her ownon the subject."Ah, madam, i
t is a great sacrament," replied the priest, passing hishand over the thin grizz
led strands of hair combed back across his baldhead."Who was that? The Military 
Governor himself?" was being asked at theother side of the room. "How young-look
ing he is!""Yes, and he is over sixty. I hear the count no longer recognizesanyo
ne. They wished to administer the sacrament of unction.""I knew someone who rece
ived that sacrament seven times."The second princess had just come from the sick
room with her eyes redfrom weeping and sat down beside Dr. Lorrain, who was sitt
ing in agraceful pose under a portrait of Catherine, leaning his elbow on atable
."Beautiful," said the doctor in answer to a remark about the weather."The weath
er is beautiful, Princess; and besides, in Moscow one feels asif one were in the
 country.""Yes, indeed," replied the princess with a sigh. "So he may havesometh
ing to drink?"Lorrain considered."Has he taken his medicine?""Yes."The doctor gl
anced at his watch."Take a glass of boiled water and put a pinch of cream of tar
tar," andhe indicated with his delicate fingers what he meant by a pinch."Dere h
as neffer been a gase," a German doctor was saying to an aide-de-camp, "dat one 
liffs after de sird stroke.""And what a well-preserved man he was!" remarked the
 aide-de-camp. "Andwho will inherit his wealth?" he added in a whisper."It von't
 go begging," replied the German with a smile.Everyone again looked toward the d
oor, which creaked as the secondprincess went in with the drink she had prepared
 according to Lorrain'sinstructions. The German doctor went up to Lorrain."Do yo
u think he can last till morning?" asked the German, addressingLorrain in French
 which he pronounced badly.Lorrain, pursing up his lips, waved a severely negati
ve finger beforehis nose."Tonight, not later," said he in a low voice, and he mo
ved away with adecorous smile of self-satisfaction at being able clearly to unde
rstandand state the patient's condition.Meanwhile Prince Vasili had opened the d
oor into the princess' room.In this room it was almost dark; only two tiny lamps
 were burning beforethe icons and there was a pleasant scent of flowers and burn
t pastilles.The room was crowded with small pieces of furniture, whatnots,cupboa
rds, and little tables. The quilt of a high, white feather bed wasjust visible b
ehind a screen. A small dog began to bark."Ah, is it you, cousin?"She rose and s
moothed her hair, which was as usual so extremely smooththat it seemed to be mad
e of one piece with her head and covered withvarnish."Has anything happened?" sh
e asked. "I am so terrified.""No, there is no change. I only came to have a talk
 about business,Catiche," * muttered the prince, seating himself wearily on the 
chairshe had just vacated. "You have made the place warm, I must say," heremarke
d. "Well, sit down: let's have a talk."*Catherine."I thought perhaps something h
ad happened," she said with her unchangingstonily severe expression; and, sittin
g down opposite the prince, sheprepared to listen."I wished to get a nap, mon co
usin, but I can't.""Well, my dear?" said Prince Vasili, taking her hand and bend
ing itdownwards as was his habit.It was plain that this "well?" referred to much
 that they bothunderstood without naming.The princess, who had a straight, rigid
 body, abnormally long for herlegs, looked directly at Prince Vasili with no sig
n of emotion in herprominent gray eyes. Then she shook her head and glanced up a
t the iconswith a sigh. This might have been taken as an expression of sorrow an
ddevotion, or of weariness and hope of resting before long. Prince Vasiliunderst
ood it as an expression of weariness."And I?" he said; "do you think it is easie
r for me? I am as worn out asa post horse, but still I must have a talk with you
, Catiche, a veryserious talk."Prince Vasili said no more and his cheeks began t
o twitch nervously, nowon one side, now on the other, giving his face an unpleas
ant expressionwhich was never to be seen on it in a drawing room. His eyes too s
eemedstrange; at one moment they looked impudently sly and at the nextglanced ro
und in alarm.The princess, holding her little dog on her lap with her thin bonyh
ands, looked attentively into Prince Vasili's eyes evidently resolvednot to be t
he first to break silence, if she had to wait till morning."Well, you see, my de
ar princess and cousin, Catherine Semenovna,"continued Prince Vasili, returning 
to his theme, apparently not withoutan inner struggle; "at such a moment as this
 one must think ofeverything. One must think of the future, of all of you... I l
ove youall, like children of my own, as you know."The princess continued to look
 at him without moving, and with the samedull expression."And then of course my 
family has also to be considered," Prince Vasiliwent on, testily pushing away a 
little table without looking at her."You know, Catiche, that we--you three siste
rs, Mamontov, and my wife--are the count's only direct heirs. I know, I know how
 hard it is for youto talk or think of such matters. It is no easier for me; but
, my dear,I am getting on for sixty and must be prepared for anything. Do you kn
owI have sent for Pierre? The count," pointing to his portrait,"definitely deman
ded that he should be called."Prince Vasili looked questioningly at the princess
, but could not makeout whether she was considering what he had just said or whe
ther she wassimply looking at him."There is one thing I constantly pray God to g
rant, mon cousin," shereplied, "and it is that He would be merciful to him and w
ould allow hisnoble soul peacefully to leave this...""Yes, yes, of course," inte
rrupted Prince Vasili impatiently, rubbinghis bald head and angrily pulling back
 toward him the little table thathe had pushed away. "But... in short, the fact 
is... you know yourselfthat last winter the count made a will by which he left a
ll hisproperty, not to us his direct heirs, but to Pierre.""He has made wills en
ough!" quietly remarked the princess. "But hecannot leave the estate to Pierre. 
Pierre is illegitimate.""But, my dear," said Prince Vasili suddenly, clutching t
he little tableand becoming more animated and talking more rapidly: "what if a l
etterhas been written to the Emperor in which the count asks for Pierre'slegitim
ation? Do you understand that in consideration of the count'sservices, his reque
st would be granted?..."The princess smiled as people do who think they know mor
e about thesubject under discussion than those they are talking with."I can tell
 you more," continued Prince Vasili, seizing her hand, "thatletter was written, 
though it was not sent, and the Emperor knew of it.The only question is, has it 
been destroyed or not? If not, then as soonas all is over," and Prince Vasili si
ghed to intimate what he meant bythe words all is over, "and the count's papers 
are opened, the will andletter will be delivered to the Emperor, and the petitio
n will certainlybe granted. Pierre will get everything as the legitimate son.""A
nd our share?" asked the princess smiling ironically, as if anythingmight happen
, only not that."But, my poor Catiche, it is as clear as daylight! He will then 
be thelegal heir to everything and you won't get anything. You must know, mydear
, whether the will and letter were written, and whether they havebeen destroyed 
or not. And if they have somehow been overlooked, youought to know where they ar
e, and must find them, because...""What next?" the princess interrupted, smiling
 sardonically and notchanging the expression of her eyes. "I am a woman, and you
 think we areall stupid; but I know this: an illegitimate son cannot inherit... 
unbatard!" * she added, as if supposing that this translation of the wordwould e
ffectively prove to Prince Vasili the invalidity of hiscontention.* A bastard."W
ell, really, Catiche! Can't you understand! You are so intelligent,how is it you
 don't see that if the count has written a letter to theEmperor begging him to r
ecognize Pierre as legitimate, it follows thatPierre will not be Pierre but will
 become Count Bezukhov, and will theninherit everything under the will? And if t
he will and letter are notdestroyed, then you will have nothing but the consolat
ion of having beendutiful et tout ce qui s'ensuit! * That's certain."* And all t
hat follows therefrom."I know the will was made, but I also know that it is inva
lid; and you,mon cousin, seem to consider me a perfect fool," said the princess 
withthe expression women assume when they suppose they are saying somethingwitty
 and stinging."My dear Princess Catherine Semenovna," began Prince Vasili impati
ently,"I came here not to wrangle with you, but to talk about your interestsas w
ith a kinswoman, a good, kind, true relation. And I tell you for thetenth time t
hat if the letter to the Emperor and the will in Pierre'sfavor are among the cou
nt's papers, then, my dear girl, you and yoursisters are not heiresses! If you d
on't believe me, then believe anexpert. I have just been talking to Dmitri Onufr
ich" (the familysolicitor) "and he says the same."At this a sudden change eviden
tly took place in the princess' ideas; herthin lips grew white, though her eyes 
did not change, and her voice whenshe began to speak passed through such transit
ions as she herselfevidently did not expect."That would be a fine thing!" said s
he. "I never wanted anything and Idon't now."She pushed the little dog off her l
ap and smoothed her dress."And this is gratitude--this is recognition for those 
who havesacrificed everything for his sake!" she cried. "It's splendid! Fine! Id
on't want anything, Prince.""Yes, but you are not the only one. There are your s
isters..." repliedPrince Vasili.But the princess did not listen to him."Yes, I k
new it long ago but had forgotten. I knew that I could expectnothing but meannes
s, deceit, envy, intrigue, and ingratitude--theblackest ingratitude--in this hou
se...""Do you or do you not know where that will is?" insisted Prince Vasili,his
 cheeks twitching more than ever."Yes, I was a fool! I still believed in people,
 loved them, andsacrificed myself. But only the base, the vile succeed! I know w
ho hasbeen intriguing!"The princess wished to rise, but the prince held her by t
he hand. Shehad the air of one who has suddenly lost faith in the whole human ra
ce.She gave her companion an angry glance."There is still time, my dear. You mus
t remember, Catiche, that it wasall done casually in a moment of anger, of illne
ss, and was afterwardsforgotten. Our duty, my dear, is to rectify his mistake, t
o ease hislast moments by not letting him commit this injustice, and not to leth
im die feeling that he is rendering unhappy those who...""Who sacrificed everyth
ing for him," chimed in the princess, who wouldagain have risen had not the prin
ce still held her fast, "though henever could appreciate it. No, mon cousin," sh
e added with a sigh, "Ishall always remember that in this world one must expect 
no reward, thatin this world there is neither honor nor justice. In this world o
ne hasto be cunning and cruel.""Now come, come! Be reasonable. I know your excel
lent heart.""No, I have a wicked heart.""I know your heart," repeated the prince
. "I value your friendship andwish you to have as good an opinion of me. Don't u
pset yourself, and letus talk sensibly while there is still time, be it a day or
 be it but anhour.... Tell me all you know about the will, and above all where i
t is.You must know. We will take it at once and show it to the count. He has,no 
doubt, forgotten it and will wish to destroy it. You understand thatmy sole desi
re is conscientiously to carry out his wishes; that is myonly reason for being h
ere. I came simply to help him and you.""Now I see it all! I know who has been i
ntriguing--I know!" cried theprincess."That's not the point, my dear.""It's that
 protege of yours, that sweet Princess Drubetskaya, that AnnaMikhaylovna whom I 
would not take for a housemaid... the infamous, vilewoman!""Do not let us lose a
ny time...""Ah, don't talk to me! Last winter she wheedled herself in here and t
oldthe count such vile, disgraceful things about us, especially aboutSophie--I c
an't repeat them--that it made the count quite ill and hewould not see us for a 
whole fortnight. I know it was then he wrote thisvile, infamous paper, but I tho
ught the thing was invalid.""We've got to it at last--why did you not tell me ab
out it sooner?""It's in the inlaid portfolio that he keeps under his pillow," sa
id theprincess, ignoring his question. "Now I know! Yes; if I have a sin, agreat
 sin, it is hatred of that vile woman!" almost shrieked theprincess, now quite c
hanged. "And what does she come worming herself inhere for? But I will give her 
a piece of my mind. The time will come!"CHAPTER XXIIWhile these conversations we
re going on in the reception room and theprincess' room, a carriage containing P
ierre (who had been sent for) andAnna Mikhaylovna (who found it necessary to acc
ompany him) was drivinginto the court of Count Bezukhov's house. As the wheels r
olled softlyover the straw beneath the windows, Anna Mikhaylovna, having turned 
withwords of comfort to her companion, realized that he was asleep in hiscorner 
and woke him up. Rousing himself, Pierre followed AnnaMikhaylovna out of the car
riage, and only then began to think of theinterview with his dying father which 
awaited him. He noticed that theyhad not come to the front entrance but to the b
ack door. While he wasgetting down from the carriage steps two men, who looked l
iketradespeople, ran hurriedly from the entrance and hid in the shadow ofthe wal
l. Pausing for a moment, Pierre noticed several other men of thesame kind hiding
 in the shadow of the house on both sides. But neitherAnna Mikhaylovna nor the f
ootman nor the coachman, who could not helpseeing these people, took any notice 
of them. "It seems to be allright," Pierre concluded, and followed Anna Mikhaylo
vna. She hurriedlyascended the narrow dimly lit stone staircase, calling to Pier
re, whowas lagging behind, to follow. Though he did not see why it wasnecessary 
for him to go to the count at all, still less why he had to goby the back stairs
, yet judging by Anna Mikhaylovna's air of assuranceand haste, Pierre concluded 
that it was all absolutely necessary.Halfway up the stairs they were almost knoc
ked over by some men who,carrying pails, came running downstairs, their boots cl
attering. Thesemen pressed close to the wall to let Pierre and Anna Mikhaylovna 
passand did not evince the least surprise at seeing them there."Is this the way 
to the princesses' apartments?" asked Anna Mikhaylovnaof one of them."Yes," repl
ied a footman in a bold loud voice, as if anything were nowpermissible; "the doo
r to the left, ma'am.""Perhaps the count did not ask for me," said Pierre when h
e reached thelanding. "I'd better go to my own room."Anna Mikhaylovna paused and
 waited for him to come up."Ah, my friend!" she said, touching his arm as she ha
d done her son'swhen speaking to him that afternoon, "believe me I suffer no les
s thanyou do, but be a man!""But really, hadn't I better go away?" he asked, loo
king kindly at herover his spectacles."Ah, my dear friend! Forget the wrongs tha
t may have been done you.Think that he is your father... perhaps in the agony of
 death." Shesighed. "I have loved you like a son from the first. Trust yourself 
tome, Pierre. I shall not forget your interests."Pierre did not understand a wor
d, but the conviction that all this hadto be grew stronger, and he meekly follow
ed Anna Mikhaylovna who wasalready opening a door.This door led into a back ante
room. An old man, a servant of theprincesses, sat in a corner knitting a stockin
g. Pierre had never beenin this part of the house and did not even know of the e
xistence ofthese rooms. Anna Mikhaylovna, addressing a maid who was hurrying pas
twith a decanter on a tray as "my dear" and "my sweet," asked about theprincess'
 health and then led Pierre along a stone passage. The firstdoor on the left led
 into the princesses' apartments. The maid with thedecanter in her haste had not
 closed the door (everything in the housewas done in haste at that time), and Pi
erre and Anna Mikhaylovna inpassing instinctively glanced into the room, where P
rince Vasili and theeldest princess were sitting close together talking. Seeing 
them pass,Prince Vasili drew back with obvious impatience, while the princessjum
ped up and with a gesture of desperation slammed the door with allher might.This
 action was so unlike her usual composure and the fear depicted onPrince Vasili'
s face so out of keeping with his dignity that Pierrestopped and glanced inquiri
ngly over his spectacles at his guide. AnnaMikhaylovna evinced no surprise, she 
only smiled faintly and sighed, asif to say that this was no more than she had e
xpected."Be a man, my friend. I will look after your interests," said she inrepl
y to his look, and went still faster along the passage.Pierre could not make out
 what it was all about, and still less what"watching over his interests" meant, 
but he decided that all thesethings had to be. From the passage they went into a
 large, dimly litroom adjoining the count's reception room. It was one of those 
sumptuousbut cold apartments known to Pierre only from the front approach, butev
en in this room there now stood an empty bath, and water had beenspilled on the 
carpet. They were met by a deacon with a censer and by aservant who passed out o
n tiptoe without heeding them. They went intothe reception room familiar to Pier
re, with two Italian windows openinginto the conservatory, with its large bust a
nd full length portrait ofCatherine the Great. The same people were still sittin
g here in almostthe same positions as before, whispering to one another. All bec
amesilent and turned to look at the pale tear-worn Anna Mikhaylovna as sheentere
d, and at the big stout figure of Pierre who, hanging his head,meekly followed h
er.Anna Mikhaylovna's face expressed a consciousness that the decisivemoment had
 arrived. With the air of a practical Petersburg lady she now,keeping Pierre clo
se beside her, entered the room even more boldly thanthat afternoon. She felt th
at as she brought with her the person thedying man wished to see, her own admiss
ion was assured. Casting a rapidglance at all those in the room and noticing the
 count's confessorthere, she glided up to him with a sort of amble, not exactly 
bowing yetseeming to grow suddenly smaller, and respectfully received the blessi
ngfirst of one and then of another priest."God be thanked that you are in time,"
 said she to one of the priests;"all we relatives have been in such anxiety. Thi
s young man is thecount's son," she added more softly. "What a terrible moment!"
Having said this she went up to the doctor."Dear doctor," said she, "this young 
man is the count's son. Is thereany hope?"The doctor cast a rapid glance upwards
 and silently shrugged hisshoulders. Anna Mikhaylovna with just the same movemen
t raised hershoulders and eyes, almost closing the latter, sighed, and moved awa
yfrom the doctor to Pierre. To him, in a particularly respectful andtenderly sad
 voice, she said:"Trust in His mercy!" and pointing out a small sofa for him to 
sit andwait for her, she went silently toward the door that everyone waswatching
 and it creaked very slightly as she disappeared behind it.Pierre, having made u
p his mind to obey his monitress implicitly, movedtoward the sofa she had indica
ted. As soon as Anna Mikhaylovna haddisappeared he noticed that the eyes of all 
in the room turned to himwith something more than curiosity and sympathy. He not
iced that theywhispered to one another, casting significant looks at him with a 
kindof awe and even servility. A deference such as he had never beforereceived w
as shown him. A strange lady, the one who had been talking tothe priests, rose a
nd offered him her seat; an aide-de-camp picked upand returned a glove Pierre ha
d dropped; the doctors became respectfullysilent as he passed by, and moved to m
ake way for him. At first Pierrewished to take another seat so as not to trouble
 the lady, and also topick up the glove himself and to pass round the doctors wh
o were noteven in his way; but all at once he felt that this would not do, andth
at tonight he was a person obliged to perform some sort of awful ritewhich every
one expected of him, and that he was therefore bound toaccept their services. He
 took the glove in silence from the aide-de-camp, and sat down in the lady's cha
ir, placing his huge handssymmetrically on his knees in the naive attitude of an
 Egyptian statue,and decided in his own mind that all was as it should be, and t
hat inorder not to lose his head and do foolish things he must not act on hisown
 ideas tonight, but must yield himself up entirely to the will ofthose who were 
guiding him.Not two minutes had passed before Prince Vasili with head erectmajes
tically entered the room. He was wearing his long coat with threestars on his br
east. He seemed to have grown thinner since the morning;his eyes seemed larger t
han usual when he glanced round and noticedPierre. He went up to him, took his h
and (a thing he never used to do),and drew it downwards as if wishing to ascerta
in whether it was firmlyfixed on."Courage, courage, my friend! He has asked to s
ee you. That is well!"and he turned to go.But Pierre thought it necessary to ask
: "How is..." and hesitated, notknowing whether it would be proper to call the d
ying man "the count,"yet ashamed to call him "father.""He had another stroke abo
ut half an hour ago. Courage, my friend..."Pierre's mind was in such a confused 
state that the word "stroke"suggested to him a blow from something. He looked at
 Prince Vasili inperplexity, and only later grasped that a stroke was an attack 
ofillness. Prince Vasili said something to Lorrain in passing and wentthrough th
e door on tiptoe. He could not walk well on tiptoe and hiswhole body jerked at e
ach step. The eldest princess followed him, andthe priests and deacons and some 
servants also went in at the door.Through that door was heard a noise of things 
being moved about, and atlast Anna Mikhaylovna, still with the same expression, 
pale but resolutein the discharge of duty, ran out and touching Pierre lightly o
n the armsaid:"The divine mercy is inexhaustible! Unction is about to be adminis
tered.Come."Pierre went in at the door, stepping on the soft carpet, and noticed
that the strange lady, the aide-de-camp, and some of the servants, allfollowed h
im in, as if there were now no further need for permission toenter that room.CHA
PTER XXIIIPierre well knew this large room divided by columns and an arch, itswa
lls hung round with Persian carpets. The part of the room behind thecolumns, wit
h a high silk-curtained mahogany bedstead on one side and onthe other an immense
 case containing icons, was brightly illuminatedwith red light like a Russian ch
urch during evening service. Under thegleaming icons stood a long invalid chair,
 and in that chair on snowy-white smooth pillows, evidently freshly changed, Pie
rre saw--covered tothe waist by a bright green quilt--the familiar, majestic fig
ure of hisfather, Count Bezukhov, with that gray mane of hair above his broadfor
ehead which reminded one of a lion, and the deep characteristicallynoble wrinkle
s of his handsome, ruddy face. He lay just under the icons;his large thick hands
 outside the quilt. Into the right hand, which waslying palm downwards, a wax ta
per had been thrust between forefinger andthumb, and an old servant, bending ove
r from behind the chair, held itin position. By the chair stood the priests, the
ir long hair fallingover their magnificent glittering vestments, with lighted ta
pers intheir hands, slowly and solemnly conducting the service. A little behindt
hem stood the two younger princesses holding handkerchiefs to theireyes, and jus
t in front of them their eldest sister, Catiche, with avicious and determined lo
ok steadily fixed on the icons, as thoughdeclaring to all that she could not ans
wer for herself should she glanceround. Anna Mikhaylovna, with a meek, sorrowful
, and all-forgivingexpression on her face, stood by the door near the strange la
dy. PrinceVasili in front of the door, near the invalid chair, a wax taper in hi
sleft hand, was leaning his left arm on the carved back of a velvet chairhe had 
turned round for the purpose, and was crossing himself with hisright hand, turni
ng his eyes upward each time he touched his forehead.His face wore a calm look o
f piety and resignation to the will of God."If you do not understand these senti
ments," he seemed to be saying, "somuch the worse for you!"Behind him stood the 
aide-de-camp, the doctors, and the menservants; themen and women had separated a
s in church. All were silently crossingthemselves, and the reading of the church
 service, the subdued chantingof deep bass voices, and in the intervals sighs an
d the shuffling offeet were the only sounds that could be heard. Anna Mikhaylovn
a, with anair of importance that showed that she felt she quite knew what she wa
sabout, went across the room to where Pierre was standing and gave him ataper. H
e lit it and, distracted by observing those around him, begancrossing himself wi
th the hand that held the taper.Sophie, the rosy, laughter-loving, youngest prin
cess with the mole,watched him. She smiled, hid her face in her handkerchief, an
d remainedwith it hidden for awhile; then looking up and seeing Pierre she again
began to laugh. She evidently felt unable to look at him withoutlaughing, but co
uld not resist looking at him: so to be out oftemptation she slipped quietly beh
ind one of the columns. In the midstof the service the voices of the priests sud
denly ceased, they whisperedto one another, and the old servant who was holding 
the count's hand gotup and said something to the ladies. Anna Mikhaylovna steppe
d forwardand, stooping over the dying man, beckoned to Lorrain from behind herba
ck. The French doctor held no taper; he was leaning against one of thecolumns in
 a respectful attitude implying that he, a foreigner, in spiteof all differences
 of faith, understood the full importance of the ritenow being performed and eve
n approved of it. He now approached the sickman with the noiseless step of one i
n full vigor of life, with hisdelicate white fingers raised from the green quilt
 the hand that wasfree, and turning sideways felt the pulse and reflected a mome
nt. Thesick man was given something to drink, there was a stir around him, thent
he people resumed their places and the service continued. During thisinterval Pi
erre noticed that Prince Vasili left the chair on which hehad been leaning, and-
-with an air which intimated that he knew what hewas about and if others did not
 understand him it was so much the worsefor them--did not go up to the dying man
, but passed by him, joined theeldest princess, and moved with her to the side o
f the room where stoodthe high bedstead with its silken hangings. On leaving the
 bed bothPrince Vasili and the princess passed out by a back door, but returnedt
o their places one after the other before the service was concluded.Pierre paid 
no more attention to this occurrence than to the rest ofwhat went on, having mad
e up his mind once for all that what he sawhappening around him that evening was
 in some way essential.The chanting of the service ceased, and the voice of the 
priest washeard respectfully congratulating the dying man on having received the
sacrament. The dying man lay as lifeless and immovable as before. Aroundhim ever
yone began to stir: steps were audible and whispers, among whichAnna Mikhaylovna
's was the most distinct.Pierre heard her say:"Certainly he must be moved onto t
he bed; here it will be impossible..."The sick man was so surrounded by doctors,
 princesses, and servants thatPierre could no longer see the reddish-yellow face
 with its gray mane--which, though he saw other faces as well, he had not lost s
ight of for asingle moment during the whole service. He judged by the cautiousmo
vements of those who crowded round the invalid chair that they hadlifted the dyi
ng man and were moving him."Catch hold of my arm or you'll drop him!" he heard o
ne of the servantssay in a frightened whisper. "Catch hold from underneath. Here
!"exclaimed different voices; and the heavy breathing of the bearers andthe shuf
fling of their feet grew more hurried, as if the weight theywere carrying were t
oo much for them.As the bearers, among whom was Anna Mikhaylovna, passed the you
ng man hecaught a momentary glimpse between their heads and backs of the dyingma
n's high, stout, uncovered chest and powerful shoulders, raised bythose who were
 holding him under the armpits, and of his gray, curly,leonine head. This head, 
with its remarkably broad brow and cheekbones,its handsome, sensual mouth, and i
ts cold, majestic expression, was notdisfigured by the approach of death. It was
 the same as Pierreremembered it three months before, when the count had sent hi
m toPetersburg. But now this head was swaying helplessly with the unevenmovement
s of the bearers, and the cold listless gaze fixed itself uponnothing.After a fe
w minutes' bustle beside the high bedstead, those who hadcarried the sick man di
spersed. Anna Mikhaylovna touched Pierre's handand said, "Come." Pierre went wit
h her to the bed on which the sick manhad been laid in a stately pose in keeping
 with the ceremony justcompleted. He lay with his head propped high on the pillo
ws. His handswere symmetrically placed on the green silk quilt, the palms downwa
rd.When Pierre came up the count was gazing straight at him, but with alook the 
significance of which could not be understood by mortal man.Either this look mea
nt nothing but that as long as one has eyes theymust look somewhere, or it meant
 too much. Pierre hesitated, not knowingwhat to do, and glanced inquiringly at h
is guide. Anna Mikhaylovna madea hurried sign with her eyes, glancing at the sic
k man's hand and movingher lips as if to send it a kiss. Pierre, carefully stret
ching his neckso as not to touch the quilt, followed her suggestion and pressed 
hislips to the large boned, fleshy hand. Neither the hand nor a singlemuscle of 
the count's face stirred. Once more Pierre lookedquestioningly at Anna Mikhaylov
na to see what he was to do next. AnnaMikhaylovna with her eyes indicated a chai
r that stood beside the bed.Pierre obediently sat down, his eyes asking if he we
re doing right. AnnaMikhaylovna nodded approvingly. Again Pierre fell into the n
aivelysymmetrical pose of an Egyptian statue, evidently distressed that hisstout
 and clumsy body took up so much room and doing his utmost to lookas small as po
ssible. He looked at the count, who still gazed at thespot where Pierre's face h
ad been before he sat down. Anna Mikhaylovnaindicated by her attitude her consci
ousness of the pathetic importanceof these last moments of meeting between the f
ather and son. This lastedabout two minutes, which to Pierre seemed an hour. Sud
denly the broadmuscles and lines of the count's face began to twitch. The twitch
ingincreased, the handsome mouth was drawn to one side (only now did Pierrereali
ze how near death his father was), and from that distorted mouthissued an indist
inct, hoarse sound. Anna Mikhaylovna looked attentivelyat the sick man's eyes, t
rying to guess what he wanted; she pointedfirst to Pierre, then to some drink, t
hen named Prince Vasili in aninquiring whisper, then pointed to the quilt. The e
yes and face of thesick man showed impatience. He made an effort to look at the 
servant whostood constantly at the head of the bed."Wants to turn on the other s
ide," whispered the servant, and got up toturn the count's heavy body toward the
 wall.Pierre rose to help him.While the count was being turned over, one of his 
arms fell backhelplessly and he made a fruitless effort to pull it forward. Whet
her henoticed the look of terror with which Pierre regarded that lifeless arm,or
 whether some other thought flitted across his dying brain, at anyrate he glance
d at the refractory arm, at Pierre's terror-stricken face,and again at the arm, 
and on his face a feeble, piteous smile appeared,quite out of keeping with his f
eatures, that seemed to deride his ownhelplessness. At sight of this smile Pierr
e felt an unexpected quiveringin his breast and a tickling in his nose, and tear
s dimmed his eyes. Thesick man was turned on to his side with his face to the wa
ll. He sighed."He is dozing," said Anna Mikhaylovna, observing that one of thepr
incesses was coming to take her turn at watching. "Let us go."Pierre went out.CH
APTER XXIVThere was now no one in the reception room except Prince Vasili and th
eeldest princess, who were sitting under the portrait of Catherine theGreat and 
talking eagerly. As soon as they saw Pierre and his companionthey became silent,
 and Pierre thought he saw the princess hidesomething as she whispered:"I can't 
bear the sight of that woman.""Catiche has had tea served in the small drawing r
oom," said PrinceVasili to Anna Mikhaylovna. "Go and take something, my poor Ann
aMikhaylovna, or you will not hold out."To Pierre he said nothing, merely giving
 his arm a sympathetic squeezebelow the shoulder. Pierre went with Anna Mikhaylo
vna into the smalldrawing room."There is nothing so refreshing after a sleepless
 night as a cup of thisdelicious Russian tea," Lorrain was saying with an air of
 restrainedanimation as he stood sipping tea from a delicate Chinese handleless 
cupbefore a table on which tea and a cold supper were laid in the smallcircular 
room. Around the table all who were at Count Bezukhov's housethat night had gath
ered to fortify themselves. Pierre well rememberedthis small circular drawing ro
om with its mirrors and little tables.During balls given at the house Pierre, wh
o did not know how to dance,had liked sitting in this room to watch the ladies w
ho, as they passedthrough in their ball dresses with diamonds and pearls on thei
r bareshoulders, looked at themselves in the brilliantly lighted mirrors whichre
peated their reflections several times. Now this same room was dimlylighted by t
wo candles. On one small table tea things and supper dishesstood in disorder, an
d in the middle of the night a motley throng ofpeople sat there, not merrymaking
, but somberly whispering, andbetraying by every word and movement that they non
e of them forgot whatwas happening and what was about to happen in the bedroom. 
Pierre didnot eat anything though he would very much have liked to. He lookedinq
uiringly at his monitress and saw that she was again going on tiptoeto the recep
tion room where they had left Prince Vasili and the eldestprincess. Pierre concl
uded that this also was essential, and after ashort interval followed her. Anna 
Mikhaylovna was standing beside theprincess, and they were both speaking in exci
ted whispers."Permit me, Princess, to know what is necessary and what is notnece
ssary," said the younger of the two speakers, evidently in the samestate of exci
tement as when she had slammed the door of her room."But, my dear princess," ans
wered Anna Mikhaylovna blandly butimpressively, blocking the way to the bedroom 
and preventing the otherfrom passing, "won't this be too much for poor Uncle at 
a moment when heneeds repose? Worldly conversation at a moment when his soul is 
alreadyprepared..."Prince Vasili was seated in an easy chair in his familiar att
itude, withone leg crossed high above the other. His cheeks, which were so flabb
ythat they looked heavier below, were twitching violently; but he worethe air of
 a man little concerned in what the two ladies were saying."Come, my dear Anna M
ikhaylovna, let Catiche do as she pleases. You knowhow fond the count is of her.
""I don't even know what is in this paper," said the younger of the twoladies, a
ddressing Prince Vasili and pointing to an inlaid portfolio sheheld in her hand.
 "All I know is that his real will is in his writingtable, and this is a paper h
e has forgotten...."She tried to pass Anna Mikhaylovna, but the latter sprang so
 as to barher path."I know, my dear, kind princess," said Anna Mikhaylovna, seiz
ing theportfolio so firmly that it was plain she would not let go easily. "Dearp
rincess, I beg and implore you, have some pity on him! Je vous enconjure..."The 
princess did not reply. Their efforts in the struggle for theportfolio were the 
only sounds audible, but it was evident that if theprincess did speak, her words
 would not be flattering to AnnaMikhaylovna. Though the latter held on tenacious
ly, her voice lost noneof its honeyed firmness and softness."Pierre, my dear, co
me here. I think he will not be out of place in afamily consultation; is it not 
so, Prince?""Why don't you speak, cousin?" suddenly shrieked the princess so lou
dthat those in the drawing room heard her and were startled. "Why do youremain s
ilent when heaven knows who permits herself to interfere, makinga scene on the v
ery threshold of a dying man's room? Intriguer!" shehissed viciously, and tugged
 with all her might at the portfolio.But Anna Mikhaylovna went forward a step or
 two to keep her hold on theportfolio, and changed her grip.Prince Vasili rose. 
"Oh!" said he with reproach and surprise, "this isabsurd! Come, let go I tell yo
u."The princess let go."And you too!"But Anna Mikhaylovna did not obey him."Let 
go, I tell you! I will take the responsibility. I myself will goand ask him, I!.
.. does that satisfy you?""But, Prince," said Anna Mikhaylovna, "after such a so
lemn sacrament,allow him a moment's peace! Here, Pierre, tell them your opinion,
" saidshe, turning to the young man who, having come quite close, was gazingwith
 astonishment at the angry face of the princess which had lost alldignity, and a
t the twitching cheeks of Prince Vasili."Remember that you will answer for the c
onsequences," said Prince Vasiliseverely. "You don't know what you are doing.""V
ile woman!" shouted the princess, darting unexpectedly at AnnaMikhaylovna and sn
atching the portfolio from her.Prince Vasili bent his head and spread out his ha
nds.At this moment that terrible door, which Pierre had watched so long andwhich
 had always opened so quietly, burst noisily open and bangedagainst the wall, an
d the second of the three sisters rushed outwringing her hands."What are you doi
ng!" she cried vehemently. "He is dying and you leaveme alone with him!"Her sist
er dropped the portfolio. Anna Mikhaylovna, stooping, quicklycaught up the objec
t of contention and ran into the bedroom. The eldestprincess and Prince Vasili, 
recovering themselves, followed her. A fewminutes later the eldest sister came o
ut with a pale hard face, againbiting her underlip. At sight of Pierre her expre
ssion showed anirrepressible hatred."Yes, now you may be glad!" said she; "this 
is what you have beenwaiting for." And bursting into tears she hid her face in h
erhandkerchief and rushed from the room.Prince Vasili came next. He staggered to
 the sofa on which Pierre wassitting and dropped onto it, covering his face with
 his hand. Pierrenoticed that he was pale and that his jaw quivered and shook as
 if in anague."Ah, my friend!" said he, taking Pierre by the elbow; and there wa
s inhis voice a sincerity and weakness Pierre had never observed in itbefore. "H
ow often we sin, how much we deceive, and all for what? I amnear sixty, dear fri
end... I too... All will end in death, all! Death isawful..." and he burst into 
tears.Anna Mikhaylovna came out last. She approached Pierre with slow, quietstep
s."Pierre!" she said.Pierre gave her an inquiring look. She kissed the young man
 on hisforehead, wetting him with her tears. Then after a pause she said:"He is 
no more...."Pierre looked at her over his spectacles."Come, I will go with you. 
Try to weep, nothing gives such relief astears."She led him into the dark drawin
g room and Pierre was glad no one couldsee his face. Anna Mikhaylovna left him, 
and when she returned he wasfast asleep with his head on his arm.In the morning 
Anna Mikhaylovna said to Pierre:"Yes, my dear, this is a great loss for us all, 
not to speak of you. ButGod will support you: you are young, and are now, I hope
, in command ofan immense fortune. The will has not yet been opened. I know you 
wellenough to be sure that this will not turn your head, but it imposesduties on
 you, and you must be a man."Pierre was silent."Perhaps later on I may tell you,
 my dear boy, that if I had not beenthere, God only knows what would have happen
ed! You know, Uncle promisedme only the day before yesterday not to forget Boris
. But he had notime. I hope, my dear friend, you will carry out your father's wi
sh?"Pierre understood nothing of all this and coloring shyly looked insilence at
 Princess Anna Mikhaylovna. After her talk with Pierre, AnnaMikhaylovna returned
 to the Rostovs' and went to bed. On waking in themorning she told the Rostovs a
nd all her acquaintances the details ofCount Bezukhov's death. She said the coun
t had died as she would herselfwish to die, that his end was not only touching b
ut edifying. As to thelast meeting between father and son, it was so touching th
at she couldnot think of it without tears, and did not know which had behaved be
tterduring those awful moments--the father who so remembered everything andevery
body at last and had spoken such pathetic words to the son, orPierre, whom it ha
d been pitiful to see, so stricken was he with grief,though he tried hard to hid
e it in order not to sadden his dying father."It is painful, but it does one goo
d. It uplifts the soul to see suchmen as the old count and his worthy son," said
 she. Of the behavior ofthe eldest princess and Prince Vasili she spoke disappro
vingly, but inwhispers and as a great secret.CHAPTER XXVAt Bald Hills, Prince Ni
cholas Andreevich Bolkonski's estate, thearrival of young Prince Andrew and his 
wife was daily expected, but thisexpectation did not upset the regular routine o
f life in the oldprince's household. General in Chief Prince Nicholas Andreevich
(nicknamed in society, "the King of Prussia") ever since the EmperorPaul had exi
led him to his country estate had lived there continuouslywith his daughter, Pri
ncess Mary, and her companion, MademoiselleBourienne. Though in the new reign he
 was free to return to thecapitals, he still continued to live in the country, r
emarking thatanyone who wanted to see him could come the hundred miles from Mosc
ow toBald Hills, while he himself needed no one and nothing. He used to saythat 
there are only two sources of human vice--idleness andsuperstition, and only two
 virtues--activity and intelligence. Hehimself undertook his daughter's educatio
n, and to develop these twocardinal virtues in her gave her lessons in algebra a
nd geometry tillshe was twenty, and arranged her life so that her whole time was
occupied. He was himself always occupied: writing his memoirs, solvingproblems i
n higher mathematics, turning snuffboxes on a lathe, workingin the garden, or su
perintending the building that was always going onat his estate. As regularity i
s a prime condition facilitating activity,regularity in his household was carrie
d to the highest point ofexactitude. He always came to table under precisely the
 same conditions,and not only at the same hour but at the same minute. With thos
e abouthim, from his daughter to his serfs, the prince was sharp and invariablye
xacting, so that without being a hardhearted man he inspired such fear
